title,selftext,subreddit
The 2018 Ace Community Survey is now open! Take 30 minutes to help community-generated research on the diversity and needs of the ace community.,,asexuality
"Hooray todd costume with bonus sign and flag! I attempted to make my pinkish hair blue with some spray, but it just turned purple.",,asexuality
Things to not say to an asexual:,"- Are you sure? I think you just haven’t been with the right people. 
- It’s probably just because you have been abused, I don’t think you’re asexual. 
- You probably just haven’t orgasmed yet, I can change that for you.
- Please just try having sex with me, you’ll like it. 
- You have no idea what you’re missing out on. 
- Can I at least masturbate in front of you? 
- You can’t be asexual if you masturbate though. 
- That’s a real shame because you’re so hot. 
- I’ve met people that said they didn’t like sex, then they slept with me and I changed their mind. 
- But I could make you feel so good. 
- But you’ve had sex before. 
- You’ve just been having sex wrong. 

All of these have been said to me. Feel free to add to the list. ",asexuality
I don’t feel real!,"
Hi I’m kind of Aro Ace Male aged 22. But Ideally I would like someone to hug me and live with (does that make me romantic idek)

I’ve known I was asexual since school. I liked being around certain people but I realised that was it I didn’t want anymore than maybe an on my own terms hug. 

So I spent all of School training myself to be normal. Making sex jokes constantly to fit in, lying about all the porn I - never - watched and who I liked just to have friends. People don’t get any less obsessed with sex. At uni everyone would bring home sexual partners constantly and I just was reminded of how much I hated myself all the time. 

All the girls at uni would tell me how respectful and non creepy I was compared to other guys but I just wanted to scream at them to stop. It doesn’t make me feel good it makes me feel not Male, not real and not human. Men are meant to be obsessed with sex and from what I can tell all the real men are.

I eventually started making up sexual partners to friends just because I can’t bear to tell anyone that I’m like this. I’ve never met another asexual in real life ever. I even tried to force myself to like sex and tried to have it with someone but I had a breakdown and had to stop halfway through and I wanted to kill myself more than ever that night. 

I have loads of other problems like aspergers and other physical health conditions but the Asexuality is one thing I’ve never told a living person about. 

Sex is everywhere on tv, in books, in movies and on advertising.

I hate Asexuality and I hate myself. 

I don’t know why I posted this. Sorry",asexuality
My school's marching band uniform has the same color scheme as our flag!,,asexuality
Do you ever wonder if you'll ever fall in love?,"So, I'm a 24 year old girl and I am pretty sure that I'm asexual, but I also have no experience with kissing, having a boyfriend or being in love or any of that stuff... 

I have pretty severe social anxiety and I've never really had much contact with guys, probably because I was bullied by boys in high school, so yeah, I don't know. I guess I have a stay-away-from-me vibe or something, cause barely anyone has ever tried flirting with me. I had a hard time making friends in general, but the ones I had were always girls. I do have some male friends/acquaintances now, but they're either taken or gay, or just internet friends. 

I just don't know why I've never had an actual crush, like... is it just my anxiety/awkwardness, should I get to know more guys? Am I aro? I honestly can't really picture myself having a boyfriend, but I am a hopeless romantic, always reading/watching love stories and I kinda hate the idea of ending up alone for my entire life. 

But anyways, maybe I'm overthinking this and obviously there's not really an answer... guess I'm just wondering if anyone else ever feels/felt like this.
",asexuality
"UPDATE: Hey, ya’ll! Got my ring finally!",,asexuality
How to come out as AroAce to parents?,"I've been contemplating on coming out to my parents, but I don't know how. I've only come out to two people (A friend who I lost because of this and another friend but we still talk)

My mom knows a little bit of what Asexuality is (but not like completely), but I don't know if my dad does.

I came out as Bisexual 5 years ago, so I fear that my parents won't take me seriously this time. After wasting a whole year researching on a term that best decribes me and explains past interactions, I'm happy. It's my parents that keep me from expressing that happiness.

Any idea on how should I come out to them? Thanks!",asexuality
A bit of questionning,"Hello everyone, a bit of backstory here :
So, I (21F) always considered myself heterosexual but with some strong bonds woth women (homoromantic maybe ? That's another story for another time).

 I often quitted relationships because I realized I have no sexual attraction to my then-partners, so I thought maybe this isn't the right person, maybe I'm the problem... I had sex a few times, because I was curious; and yes it felt good, but... that's all. I litteraly have no interest in sex at all. I don't have a sexual appetite either, more like a need of affection and cuddles.

The first thing that made me come here is that I read some forums about relationships issues, and sex come often in these, but I just couldn't imagine myself having sex like once a week, even once a month ! At first I was thinking, maybe I am just on the lower side of sex drive, but now, the more I'm thinking about this, the more I realize I don't really have a sex drive. 

Sorry if my post ends up being a bit confusing, and thank you in advance for your help !
",asexuality
Literally the only reason I want a partner is to pay half the bills...,"This post isn't leading anywhere, just venting.

I know I'm aro ace, but every now and then I just think ""fuck, life would be so much easier with someone else to pay for half this shit!""

I live in a super expensive city and as a solo person I'm basically never going to be able to afford property or to have holidays or anything. And forget about trying to have kids on my own; how could I raise a kid AND continue working full time?

Sometimes I just look at my partnered friends and think ""maybe I could put up with that, if it gave me a more comfortable life"". But then I feel terrible because I'd be compromising on so much about myself.

I dunno, sometimes it just sucks being single.

Note: Yes, I know QPRs are a thing, but finding another Ace person who you like, who likes you, and who wants the same thing is easier said than done. 

Edit: spelling and grammar",asexuality
Interview Request: Asexual people who experience romantic attraction and are in [or have been] in a form of romantic relationship,"Hi everyone,

I’m a freelance writer working with Broadly. 

I'm looking for asexual people who experience romantic attraction and have been in a past or current relationship and would like to give advice about what you wish people knew pertaining to the experience. 

Contact me at [SerenaSonoma1@gmail.com](mailto:SerenaSonoma1@gmail.com) to set up an email or phone interview.

Portfolio: [SerenaSonoma.contently.com](https://SerenaSonoma.contently.com)

Twitter.com/SerenaSonoma

Thank you,

\- Serena",asexuality
Why do some people like to deny asexual identities by saying 'you're just trying to be oppressed' ?,"I saw this irritating thread on twitter basically saying that asexual identifying people are probably closeted gays (even though people can obviously be ace and gay) and that like pedophiles they don't belong in LGBT+ bc celibacy (another UGH moment) isn't a sexuality. 

Outside of all the things she said that were factually wrong I see a lot of 'you're just trying to be special/oppressed/different.' Stuff that disregards intersectionality on a whole. 

Why do people think that? Like what makes them think people are trying to join some 1% exclusive club? ",asexuality
Someone has a crush on me,"What the fuck do I say?? I'm trans (they don't know) and I'm aroace (they don't know)

They've known me for like 3 days and they have a girlfriend so?? What do crushes even imply? I'm so confused ",asexuality
hello!,I'm new! I think I'm asexual and aromantic. I just here to support and all.,asexuality
to any ace lesbians here: I could use some advice,"I've come to call myself this way recently and partly due to reading lesbians' experiences on other subs.... but so much of the common narrative is about finding freedom in sexuality. which is great! I'm happy for them! yet I feel a bit distanced since I just can't empathize. I have an amazing partner who is also an ace lesbian, and I'm very lucky to be able to have identity conversations with her, but I'd love to relate to others' stories and more media/fiction and I just... don't as long as it involves attraction or sex.

to other ace lesbians on this sub, do you feel any alienation from (allo) stories of discovery as well? any words of wisdom for fully accepting your identity as part of a group when sexual attraction isn't in the equation (as it is for many others)? ",asexuality
Feeling shitty about being ace,"Sorry for being negative on the sub, but I don't really have anyone to talk to about this.

I'm feeling really shitty about being ace lately. I keep thinking﻿﻿﻿﻿﻿ things that essentially boil down to ""If I was a normal person, I could do x"". 

A big part of me definitely wishes I could do the whole relationship thing like a regular person. I've been single for about eight years? But it's like... firstly, I'm asexual, which is a big red flag/deal breaker for probably 95% of people to begin with. Secondly﻿, I don't really ever want to date someone unless I have developed interest in them specifically which is pretty rare at this point. Thirdly, my last relationship was so bad I've been diagnosed with PTSD after taking 5+ years to even talk to a therapist about it so that really doesn't help. I'd need to find someone who I'm interested in who is also interested in me, and who is genuinely okay/content with me being ace, and who I feel like I can trust, and who is willing to put up with my anxious dumb self and basically it's a weird pipe dream that's never gonna happen and it stresses me out thinking about it and I'm so annoyed and frustrated about it at the moment that I've started having nightmares about my ex again when I thought I was doing so much better. 

I'm just so mad at m﻿yself for just being me and I hate it. ﻿And I can't help but think if I weren't asexual I wouldn't have these issues. I wouldn't be so hesitant to get into a relationship in the first place, I wouldn't have had the issues I had with my ex that led to them pressuring me into sexual situations I wasn't comfortable with because the discomfort wouldn't be there! If I was allo I could just live and be normal and date and have relationships but as I am I get freaked out and anxious as fuck if I so much as have a crush because all this bullshit comes back into focus and I stress myself out over nothing.

I don't know how much of this is a me thing and how much of this is an ace thing. I'm just so frustrated and upset and angry right now and it feels like theres nothing i can do.

Does it ever stop feeling hopeless?",asexuality
"If a Crush is to Romantic Attraction, then...","If a crush is basically a feeling of Romantic Attraction, then would a Squish be a feeling of Emotional attraction?",asexuality
"Looking at you, MCU",,asexuality
Anyone here whose only sexual partner is their right hand?,"\*Wink wink\* ;)

In all seriousness though, any aces here who masturbate?",asexuality
Sex shop awkwardness..,Just a random anecdote but yesterday I went to a sex shop because they had corsets on sale. Due to my diagnosis of autism I use them for compression therapy (Google it; very interesting). Anyway my friends decided it would be fun to play with the sex toys and talk about how good they probably are. They know I'm a virgin but don't know I'm asexual so I had to pretend to be an ordinary adult who was not at all embarrassed. On the plus side I got 2 underbust corsets for 5 euros each!!,asexuality
Struggling,"Hello,

On mobile so sorry if there is any formatting issues.

33m Ace here. Maybe Aroace? I dunno.  In all my life only has a romantic attraction once.  

Lately my best friend and roommate has been more so self absorbed than before.  Has been talking to a lot of guys she met online to try and get a boyfriend.  Honestly I want her to be happy and support her fully. 

In saying that, I also feel like I am being tossed aside. She knows I am ace and knows my ideal relationship with a person is pretty much what we have, plus cuddling(something we don’t do).  

Because her focus has been on them, we haven’t really been interacting as much. My work schedule has changed so during the week we don’t see each other as much anymore either.  Weekends are always hit and miss if we hangout together or not.  

I have told her how I feel tossed aside because she can easily pick up my mood.  She has reassured me she isn’t going anywhere at all.  We both love and care about each other deeply, just in a platonic way.

It is just I am struggling, I know it will be harder before easier, and if things go well with a guy, it will get worse.  It just sucks is all.  I feel like I just needed to get this off my chest.  ",asexuality
Could counceling have made me asexual?,"When I was a young child, I'm talking like maybe a year at least, my biological father abused me in a sexual manner. He went to prison for it, of course, and he's still on the sex offenders list and all that, but this isn't about him. It's about what happened to me.
I don't remember when the counceling started, but I was a kid. Like, a kid who had no real idea of how the world works, and basically no memory of the event who changed her life other then vague things that now, at age 18, are nothing more then memories of memories and weird dreams. 
But despite that I had no real memory of the event, I still attended counceling for much if not all of my childhood. Other children learned sex ed when they reached highschool, or from their parents, but I learned it at age ten in the basement of the local college from an overly-nice woman. I remember I once asked her why I had to go to these things and I was told that it was to ""keep all the memories from rushing back in the future"" or to keep from having some kind of mental breakdown, but... I was less then a year old, three years at most. Who remembers things from that age? The only thing I had to show for it was a weird knowledge of things I shouldn't know, nor should any child my age know.
As I mentioned, I'm 18 now, and as expected I've had at least one boyfriend, but when he tried to do things with I just.. I felt absolutely nothing towards him. Nothing whatsoever. At first, I just thought I was asexual or something, but I've found myself doing things, imagining things that I don't think an asexual person does. I have masturbated, and I do have a fettish so clearly there's something there. I just.. I can't see myself doing anything with anyone else and I don't feel anything when I think about it. So I'm just wondering if this has something to do with intercourse and other sexual things being introduced and normalized when I was young. 
If anyone has any sort of insight to this, or just any information that would help me to not feel like a freak, that would be... well, that would be amazing.",asexuality
Am I aromantic?,"For a long time I’ve identified as biromantic on the border of homoromantic. I know I’m asexual. 22m. But what exactly is romantic attraction? I know I like people in terms of hugging them, definitely high-fiving them, wanting to be really close friends with them, going out with someone or a group, feeling strong urges to cuddle people. Even have a super close relationship, but not necessarily boyfriend or girlfriend. I definitely know I find people AESTHETICALLY attractive, handsome, and beautiful. But I have never had a romantic relationship with anyone. Could I have been mistaking aesthetic attraction for romantic attraction? Like I sometimes picture myself wanting to kiss someone, but that quickly fades and I’m grossed out and I don’t want that on my second thought about it. Could I be demiromantic? Or aromantic? And if so, if demisexual is asexual-spectrum, is demi-romantic on the aromantic spectrum (if that’s a thing)?",asexuality
Last day of ace awareness week,,asexuality
Is Autochorissexual/Aegosexual on the asexual spectrum?,"I'm confused about this. This describes me quite well, and I even identified with it for a while when I was doubting that I was ace, but now I'm confused as to its place. I've heard some people call it subset of asexuality, and others say you can be allo and autochoris. What does it really mean?",asexuality
Just me? Or are more ace people female-identifying than male-identifying?,"Not to erase anyone's identity or experience, but I've noticed that all of the ace spaces I'm in are dominated by women and female-identifying folks. It may be coincidence, though. Trying to see whether this is a larger trend, or not — what have y'all observed?",asexuality
Am I aroace?,"20, F, and confused here.

Throughout my teen years, I was never really interested in relationships (romantic or sexual). Every time someone would ask me out I would turn them down because I simply wasn't into the idea of a relationship. Any crushes I had now seem to be forced by myself in an attempt to be ""normal"". And even now, at my age, I have no interest in a relationship, much less sex. I'd rather focus on more important things in my life (such as work, making myself a better person, and music). I don't even want to get married to anybody in the near future. I'm just indifferent to sex and romance.

I know it's not because of my meds or a hormone imbalance, it's just always been that way for me, even when I was young.

Could this mean I'm aromantic and asexual?",asexuality
Confused Long-Time Lurker,"28F here who has been lurking in this subreddit for years now and have found myself coming back over and over again because I’m just not sure if I’m Ace or something like Ace. 

Growing up I had never experienced a crush and I told my parents that I will never have a boyfriend or girlfriend. I came up with the term Asexual on my own and I remember my mom laughing at me and saying, “you reproduce by yourself?” 

By the time I was in High School I had extremely low self-esteem because I just couldn’t understand what a crush was. Then one day a friend of mine said, “you would be super cute with so and so”, who was a popular guy at school. I was so complimented that someone thought I could be with a popular guy that I latched onto the idea and became obsessive. That was my first “crush”. I ended up freaking the guy out by sending him love letters and he avoided me like the plague ever since. 

I did eventually get a couple boyfriends in high school who I would make out with because I thought it was fun. But making out never did anything for me sexually. I just enjoyed it.

I would also masturbate almost every day but never to any fantasies. It was just something that I thought felt good so would do it. It was a long time before I found out most people have fantasies while masturbating.

In my first year of college I managed to turn my nerdy self into something more sexy. I realized that I could control men by acting and dressing a certain way. I was still very much a virgin and even sex-repulsed at that point, but I was having too much fun making men fall for me and then stringing them along. I had a pretty low opinion of the average person back then, since everyone but me was so sex-driven. 

Then I developed my first actual crush on someone. But this person was a socio-path and hyper-controlling. I lost my virginity to him one night after I had fallen in love with him and had an emotionally abusive roller-coaster of a relationship for 2 years. I’m still not sure if I used sex to make up for the lack of emotional stability in that relationship. But I do know that we had a lot of sex during those two years. 

After we broke up I had one rebound, one friends-with-benefits and a couple guys I dated but went nowhere. Then I didn’t have sex for over a year and I honestly didn’t even want to.

At that point I met my best friend and the person who I’m married to now. I’ve never been in a happier and more stable relationship and we are perfect for each other. We don’t have sex very often but it’s often enough. 

So why do I think I’m Ace? A couple reasons, honestly. For one, I cannot remember a single time in my past where I saw a man and wanted to have sex with him. It was always either, “He’s cute. I want to make him want to have sex with me.” - due to low self-esteem. Every time I’ve wanted to have sex it was always after I seriously knew the person and liked them (which is Demi, right?) 

The only time I got sexually excited looking at anything was looking at women doing something sexy. However whenever I follow that train of though I end up super repulsed. Looking at women is sexy, but the idea doing anything with them myself is gross. 

And then most of the time when I’m with my husband I would much rather do almost anything else than have sex. I don’t mind it, and sometimes it’s fun. But I can only get off if there’s a vibrator involved and I require a TON of foreplay beforehand. 

He doesn’t seem to mind though so we make a good pair.

Sorry this is so long! Please let me know your thoughts. ",asexuality
"I'm Definitely Ace, But Something Weird's Going On RN","Hey dudes, I'm definitely ace, no questions about it, but I do have a question.

Being heteroromantic, I usually am attracted to about one guy every few years (physical appearance, personality, emotional maturity, mental intelligence &amp; wisdom, sense of humor, never sexual). This is pretty standard, and it's what I'm used to.

In the past four months, I have been attracted to at least 6 guys. This is an insane anomaly. Not sure whether it's a fluke and will eventually go away, or whether something's seriously up with my brain. For those of y'all who are ace but not aro on here, does stuff like this ever happen to you? How many people are you attracted to on average? Thoughts? Opinions? Personal experiences?",asexuality
Can someone clarify?,"If Sexual Attraction is described as ""An urge to have sexual contact with a specific person"" and Sexual Desire is described as ""The desire to have sexual contact, but not with a specific person"" then wouldn't that mean Sexual Desire and Arousal are the same thing?

Am I missing a key difference?",asexuality
First post to reddit. Here's a cat I colored in with the asexual colors. (:,,asexuality
Over Sexualizing Aces,"As an asexual woman who is active on dating websites, I’ve noticed that since I’ve stated that I’m asexual on them, I have gotten more sexual messages. They think it’s a challenge or that they can change me. I think that’s really disturbing and quite frankly disgusting. Has anyone else had similar experiences? Or is it just me? 😂",asexuality
I found this beanie baby that has (almost) ace colors!,,asexuality
Intrusive sexual thoughts? (possible trigger),"I'm fairly sure I'm ace, but every so often I'll be thinking about a guy (usually in the form of ""imaginary conversation with a celebrity"") and suddenly my brain is all like ""hey you know this person has a penis and it could go into your vagina"" and I can't stop thinking about it. I don't want to have sex with them, that's disgusting, but my mind gets stuck on the possibility.

Is this normal? I'm kind of confused.",asexuality
Am I asexual or do I just have an incredibly low sex drive?,"This is something that's been on my mind for a long time, but I always kinda pushed it aside because I didn't want to think about it. I'm 18 and have just started my first year of uni and especially in the last month or so it's been very apparent to me just how low my sex drive is. I've ended a night out with an open opportunity for sex four times in the past month, and each time I end up declining and just fall asleep with them. During the night I'd be attracted to them and want to go there, but once it came I'd much rather just go to bed. The next morning I'd always be confused with myself and a little mad that I didn't go through with it. My friends all obviously can't comprehend and seem to be horny all the fucking time and frankly I'm a lil jealous tbh because it seems like a much funner lifestyle. I've had sexual relationships in the past and while sometimes it's been fun, for the most part I've felt unsatisfied. I barely masturbate (maybe once a month or so) and afterwards always feel depressed af so I don't particularly like doing it. I understand I'm still very young and things are changing a lot so who knows how I might be in a couple years but for now this is definitely how I feel. My question is could I be somewhere along the spectrum of asexuality or just have a low sex drive? Or are they essentially the same thing? Cheers",asexuality
Finally accepting my asexuality.,"Hey guys,

I’ll keep it short. I’ve only ever been attracted to women (I’m a 26y/o male), but I’ve always felt different when talking to other male friends about women. They’d always get sexual, and it made me uncomfortable most of the time, unless the person was talking about the passionate emotional experiences they’d had with whoever they were with. I thought it was related to sexual abuse as a child or the fact that I was raised in a home with a single mother and my two sisters. I stayed a virgin until I was 22, despite plenty of opportunity to have sex with my girlfriends since middle school. I met a girl in college, and we got really close. I was infatuated by her mind, and would take her out on dates and the like to get to know her and just be around her. She took my virginity, and while I didn’t regret it, I didn’t really enjoy sex personally besides that carnal release. I did, however, extremely enjoy making her feel good. 

We eventually split, and grew apart. We both had mood disorders but I took medication and she didn’t. We’re friends now and she’s medicated and much happier. From here though I went on to date but never really feel that spark. 

I started to delve into my melancholic depression and try to understand the root of my issues. I wasn’t really interested in the sexual aspect of people, but rather, their minds. I met one 32 year old woman that was very obviously unhappy in her marriage. We began to talk more and more through various social media. We had a lot in common. She started to flirt with me. I became such a close friend that I was seeing plays with her and her mother in law. I was having dinner with her and her husband. He was a very emotionally abusive man and never held back in front of any company. 

Eventually I convinced her to pursue what made her happy. We talked about her leaving him, and she was terrified of being alone. I assured her that she had so much to offer and she finally split. She came over one day to “celebrate” which I misinterpreted as literally celebrate breaking off a toxic relationship. She meant a sexual celebration. We were drinking and I brought out my THC pen. We both blacked out. I woke in bed with her naked, full of remorse. I didn’t want to ever have performed a sexual act without feeling good about what I did. We talked about it and agreed not to see each other. This is about when I was concerned about my sexuality, because she was absolutely beautiful and I was still anxious and remorseful about what we had done. I was 24. 

I’m now 26, and despite my best efforts I haven’t been able to connect with someone who understands my lack of libido. I was drinking a lot a few weeks ago (had some posts removed from r/stopdrinking Bc I was drunk seeking help and that’s apparently a rule), and was having a hard time accepting my life. It felt wasted, knowing one of the 2 main drives in my life wasn’t functioning. Sex and hunger. I finally sought out therapy for the first time in 14 years. 

My therapist and I had a bunch of sessions over a month now, about 14. We tackled first my alcoholism and then my sexuality. How I was afraid I wasn’t offering in a relationship what was expected. He completely opened my eyes to asexuality, which I was familiar with but never really gave a second though, being surrounded by the men in my life that I am. After much discussion, I realize now with the proper information that I in fact am asexual but not aromantic. 

I’m not entirely sure why I’m writing, I guess just to meet other asexuals and maybe build my confidence in being an asexual man. Anyways, my name is Joey and I’m glad to finally feel like I have an identity that clears up my entire confusing sexual life. ",asexuality
Never had an orgasm,"So I like I may be somewhere on the asexuality spectrum, and i'm wondering if that could be part of why I have never had an orgasm? But I know asexual people can, it's just I struggle with getting or staying aroused. 

I also think I relate to being demisexual or graysexual more than full asexual. 

I would like to experience one someday. People say it feels great, but I don't know how to get there. I am 26 btw. ",asexuality
I’ve been thinking about this for a while and still have no idea,"So I’m currently M16 (almost 17) and all around me in school I hear guys and girls talking about who they want to have sex with but I’ve always been repulsed by the thought of sex along with reproductive organs and the process of sperm meeting the egg and shit, to the point where I almost passed out in health class several times. Also I’ve never masturbated in my life as that’s something else I find repulsive. The thought that I might be asexual came to me a few months ago but I still have no idea.",asexuality
#AsexualAwarenessWeek Day 7: What are some of the challenges asexuals face? And what culture?,"#AsexualAwarenessWeek Day 7: What are some of the challenges asexuals face? And what culture?

As exemplified in yesterday's post, asexuals face some problems when it comes to their identity. The problems that they face are not ones of institutional oppression, but rather those of societal pressure/backlash and medical bias.

Many asexuals are not believed when they reveal their identity, or sometimes, the behavior that results from their orientation is judged. Some are invalidated by loved ones and have lost friends over it. Many are rejected by current or potential partners.

They are told that they could never have love unless they fix their ""problem"" or get help. They are told to be alone, to be quiet if they aren't doing anything anyways. They are called frigid, robots, and prudes believed to be incapable of love. They are sexually harassed by people who believe that they can ""fix"" an asexual if they sleep with them. Some asexuals have suffered through corrective rape.

They are told they couldn't know they were asexual until they have had sex, and if they don't like it, they should keep trying. They are told they haven't met the right person yet or the reason they don't like sex is because they've only had bad sex. They are told they are too young to know and that they shouldn't worry because it will change even when some of them were well into their 20s and 30s, and some are told that since they aren't being sexually active, their body or their looks are a waste on them.

Many asexuals are pathologized. Some have had doctors give them Viagra and told to get laid until it's better. Doctors have prescribed medication to them for libido, depression, anxiety, etc. because clearly something was wrong with them. Asexual virgins are treated as if they are naive or lying.

Their identity is mocked and made the butt of jokes, misused by those who are ignorant. Some are rejected from safe spaces and communities they believe they belong to. They are guilted by parents if they aren't dating or having children. They are pressured by friends constantly to date or hook up, and if they are sexually active, they have to fight against those who attempt to take their identity away from them because clearly they can't be asexual if they have or like sex.

Though asexuals do face these issues, sometimes, it is not all doom and gloom. Asexuals have found acceptance in friends and families who listened and sought to learn. They have found their own communities to belong to and be accepted in, and as more awareness grows about asexuality, there are times when they say they are asexual and someone says, ""Oh, I know what that is.""

That's why asexuals don't stay quiet. Awareness is important. Many asexuals grew up feeling broken. They thought something was wrong with them, and it was an isolating feeling. The reason awareness is important is that maybe if people in the world start knowing what asexuality is, one less questioning person will feel lost because there will be a teacher who speaks with them, a friend who reaches out, a parent who sits down with them, or a textbook that dedicates at least a page. If the word is out there, it is just that more likely it will reach their ear.

Before I finish off this last post, I did promise a little insight into the asexual culture. You've heard about cake, right? Cake is a big thing in the asexual community due to a thread on the Asexuality Visibility and Education Network (AVEN) where people were contemplating what was better than sex, and someone suggested cake. It has become a way to welcome new asexuals into the community, the designs of posters and shirts, and even a rallying call at times. I mean, who doesn't enjoy a piece of cake every once in a while? If you don't, that's fine too.

The asexual flag is black, gray, white, and purple. The black stands for asexuality. The gray is for grey-sexuality and demisexuality. The white is for sexuality while the purple stands for community.

You might sometimes hear asexuals call things asexy. Usually, it's to describe things they like, find cool or pretty, etc., and if you see someone with a black ring on their right middle finger, they might be asexual. If you want to learn more, I do offer extended research resources, and Google does exist.

Well, that's all I have. Thank you for sticking through with me as I did my little part in spreading just a bit more information and awareness. Take care, and have an ace year! Yes, I went there. Chao, luvs.

TL;DR: Asexuals tend to face problems stemming from societal norms and medical bias. Many are told that there is something wrong with them, and they face rejection, criticism, disbelief, sexual harassment, and more. Awareness is important because it will help not only the asexuals who already identify with the orientation but the potential asexuals who don't feel like they belong and don't know why. The asexual community and culture are a bit quirky, and many really like cake, call things asexy, and wear black rings, but they are human and deserve some respect and acknowledgement even if it's just ask an appropriate question. Bye!

My Current Resource Master List:
Useful Links:
AVEN FAQ: https://www.asexuality.org/?q=general.html
What Is Asexuality: http://www.whatisasexuality.com/intro/
AVENwiki (Aromantic): http://wiki.asexuality.org/Aromantic
AVENwiki (Demisexual): http://wiki.asexuality.org/Demisexual
AVENwiki (Attraction): http://wiki.asexuality.org/Attraction
AVENwiki (Flag): http://wiki.asexuality.org/Asexual_flag
Asexual Archive (Glossary): http://www.asexualityarchive.com/glossary/
The Huffington Post (Asexuality Spectrum): https://www.huffingtonpost.com/…/asexual-spectrum_n_3428710…
Asexual Education (Attraction and Vocabulary): http://asexualeducation.tumblr.com/attraction
AVEN (Sexualities Master List): https://www.asexuality.org/…/123256-asexuality-sexual-ori…/…
AVENwiki (Lexicon): http://wiki.asexuality.org/Lexicon
AVENwiki (Queerplatonic): http://wiki.asexuality.org/Queerplatonic
The Asexuality Blog Resources &amp; Articles: https://theasexualityblog.com/resources-%26-articles
AVENwiki (Primary vs Secondary Sexual Attraction Model): http://wiki.asexuality.org/Primary_vs._secondary_sexual_att…

YouTubers:
AmeliaAce: https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCHAv1g2JODsrkUKfHh1nAwQ
Cookee Monsterr: https://www.youtube.com/user/Squiqqle27
QueerAsCat: https://www.youtube.com/user/QueerAsCat
Ash Hardell: https://www.youtube.com/user/HeyThere005

Blogs:
The Asexual Agenda: https://asexualagenda.wordpress.com/
The Asexuality Blog: https://theasexualityblog.com
Demisexuality Resource Center: http://www.demisexuality.org/

Podcasts:
The Asexuality Podcast:
http://feeds.soundcloud.com/…/soundcloud:users:1…/sounds.rss

Videos:
(A)sexual Documentary: https://youtu.be/11GGzOGIJnk
The Person Who Sent You This is Asexual: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=qQnC89Er1lo
QAC 41 - Am I Asexual? | Never Too Young To Know: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=rFcP6FuxdQY&amp;t=228s
Struggles with Being an Asexual: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ba_c49uJXJY
Teenage Asexual Comes Out: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=2WPerU21XkE
David Jay - Asexuality: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=VLI09O8bMkU
The Amazing Aces: A Talk on Asexuality | Danika Vrtar | TEDxYouth@Dayton: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1tmF2x1yf3Q
Asexuality: My Story of Self-Exploration | Chantal Kelly | TEDxYouth@LAS: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=NTBLsaLMi5k

Articles:
You're not asexual. You're a late bloomer: http://asexystuff.blogspot.com/…/youre-not-asexual-youre-ju…
This is What It Feels Like to Lack Sexual Attraction to Other People: https://www.refinery29.com/…/what-is-asexual-definition-exp…
What It Means to Be Asexual, or Ace: https://www.elle.com/cult…/a45499/growing-asexual-community/
Asexuality: https://tellmewhytheworldisweird.blogspot.com/…/asexual.htm…
What is Asexuality?: http://projectqueer.org/…/what-is-asexuality-asexuality-is-…
6 Weird Ways the World Looks Different When You're Asexual: http://www.cracked.com/personal-experiences-1518-6-weird-wa…
Asexuals: Who Are They and Why Are They Important?: https://www.psychologytoday.com/…/asexuals-who-are-they-and…
""You're Such a Waste"": Too Attractive to Be Asexual: http://theasexual.com/…/youre-such-a-waste-too-attractive-t…

Books:
The Invisible Orientation: https://www.amazon.com/Invisible-Orientation-I…/…/1634502434

Asexual Culture:
AVEN (Black Ring Origin Thread): https://www.asexuality.org/…/76607-black-rings-and-other-w…/
AVENwiki (Asexual Slang): http://wiki.asexuality.org/Asexual_slang
Asexuality Archive (Asexual Flag Meaning): http://www.asexualityarchive.com/the-asexuality-flag/
EntityMag (Demisexual Flag Meaning): http://www.entitymag.com/demisexual-flag-meaning/

Asexual Social Media:
Ace-Book: http://www.ace-book.net
Asexualitic: http://www.asexualitic.com
AVEN forums: https://www.asexuality.org/en/

Holidays:
Asexual Awareness Week: http://asexualawarenessweek.com

Research for Countering:
Hypoactive Sexual Desire Disorder: https://en.m.wikipedia.org/…/Hypoactive_sexual_desire_disor…
Sexual Aversion Disorder: http://www.minddisorders.com/…/Sexual-aversion-disorder.html
Asexuality: Sexual Orientation or Sexual Disorder?: https://health.howstuffworks.com/…/sexuality/asexuality3.htm",asexuality
"I found my Spooky Ace Rinng, just in time for Halloween!",,asexuality
My first serious relationship as an aro/ace girl,"Warning: mentions of sexy stuff that not many people may be interested in reading. Will be spoiler-tagged for your convenience. If I am breaking a rule please tell me, I just wanted to share this because as an aro/ace girl this kind of relationships are difficult for me. Here is my positive experience so maybe it will be useful for someone else. 

***
""I really like you.""

Damn. This confession was not a surprise for me, but still I didn't want it. Some weeks ago, during my birthday celebration, he, along with two other friends, decided to stay for a beer and chicken wings with me in a nearby restaurant after a day of solving puzzles in a Scape Room (my choice of birthday celebration). Two or three mugs later he asked me ""What do you think about love?"" I hurriedly answered ""I am too busy for such things!""

But now here we were.

He looked at me expectantly. I wanted to disappear. How could I tell him I was not attracted to him? How could I tell him I was not attracted to anyone? Not to close friends, not to artists or celebrities, not to anyone. Why my ace vibes and shield was not driving him away! I felt betrayed. 

""Er... what if we have some dates first?"" I answered finally. 

Sunday afternoon came. I was pretty nervous and a little lost. Ok, I was very lost. [So much that I actually opened a threat in r/relationships looking for advice](https://www.reddit.com/r/relationships/comments/97ccxd/i_26f_have_never_had_a_boyfriend_in_fact_i_think). My biggest concern was doing something unfair to him. Wouldn't be the first time I lead on a suitor that never had a chance for no fault of his own. Simply said, I did not need a relationship and... could a relationship even work without attraction? 

While the answer to his feelings seemed clear, there was another thing that was bugging me. Rationally speaking, we were a great match. We share a similar sense of humor and love for knowledge. Our first time eating alone was great. We spoke about our own visions on life. I think there is no after life and no one is looking after us above. This is a relief and a big responsability; we only have one chance to be happy and we have to make sure to not ruin other people's one chance to be too. He agreed and we were late for work that day. That became common in our outings. 

So there I was, trying to see if this was another chance to be happier, while trying to not make the outcome miserable to him. Morally speaking I didn't know what to do. I was still not attracted to him but I saw this as an opportunity to a new experience. The only problem was I didn't want to hurt him because of my selfishness, hoping this will not be a waste of time for both of us. 

You can read more of my process and how we ended together [here](https://www.reddit.com/r/asexuality/comments/9bek8i/a_coworker_likes_me_and_wants_to_start_a). Summarizing, I was honest with him. I told him that my answer to his affections was a maybe, later no, then maybe and finally do you want to be my boyfriend? It was a little convulsed and I think I failed in making it not miserable to him and me, but it was necessary. You can read more about this roller-coaster [here.](https://www.reddit.com/r/relationships/comments/97ccxd/z/e6j124k)

Last Monday we had our first month officially together, even if we had been dating since before. We both are affectionate people and love to cuddle. I think everything has been pretty smooth. 

***
""You remind me of Sor Juana,"" he said me one day. 

Sor Juana Inés de la Cruz was a badass poet who lived in Nueva España in the 17th century. Once she dressed as a man so she could go to University, but that failed. Later she became a nun so she could dedicate her life to studying instead of marriage. Her poems are incisive, witty and graceful. She never showed interest towards men, so many people think she was a lesbian. She never had a female partner and her writing shows a deep love and despair to knowledge. For me to be compared to her is an undeserving hella compliment. 

That was not the first time he compared me to a badass female ace figure. 

***
""So, have you kissed anyone before?"" He asked before we were together. 

Yes, I had. I wasn't attracted to the guy but still did. I was not impressed. Since that day I decided I was not going to make a move without any attraction first. That was 9 years ago. 

""Now that I am your boyfriend, do you want to kiss?"" 

No. ^(What if I don't feel anything?) 

""Don't worry, if you don't want it's ok. It doesn't have to be now."" 

It was actually a week later, in the amusement park, when I told him he could kiss me whenever he wanted. He did. He kissed me in the corner of my mouth, my nose, my cheeks, before going to my lips. 

It wasn't the most amazing feeling ever, but it wasn't that bad either. I took it as a good signal. Now we kiss a lot, all the time, and I use it more as a way to show him affection than to derive pleasure. Between us, however, I am starting to enjoy it a lot too. 

***
My username tells something important about me. First, I am most of the time happy, my relationship status does not play a factor in this. 

Second, I had made the Myers-Briggs type indicator test at least once online and I resulted as an INTP. Since the description seemed accurate in a lot of stuff, I use it as a good description of myself. 

With curiosity, I asked him to make the test too. 

""ESTJ. But I don't think I agree 100% with it.""

Huh, interesting. 

According to many web pages, which are absolutely always trustworthy, an INTP and an ESTJ are a good match in the sense that they complement nicely. According to personal accounts on the same online forums, INTPs rarely get along with this overly ordering, square, authoritative personality. 

What it's true is that he has the organization, practicality and down to earth sense that I lack, while he loves my spirit of adventure and unconventional answers and choices. 

***
""So, what is your favorite sin?"" he asked me in his birthday meal celebration at work. 

""Pride —no wait! Sloth!"" 

""What kind of question is that?"" asked then a coworker across the table. Only five people know about us and she was not one of them. 

We didn't answer and better kept eating. He later reproached me why I didn't ask his. I didn't need to. I knew it was lust.

***
There are different kinds of ace people. There are some that are repulsed by sex and there are others that only roll their eyes and continue with their day. I am the last type. 

Three weeks ago he spent the night in my apartment. It was late and he usually goes to bed early, just like me. I, however, didn't know if it was a good idea for him to stay because my aunt was visiting and I live with my younger cousins (both adults but still they will always be my little cousins). Nevertheless we slept in my bed with our day clothes on. In the morning there was some slight touching and lots of kisses. I was pretty comfortable with the situation. In fact I was happy. 

Last weekend he stayed again. We cuddled and had a nice dinner with cheese, bread and wine. At bed time I genuily asked if he was comfortable sleeping with his jeans on and he admitted no. He asked if I was comfortable with him sleeping in his underwear and sure why not. 

Uhmm, spoilers ahead? 

&gt;!We spooned in my bed and we were cozy and comfortable. At some point he slipped a hand down my crouch, something he had done before and I had already told him I was ok with. He also touched my boobs, which didn't feel like anything in particular but I guessed he was pretty happy. The touch between my legs was nice and I encouraged it. I have masturbated before, alone and to porn (Aside from some initial pleasure, it just does not make a lot for me, but hey, it's nice).!&lt;

&gt;!I ended at top, frottaging. He asked me if I wanted him to put on a condom, which was his way to asking me if I wanted to go to that direction. Sure, why not. Suddenly we didn't have any clothes on.!&lt;

&gt;!During the whole deal I mostly took the initiative. My guess was that he didn't want to do anything I may not be comfortable with, and so he let me do whatever *I* wanted.!&lt;

&gt;!It turns out virgin ace girls are not the best to direct a sexual encounter.!&lt;

&gt;!I wasn't aroused enough for a penetration, not even with lube. It was mostly touch, grinding and hugs. Not bad actually. My biggest concern was that he would not be satisfied, but he didn't complain. He actually looked happy.!&lt;

We were between sleeping and doing this.  The next day I decided to stay instead of going to the park to exercise, as I usually do on Sundays. We played domino, the Wikipedia board game and watched an episode of Adventure Time. It was a good weekend. He said he had not stopped thinking about it, and in some ways me neither.

Last Wednesday I had unexpectedly some free hours and he sacrificed his dance lessons so he could be with me. We spent some hours together and later one of my blankets on my bed had some stains of blood on it. He never stopped asking me if I was ok with every advancement and I answered honestly that so far I liked it, when it hurt I told him to stop. He never hesitated in doing so. 

Sex is still somewhat a side note for me, and so far I haven't been aroused enough for a complete act, mostly because of my lack of knowing myself enough, but I am willing to experiment, and I wouldn't do it with anyone else.",asexuality
The word is limerence,"I found a word for how I felt for years and never felt more liberated. Words are indeed powerful!

It literally means feeling strong attraction that has nothing to do with sex, for those who don’t already know that. I struggled between aromantic and asexual for a long, long time. Clearly I am asexual because I do enjoy the attraction, just not the sex. 

Mind you, I was very sexually active 12 years ago. Then I hit a point where I realized I liked every part of my relationships except the sex! Nsfw: I masturbate to relieve stress but sex with others actually stresses me out. It could be trauma related tbh.

Whatever the case, I am proudly asexual and enjoy experiencing limerence. 


I would love to hear your thoughts! 


",asexuality
Ace RPG dice,Don't know if there are many tabletop gamers in this group but there is a kickstarter with ace flag dice. Thought they were cool!  https://www.kickstarter.com/projects/862080446/pride-flag-polyhedral-dice-for-tabletop-roleplayin/description,asexuality
Am I still AroAce if I've had crushes in the past?,"They weren't like romantic crushes, as I've always imagined them in purely platonic situations and nothing more (it was hard to imagine them in sexual scenarios, kissing, hugging, etc. or as my potential boyfriend/girlfriend and didn't realize who I was like last year), but I wonder if it still makes me AroAce?

(Also, I've liked people platonically and often times I find myself liking someone because of aesthetic reasons, but if a ""crush"" ever asked me out I'd be uncomfortable and would immediately decline their offer)",asexuality
Last day of asexuality awareness week. See you next year folks,But still I think it kind of sucks that few really know of asexuality which really sucks. I didn't even know it was asexuality awareness week until a day before it happened,asexuality
What is this called?,"So I don't really experience any (or little) romantic and/or sexual attraction. I can live without ever dating/marrying someone in my life. I don't see that as something important in life.

I always find myself not thinking or obsessing over ""needing"" someone to date or worry that I'm growing older and not finding someone already as I used to when I was in high school (Sometimes I can't help if that's weird or if there is something wrong with me because of that), even comparing my love life to the people around me isn't something that I do. I do feel lonely at times, I'll admit, but I don't ever see a relationship filling that void of loneliness for me.

I've had crushes in the past but now I rarely even do. I don't even think I do at all anymore. It just somehow went ""poof!"" and it's hard to form a crush on someone. The only time I would ever fantasize about someone (like said crushes) would be in platonic situations, so we never kissed or had sex (Which both make me feel disgusted and nope can't work with that). I never felt the need to be in a relationship or start talking to them in order to get to that 'dating' opportunity.

I could never see anyone's butt or other body parts as ""hot"" or ""sexy"". I would only make comments with my friends to not be alienated, even though deep down I was really uncomfortable making those comments. 

I've tried dating someone once and we kissed and held hands but I just couldn't go through with it. It felt wrong (Even though I was sure that this whole ""No Sex No Relationship"" phase was over and that I finally found ""The One""). I remember just going along with it because I thought that the feeling of being disgusted would pass soon but it didn't. In theory it sounded like ""aww"" because you see it on tv and stuff (People showing affection towards one another), but in reality it just didn't make me feel like those people on tv or those who were in love around me. That sort of contact just made it weird for me even though I thought that it wouldn't.

I get very uncomfortable when someone touches me or even tries to flirt with me. I remember this one guy was flirting with me but I didn't even know that that's what it was called. I just thought he was acting a bit funny until my friend told me that he was flirting. 

I've read many AroAce stories online and they heavily resonated with me, but I still feel iffy about who I am.

However, I dated this one person and the feelings slowly faded even though I thought about dating them for awhile. As soon as we dated it just left. I don't really long for a romantic/sexual relationship, but this person and I have this on/off history together, so of course it was obvious that we wouldn't last that long.

Knowing that that happened makes me question who I am.

I've daydreamed about my crushes in a platonic way and never in any sexual or romantic scenarios, I don't really care about relationships (be it solely romantic or just a sexual one) so I don't really go out looking for one because I just cannot with the contact. I'd rather read it in books or hear about my friend's love life rather than having one of my own because I'm happy being single. I wouldn't say I'm afraid of commitment because that's not the case.

""Attractive"" people don't catch my attention. My mom will usually say ""He's hot"" or ""Wow his body is sexy"" and I usually go along with it even though in my head I'm like ""Yeah...nope. How do you even find this remotely interesting, mom?"" Like yeah, I get it they're good looking, but what's all the fuss? They're just human beings. Chill.

I'm just really confused on the whole situation and for awhile identified as AroAce because it felt like me.

I've found many people to be aesthetically pleasing and lowkey want to know a bit more about them, but only on a friendship level never anything more than that.

Both physical and sexual contact make me feel disgusted. 

My parents usually ask why I'm not dating anyone and before I graduated school, I used grades as an excuse as to why my love life was practically nonexistent. Now that I graduated, I use things like ""Well work and stuff"", even though I know they won't buy it.

I'm never envious of my friends when they date because I think it's more cute than being jealous or anything. Not cute as in ""I want that too!"" but cute because they act so lame and I love them both platonically, so seeing them happy makes me happy as well. 

I can literally die alone knowing I've never had sex or a partner and I'd be super happy.

I know that I still have years ahead of me and that I'm young, but after having days where you're able to just think about stuff, ny identity has always been something that I like to think as important. Labels in a way do help me because it reassures me and makes me less confused, as well as makes me feel like I do belong somewhere.

I know people with similar situations are often told that it's Cupioromantic or Lithoromantic, but I don't long for any type of relationship like at all (Just like friendships but that's about it) nor do I lose feelings for someone once we date because even though I broke up with that person, I realized that I loved them on a platonic level. I knew it couldn't work out because I couldn't go through with the physical contact, knowing that it'll eventually lead to sexual contact at some point.

Anyways, I hope this sorta helps on finding out what this might be. Any feedback is much appreciated! :)",asexuality
33 F asexual virgin: Any clarity on how to identify when you feel attracted to someone and is this it?,"Just found this sub wow, re-posting from the bisexual sub as I think this may fit well here.

So yesterday it dawned on me that I saw a picture of a friends friend and thought she looked super pretty and next thing I know I am searching for more of her pics online for hours and when I analysed my feelings I think it was more of a ""aww I wished my smile was like that"" and comparing my looks to hers an maybe even wanting to be her. Ordinarily I would chalk this up to usual comparing myself to others sort of thing but I recognized that I really do think she looks super pretty almost like perfect like features and I am not sure how this explain this but I find my strong reaction to her looks made me question if I was attracted to her as I never have really gawked at a person like that before. Now if you ask me would I want to date her/kiss her/be close to her then hand on heart the answer is no as I don't have the feelings but despite forgetting all about and having no interest to look through her photos today the fact that I spent ages going through another woman's social media to just gawk at her for hours makes me completely lose understanding of how to gauge whether or not this means I am attracted to her.

I am 33 and a asexual virgin and have been this way my whole life, I guess I never have come across a situation where I am gawking at someone's appearance for endless hours like yesterday despite not feeling a sexual or romantic desire for her. I also think for me I have always struggled to understand what attraction feels like. ",asexuality
Book recommendation Murderbot,,asexuality
Having doubts,"Long Post.

Hey guys, I'm having doubts again. I recently had a fight with my Mum and I was wondering the age old 'am I ace or just repressed?' 

I have an AP (asian parent) so I never got interested in relationships, because of the whole 'don't date until you're 30' and especially since the one between my parents is so fucked up (How the fuck can you get married, separated and think it's fine and dandy to live in the same house to co raise your kids in a 'normal enviroment'). I don't ever want to have to introduce someone as my datemate because I'm afraid of the ridicule and the questions and them thinking I'm not strong by myself which is stupid because being with someone doesn't make you weak.

I know there's the whole argument about 'If you were straight you'd still be into people' but what if I've shoved it back too far. I still sometimes out of nowhere think about how hot people are and how much I wanna be with them and I don't know if this is me or what I think I'm supposed to be. 

Also I'm overweight and conventionally you won't see my body type on a magazine cover is you get what I'm saying so growing up people used to think it was super funny to ask me out and laugh at me bc 'lmao you're fat and ugly no-one wants you' so there's that. 

Also what if I'm holding onto being ace because I wanna be 'special'? I know a regular person wouldn't want to be ace bc who would choose to have people literally hating them bc they don't wanna bang people?  My experiences match up with other stories here so I don't think this has any ground but I don't know. I just feel like a pretender.",asexuality
Asexual Sexual Sadist,"I think I first masturbated ever when I was, like, 8. I would usually do it to get to sleep or when I was stressed to feel good and relax, but I retroactively thought back to childhood me's masturbation fodder and I suddenly realized that all my sexual fantasies have 1) never included me in them and 2) always required some sort of violence, pain and/or torture.

I still consider myself an Asexual, but it has sort of shook me realizing this. I kinda wonder if something is wrong with me.",asexuality
I can have sex but I think I'm ace. Is it possible?,"I'm a 20y/o M. In high school I had never really understood how to get to have sex with a girl or even get her to be my girlfriend, I still haven't . I've only dated 2 girls that I was certain liked me. I rarely talked to girls at times I'd even go for weeks without having a conversation with a girl and I hated approaching girls. It was really other dudes that put the idea of a gf in my head. At the time of this post, I've been single for 2 years 9mnths. I started a computers class at a school in my locale and in my class is a super hot girl who I thought is way out of my league but she actually likes me. We started talking and she's open about sex so I told her I was a virgin. She then insisted on popping my cherry and I just cringed. She kept on insisting for a couple of weeks and I still cringed until she suggested that I was probably ace. A few weeks later I felt like I liked her and then we had sex. We've been going at it for quite a while but I can only feel like doing it after a little bit of foreplay because I don't want to objectify her which is what I realised I do and also because I want to really want to have sex with her.

**It's a bit long and has mixed ideas but the question I want to ask is that if I want to have sex but don't feel like I'll enjoy it because I don't like the person enough or like the person enough but need to be turned on does that put me on the asexual spectrum? If so where on the spectrum?**

 ",asexuality
We got representation in Dallas Texas!,,asexuality
Recently popular twitch streamer Sweet_Anita is openly demisexual,"[Sweet_Anita](https://www.twitch.tv/sweet_anita) recently became popular thanks to reddit because she has tourette's and coprolalia which results in [hilariously inappropriate clips](https://www.twitch.tv/sweet_anita/clips?range=7d).

She's really open and educational about her tourette's and has just an all around funny, kind and wholesome personality. She's mentioned a few times she's demisexual and explained what it means, to an audience of thousands of what you can imagine is your usual memey/edgelordy twitch viewers.

Apart from a few jerks trying to trigger her ticks though chat is being really nice and I find it great seeing someone so great having such exposure.",asexuality
Gene or Elliot?,Hello my fellow Ace! I've noticed that a majority of my gay friends changed their names once they discovered their true sexuality and I want to as well but I can't decide between gene or Elliot. I want to hear your guys opinions :) ,asexuality
I appeared on a podcast to talk about the ace community and my experiences!,,asexuality
Ace glasses!!,,asexuality
#AsexualAwarenessWeek Day 6: What isn't asexuality?,"#AsexualAwarenessWeek Day 6: What isn't asexuality?

Well, all week, I've talked about what asexuality is, but what about what it isn't? There are a lot of misconceptions about asexuality. People think something is wrong with asexuals or that it is a choice. Sure, there may be some people who falsely identify as asexual, either because of ignorance or to cover something else up, but there are many people who genuinely are asexual. This is what they want you to understand.

Asexuality isn't:

i) a disorder. There are three common disorders that people try to label asexuals with. They are male hypoactive sexual desire disorder, female sexual interest/arousal disorder, and sexual aversion disorder. These are all incorrect. The first two, previously combined as hypoactive sexual desire disorder, are sexual dysfunctions characterized by a lack or absence of sexual fantasies and desire for sexual activity. However, in the updated edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders (DSM-5), it states that these criteria must be marked with clinically sufficient personal distress, meaning the person lacking the desire for sexual activity must exhibit or feel a level of anxiety due to the absence. It also has a portion that states that if someone self identifies as asexual, the diagnosis of these disorders would not be made. For the third disorder, sexual aversion disorder, it was removed from the DSM, so it isn't even a valid diagnosis anymore.

ii) trauma. Yes, some asexuals have experienced trauma, but it didn't make them asexual. They were asexual before the trauma. Trauma doesn't make someone lose their sexual attraction though it can make them averse to sex, and that's something that may need to be addressed if they wish to address it.

iii) a disability. Asexuality is not a physical problem. It is not a result of something wrong in or with the body. Many asexuals will say all their equipment works just fine. Everyone, allosexual or asexual, has varying levels of libido, so some asexuals experience low to high level sex drives, and quite a few asexuals can still feel arousal and complete a sexual act. It's the lack of sexual attraction that characterizes asexuality.

iv) a hormonal issue. Often, hormonal issues result in a sudden loss of sexual desire. Many asexuals are in good health and have had their hormones checked. Many would say they never had the sexual feelings from the get-go. If a person experienced sexual desires before and then lost them for some reason, that is a medical problem, not asexuality. 

v) celibacy or abstinence. Celibacy and abstinence are choices. Abstinence is the absence of sexual intercourse while celibacy is the avoidance of all sexual activity. Asexuality isn't a choice; it is the absence of sexual attraction. People who are abstinent or celibate still have sexual attraction and feelings, but they choose to abstain from sex despite their desires. Also, quite a few asexuals still have sex, so they are definitely not abstaining.

vi) a phase. One's sexual orientation starts showing itself around 10 years old. Sure, there are some people who develop later than others, but most people know their sexuality early on. If a person isn't too young to know they are allosexual, why are they too young to know they are asexual? There are people in their middle ages and older who are asexual, and there are teenagers too. Sexuality can change due to varying factors throughout one's life, but when they say they are asexual, at that moment (and probably continuing on from that point), they are. Respect that.

vii) a fear or hatred of sex. Being asexual doesn't mean you hate sex or people who have sex nor does it have to mean you fear it. Anyone can hate or fear sex, but you will find many asexuals who do not. Some may not want sex. Some may be indifferent towards it, and some are favorable and would readily engage in sexual activity. There are also asexuals who are sex neutral or positive, and just as there are sex negative asexuals, there are also sex negative allosexuals.

viii) an excuse. It's not an excuse for one's singleness, attractiveness, virginity, etc. It's an orientation.

ix) a repression of one's true sexuality. Asexuality is a true sexuality. Sexuality is a description of one's experience of sexual attraction and the targets of it. Not experiencing sexual attraction is just as valid. Asexuals aren't closeted homosexuals or sex shaming individuals. They are asexuals.

x) the result of a bad experience. A bad relationship or a disappointing sexual encounter doesn't make someone asexual. A person may lose sexual interest for a while as they recover from the bad experience, but they do not lose their attraction, meaning they are not asexual.

xi) frigidness or inhumanity. An asexual person is as capable of love as anyone else, be it romantic or platonic. The lack of sexual attraction doesn't negate their humanity, and it doesn't give anyone the right to judge them on their standards of what makes a person human.

These are common misconceptions people harbor about asexuality or ignorant responses people have given to those who identify as asexual, so I felt it important to address this. Tomorrow is the last day of Asexual Awareness Week, so I will finish up with some difficulties asexuals have faced because of their asexuality and cool parts of the asexual culture.

TL;DR: Asexuality isn't a disorder, trauma, a disability, a hormonal issue, celibacy/abstinence, a phase, a fear/hatred of sex, an excuse, a repression of one's true sexuality, the result of a bad experience, frigidness, or inhumanity. It's an orientation. That's it.

Extended Research Resources:
Wikipedia (DSM-5): https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/DSM-5
Hypoactive Sexual Desire Disorder: https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hypoactive_sexual_desire_disorder
Sexual Aversion Disorder: http://www.minddisorders.com/Py-Z/Sexual-aversion-disorder.html
You're not asexual. You're a late bloomer: http://asexystuff.blogspot.com/2009/06/youre-not-asexual-youre-just-late.html",asexuality
How would you feel if someone broke up with you due to being asexual?,"Another thread peaked my curiosity. I'd classify myself as asexual. How would you feel if someone broke up with you due to the fact? Would you be annoyed at them, annoyed at yourself or just think oh well that's just what happens none of us are wrong?",asexuality
I’m conflicted,"Hey friends!

So I’m definitely aro/ace and on the sex-repulsed spectrum. Except I still want to have someone special and permanent in my life (almost like a boyfriend or girlfriend). But I know if I did, I would just end up having nothing to offer except being friends. But that literally defeats the purpose! Anyone else have these feelings?",asexuality
Gray-As! Demis! Allos! Please help me!,"This question has been asked quite a lot, but what does sexual attraction feel like? I'm 14 and female, and probably asexual. Only problem is that I have a crush on this girl, and I have no idea whether it's sexual attraction or a mixture of romantic and aesthetic attraction. For those of you that have experienced it, what does it feel like? If you could avoid analogies, that would be really helpful. For demis and gray-As, did you just know when you felt it for the first time? Any and all help is appreciated!",asexuality
Ace relationship help?,"

-I’m a female that is on the asexual spectrum. (Never dated, kissed, and not looking for relationships ever. Specifically graysexual. And sex indifferent) that’s not changing. It’s who I am. 

-I’ve been interested in a male beyond any level of comprehension, and in a way I think he felt the same. It was like we understood each other’s minds on a cosmic level. And he is the first and only person I wouldn’t mind, and would actually like to get closer to romantically and physically. 

-He just told me he has a girlfriend, but he said that we can meet up as “art peeps” because we both are artists. I don’t know what to do. Should I never write him? Their relationship is newish, I think. I don’t want to get involved. I just want him to be happy, even if it’s not with me. 

On one hand, I would absolutely be relieved and okay with being friends for a couple of years first. That was actually my  intent, so I have time to focus on my passions and life. 

On the other, it’s soul crushing to think that I could never connect with him fully. 

I don’t know what to do. It’s easy to say “move on” or something, but it’s.. very special, the connection. I don’t want to dismiss my asexuality and try to pursue him, but I also don’t want to say that just because I’m ace, I don’t deserve a chance at romantic happiness.

I would like to hear some advice on how to resolve this, especially from this community who won’t dismiss who I am, and also understand that all feelings on all spectrums are valid. ",asexuality
Interesting concept for an aroace flag! what do you think?,"https://aroaesflags.tumblr.com/post/178962930011/heres-an-attempt-i-made-at-creating-an-aroace
^^              ^^
Here’s the link
I personally really like the colours on this and prefer it MUCH more than stacking the aromantic and ace flags on top of each other (especially since the number of lines don’t match up when you stack them). I kinda hope that if enough awareness is raised it can become a legitimate thing in our community. The colours have meanings, and you can find them in the original post. ",asexuality
I got an ace ring today. I dont like jewelry much so wanted something subtle.,,asexuality
Cuddling is no substitute for sex,"I'm glad you guys can find happiness in something I despise but I just don't let anyone touch me so I get a little salty with the whole ""asexuals love to cuddle!!"" Nope not all of us lol",asexuality
When you try to come out to an allo person,,asexuality
Am I an oriented aroace?,"I only found out about this term a few hours ago. I’ve been identifying as aroace for nearly a year now, but I nearly made a post on here yesterday questioning that part of my identity due to some recent developments in my mind. 

I am sure plenty of asexuals/aromantics feel the same level of non-attraction to all genders, and I did too until maybe a month ago? But then, I slowly became super repulsed to the idea of a relationship with a man that was anything other than platonic, and increasingly open to the idea of a relationship with a girl. What’s more, I often thought of kissing or being in a relationship with my (girl) friends and it’s really surreal? Because I’ve never been sexually or romantically attracted to anyone, and this isn’t anything like that. I don’t plan on ever being in a relationship either, so it’s not like I’m lonely and pining. It’s super hard to explain and I’m worried that it’s coming across the wrong way, but this is the best I can do for now.  Also the online entries for oriented aroace is really small, so I thought I’d have better luck here. 

Feel free to ask any intrusive seeming questions if you are trying to get a better idea of my situation, I won’t judge you.  ",asexuality
"I have a halloween party tomorrow, I’m gonna go as an icon!",,asexuality
"After years of botched relationships, and confusion, I discovered that I'm Ace a couple months ago. To celebrate my first AAW I made a self portrait out of pixel art. Love the community and all of you beautiful people! :)",,asexuality
What if: a year of worldwide asexuality.,"*Heteromantic asexual here. With the asexual awareness week currently being celebrated, it brought me to think...*

**What would happen if the entire human population were to suddenly become asexual for an entire 365 days ?** How do you think already existing relationships will go through during that year? What about those who are already single? What about the marketing techniques? What will be different after that one year? (and so on...)

Those are a few ideas, vaguely. Feel free to add more subjects. I guess I'm suggesting an open conversation. Personally, I'm not really good on theorizing things, but I'm curious and I love hearing what y'all think about such a hypothesis.",asexuality
So I’m a little confused.,"So, I’m M15 and I can’t tell whether I’m asexual or not.
I get urges for sex, but I find the act gross and disgusting.
Just thinking of the act is enough to make me a little queasy.
On top of that, and I’m not sure if this belongs here, I don’t really have any romantic attraction to anyone.

TLDR: I get urges for sex but I find it gross. Am I asexual?",asexuality
Asexual with Sociopathic Tendencies confused**,"Hello Guys :)

I've always been very confused about my sexuality and recently stumbled across the term os asexuality and realized that it had fit me perfectly in every way :) 

(like a cozy blanket). 

But I am very confused regarding the aspect of my romantic feelings.  

I do not in any way experience sexual attraction and has never  experienced sexual attraction towards anyone.  But I have developed and liked individuals around me.  

&amp;#x200B;

Disclaimer\*\*\* I have sociopathic tendencies diagnosed by therapists due to my childhood and how it had moulded me, no I wasn't born with sociopathic tendencies, and no I'm not sociopathic.

&amp;#x200B;

The problem is, my approach towards individuals romantically has always been the fact that I would not develop a romantic connection unless they had approached first, or if my friends wanted me to date them.  As soon as someone responded in feelings, I would completely loose feelings towards the individual, but would date them because thats what people wanted me to do.

I always did what others wanted me to do, what I thought was normal for people to feel.  

I have liked people before (romantically) but I have never ever been interested in someone without one of the reasons listed above happening.

&amp;#x200B;

I don't know, but I find that slightly odd, I don't know if thats normal or not 

(just recently, I had thought that my sexuality was completely alike to those around me). 

I was wondering if anyone else experienced something that this?

&amp;#x200B;",asexuality
#AsexualAwarenessWeek Day 5: What is the gray area of asexuality?,"[\#AsexualAwarenessWeek](https://www.facebook.com/hashtag/asexualawarenessweek?source=feed_text) Day 5: What is the gray area of asexuality?

As stated before, asexuality is a spectrum, often called the ace umbrella. There are people who identify as asexual who feel absolutely no sexual attraction. However, there are those who identify on the spectrum because their instances of sexual attraction are rare enough or situationally based enough to render them unable to fully identify as allosexual beings. And since I didn't define this before, an allosexual person is a non-asexual person, so it encapsulates the other sexualities.

First off, we have demisexuality. I defined it before as the development of sexual attraction after an emotional bond has been established. It's not just waiting to know someone before having sex. A demisexual person feels absolutely no sexual atraction until they have developed that bond. That means that they don't feel sexually attracted to strangers or distant acquaitances, and the emotional bond can stem from platonic attraction, romantic attraction, etc.

How does demisexuality work? Well, some have tried to break it down into models. One such model is the primary vs. secondary sexual attraction model. This model seeks to explain allosexual, demisexual, and asexual sexual attractions and desires. The basic premises are:

i) Primary sexual attraction: sexual attraction based on readily available information like looks, scent, style, etc.

ii) Secondary sexual attraction: sexual attraction that develops over time based on the relationship and emotional bond.

iii) Primary sexual desire: desire to engage in sexual activity for purposes of personal pleasure, be it physical and/or emotional.

iv) Secondary sexual desire: desire to engage in sexual activitiy for purposes other than personal pleasure, such as for the sake of another person or for procreation.

Based on this model, demisexuals do not experience primary sexual attraction but can experience secondary sexual attraction which would then trigger the primary sexual desire. Continuing this trend, allosexuals can experience both primary and secondary sexual attractions, either or both triggering the primary sexual desire. Asexuals, like others, can experience the secondary sexual desire.

This is not to bash allosexuals by saying that all they do is think about sex and are shallow as some have protested. It's merely to point out that most allosexuals have the potential to be sexually attracted to people they don't know that well, but just like any sexuality, it can vary depending on the person. Demisexuals and some of the asexual spectrum can't experience this primary attraction.

If you got that, it''s time to move onto gray-sexuality which I should have probably made it its own post since there are many nuances, but the gist is that with gray-sexuality, sexual attraction is felt rarely or only under certain circumstances. There are what many consider a few general subcategories under gray-sexuality that encompass most who identify as such, but the circumstances that trigger sexual attraction can often depend on the individual.

Some people who identify as gray-ace have felt sexual attraction so few times in their life while others felt it vaguely, but the attraction wasn't strong enough to bother acting on.

Some gray-aces feel sexual attraction, but once the attraction is reciprocated, the attraction fades. This is called lithosexuality or akiosexuality. Some would say they didn't want the feelings reciprocated. Others wish their attraction didn't fade because of it.

Some gray-aces only feel sexual attraction once someone is already attracted to them. This is reciprosexuality. The reciprosexual cannot feel the attraction first.

Some gray-aces' sexual attractions fade over time as they get to know the person. This is called fraysexuality, and many consider it the opposite of demisexuality since the attraction goes away as the emotional bond is formed.

Another subcategory of gray-sexuality is quoisexual or WTFsexual. It's when a person genuinely cannot distinguish sexual attraction from other attractions like romantic, aesthetic, platonic, etc. attractions. It may also mean they are unsure if what they are feeling is sexual attraction or can't conceptualize what sexual attraction is or feels like.

There are more, but I cannot possibly get into all of them in this singular post. If you are curious, I always offer extended research resources.

One last point though. Some people choose to identify by these specific ace identities, but others choose to just go by gray-sexual or asexual because sometimes, it's a bit much to explain. Not everyone will get it, and these gray-aces are either comfortable with someone just getting the basics or are too busy to have their brains picked.

Well, that's it for today. Tomorrow, I intend to delve into what asexuality isn't, so stay tuned and have an ace day!

TL;DR: Demisexuality is when a person cannot experience sexual attraction until they have formed an emotional bond. Gray-sexuality is when a person experiences sexual attraction rarely or only under specific circumstances. Gray-sexuality encompasses a few subcategories that specify some of the more specific circumstances that a gray-sexual may experience sexual attraction.

Extended Research Resources:  
AVENwiki (Demisexual): [http://wiki.asexuality.org/Demisexual](https://l.facebook.com/l.php?u=http%3A%2F%2Fwiki.asexuality.org%2FDemisexual%3Ffbclid%3DIwAR3vZShTNER3YG5ew1ZiPQxuGLqMS8ux_ZFNWy09VQzP1zCMZJTF6DsQ8lE&amp;h=AT1HqnUj8HWvjgj57_7Fbx5ElnzvZAUGaIygZ_KRex5_AOu9JDug1npOScDDUo5MKxdaoU8oIhNnwoalOx2Tbgea8fG1so6QJi7hfSI7gkES6rVfzg-eYRxr3vAAZTJ3NG5feEZWTlxsOMCpTqVsEycK)  
AVENwiki (Primary vs Secondary Sexual Attraction Model):[http://wiki.asexuality.org/Primary\_vs.\_secondary\_sexual\_att…](http://wiki.asexuality.org/Primary_vs._secondary_sexual_attraction_model?fbclid=IwAR0LAj6uHKJZ3ae6BcwrHAp5VfsF4W7GPNtHkwO6oksNOGnfZK9RokvoBDo)  
AVEN (Sexualities Master List): [https://www.asexuality.org/…/123256-asexuality-sexual-ori…/…](https://www.asexuality.org/en/topic/123256-asexuality-sexual-orientation-lexicon-read-me/?tab=comments&amp;fbclid=IwAR2AS1gdvTcMDPdxO_yV6MB20CSPUwzL1ygvX81tZjFAdC4C4FMRFFAxuT0#comment-1061345333)",asexuality
"21, generally confused about my sexuality","Personally, the idea of sex repulses me and I would try to avoid any situation where that might happen. First time I had sex, it wasn’t up to my expectation of what sex would be like and I was left to wonder why was it so glorified like it was the best thing in the world. 

I’ve had 1 consistent (now ex) partner than I’ve had sexual relations with since the first time and I can honestly say he feels more sexual attraction towards me than I do of him but that has never stopped me from having sex with him. Despite the consent I’ve given him, I would always end up questioning myself mid-act why did I let myself get into a sexual situation when I generally do not like sex. I guess the expectations and the generally idea of the people around me that sex is natural and normal and that people have desires to fulfil just got to my head, making me think that it should be something that I want and desire as well, albeit now I realise that isn’t the case. 

Important note to look at would be that at the peak of our relationship I had a growing sexual attraction towards him and I realised I may fall in line with demisexuality instead but that died shortly after and now that I’m single and hoping to find love, the one thing that is keeping me away from finding love is the idea of having a sexual relationship with my potential future partner. I don’t know if the sexual attraction will occur once a bond is made and I’m worried that it wouldn’t even after the bond. (I am aware that I should find someone who respects my choices and opinions especially regarding my body and what I do with it, but people have needs and desires too and I don’t wanna restrict them from it). 

Sex to me is just mainly for procreation, and I do want to have children of my own one day but I don’t know if my opinions on sex will be different when I get to that stage of my life. For now it’s just that sex (and sexual attractions) really isn’t doing it for me and it doesn’t seem to be it rn and in my foreseeable future and I would like to know if that make an ace? ",asexuality
Questioning if I'm Ace,"So basically I've never been sexually attracted to a real person. (I have been to fictional characters.) I can imagine maybe being sexually attracted to someone in the future, but as far as i know person doesn't exist. But now that I'm starting to realize I'm probably ace, it's kind of messing with my self image. I used to be an exclusionist and I think that's part of the reason this realization is screwing with me so hard. I used to have a lot of preconceived ideas about what it said about someone who labeled themselves as ace, and i guess they're still kind of stuck in my head and making it hard for me to view this objectively. One of my questions is, can I still be ace if I'm sometimes attracted to fictional characters?

&amp;#x200B;

(I'm sorry if I'm doing anything wrong I'm very new to reddit)",asexuality
Feeling a bit like a freak....,"Okay so the gist of this is that I've known I was ace for a long time but always thought I was also romantic... however as I'm getting older I'm noticing more umm issues? For one thing kissing makes me feel literally sick to my stomach. I'm grossed out by PDA, but I was always like that... but the kissing thing is kinda new. Or well... I didn't really notice it. It's not just romantic kisses (I haven't been kissed like that in years!) but kisses on the cheek from well meaning family make me feel pain in my stomach... I don't know why but it really really bothers me. Is this something anyone else experiences? ",asexuality
"Wore an ace flag to school today for ace awareness week, and for me finally realizing that I am ace (aegosexual)",,asexuality
What’s wrong with me?,"•that’s hot •oh I’d fuck that person •that’s totally my fetish •has an ongoing bucket list •masturbates •enjoys porn •all the normal things of a sexually active person

“Hey wanna have sex?”

N O T  E V E N  A  L I T T L E  B I T  PLEASEKEEPYOURDICKLIKEFIFTYFEETAWAYFROMMENOTHANKYOUBYE. 


I can make sex jokes all day long. I can find things sexually interesting. I have my own fetishes that I have no desire to carry out because at the end of the day I don’t want someone inside me. Not even a little bit. It does absolutely NOTHING for me. Masturbation is fine I can achieve clitoral orgasm but once we do the diddly you lose me. I’m not interested. And it doesn’t feel like the worlds greatest pleasure in fact it feels no different then hugging me you’re just touching me. It’s not stimulating I’m not getting off I’m not feeling the pleasures I feel when masturbating I just feel your body parts touching the inside of mine and that’s not amazing. 

What’s wrong with me... why don’t I physically like sex? Why doesn’t it feel like what everyone describes it to? Am I asexual? Am I just broken? I hate this.. ",asexuality
"I am 16, don't like sex at all but I like masturbating.","I am a 16-year-old boy and I do not feel any desire to have sex with anyone, but I masturbate very often. And by often I mean ca. three times a day.

I have no idea why it is like that. I am not afraid of sex, but it simply disgusts me. I just don't feel aroused by anything that has to do with sex.

And that wouldn't be so bad, if only I also didn't like masturbating.

But I actually have some kind of weird theory: There are two desires, a biological one and a mental one. My biological part wants to have sex (or at least have an orgasm), but my brain doesn't, leaving only masturbation as a way to have an orgasm.

And orgasms actually feel good to me, but I could never imagine having sex with anyone, no matter how much I love that person.

I also get erections when I see or think of a beautiful girl, but I don't think about sex at all while having an erection. 

I also do not feel aroused by large breasts or a large ass at all. These two things simply do not interest me. I always look at the entire body and more importantly, at the girl's personality. I'd rather have a not-so-beautiful but incredibly kind girlfriend instead of having a good-looking but b*tchy girlfriend.

I have actually already tried a porn site (I know it's illegal below the age of 18, but nobody cares anymore, apparently) and I wasn't aroused, but disgusted. Just **blergh**.

I also **strongly** dislike prostitution. I already don't like sex, but selling it is even worse in my eyes. I also can't stand dating someone just to have sex with them once and then never meet them again.

Look, I know I'm young and inexperinced and so on, but sex is supposed to be an act of love (for those who like it) and not something you can just sell and do with everyone you like! And if you want to have sex, don't go to dating sites where you look for someone to have sex with once and then just forget them again. In my opinion that is just treating that person like an object that can be used. People are not objects to be used!
 
 
 
Alright, but I digress. Am I actually asexual or is puberty just messing with me?",asexuality
Found the Ace!,,asexuality
Need help,"I am a 18 year old boy and I always loved girls. Always found them attractive. I masturbated a lot like any teenager but recently nothing arouses me only my own hand. I have a lot of social contacts, talked to a lot of girls. A girl recently wanted to have sexual intercourse with me but I couldn't do it. I didn't find anything attractive and it's not like she was ugly. I am not into guys either... I don't know what to do... Could use some advice right now...",asexuality
We *must* support the Trans community.,"(((this isn't going to be my most articulate writing as I'm currently exhausted)))

For those who don't know, the current administration in the US has released a memo detailing plans to limit a person's gender to what is printed on their birth certificate. I don't have a link atm but it shouldn't be hard to find if you Google ""Trump trans memo.""

Many Trans folks are hurt and scared right now and need people to have their backs.

I know we experience a fair amount of exclusionists and gatekeepers within LGBT+ but honestly those concerns should take a back seat to this one for now.

I for one plan on supporting my Trans friends and strangers alike, regardless of if there's nothing in it for me. If at the end of it all we're still pushed out by some, so be it - at least we'll have stood for what's right!

Be both Asexual and a staunch Ally!

❤️💙✊💙❤️

♠👻🗯️💜

*Edit* - I see this is getting some r/all activity and being disregarded and scoffed at by some (to be expected).

But thanks to an exchange waaay down the comment thread I realize some context may be missing for those outside of the Asexual community. 

The following is my reply to a commenter that may provide some context:

""welcome!

There's some important LGBT+ group Dynamics/culture/recent history at play here that factors into the strength of wording in that title that you may be missing out on.

In terms of readily available information and general understanding Asexuals like myself are pretty new. By that I mean we've always existed - just haven't had the language to communicate our experience adequately in the sphere of public discourse. So at this point in history we're trying to fight for visibility, just like ""hey, we exist and we're not broken, aliens, or single-celled organisms."" As part of that effort we're trying to be included/recognized in LGBT+ circles.

But there are segments of LGBT+ that try to exclude us - telling us we have it easy, don't face discrimination, are a drain on resources (as if we can't bring our own to the table), etc. So right now there's some tension between some Asexuals and some within the greater LGBT+ community and many Asexuals have given up and even turned sour against LGBT.

My call of ""must support"" is directly specifically to Asexuals who may be feeling disinterest, apathy, or jadedness in regards to these potentially damaging proposals the current administration is considering leveraging against Transgender Americans. And even then it's not literally a command as much as an attempt at a rallying call.

.

That said, I and many others would appreciate any support you'd be able to muster for the Trans community. Even just kind words go a long way.

You don't have to - obviously - but it would do good for a lot of people to hear.""

*End Edit.*",asexuality
"I think I'm going to have to disagree, research people.",,asexuality
"DAE have that voice in your head that tells you “your just faking it for attention”, or “what if you’re wrong and you’ll look back at this and feel embarrassed”?","I’m trying to come to terms with who I am right now. I feel like I’m probably ace, but I’m really just not sure. I find that my brain constantly goes  “you just want to feel special” and then when I try to imagine myself in sexual situations I just think “why are you trying to force yourself to be allo‽” it’s so annoying. Not even that critical voices in my head knows what to think about it.",asexuality
Anyone ekse like the idea of being sexual more than being actively sexual?,"I guess the best way to phrase it is does anyone like to have fantasies + do things w/ themselves instead of participating in sexual acts with others? 
I guess for me it's like fantasies &amp; stuff are better bc you don't have to deal with the smells, sounds, other person? 
IDK if that makes sense. Some days I'm completely grossed out by the idea of sex &amp; other times I'm like ""eh maybe in the future w/ my bf it won't be so bad"" but then im totally fine reading or thinking about it?
Ah idk if that makes sense. Just wanted to rant &amp; get others views? ",asexuality
Representing on Slither.io,,asexuality
"I'm asexual and a victim of childhood sexual abuse. After being so afraid of opening up about it, I wrote a song about my experiences and am finally sharing it publically for the first time.",,asexuality
Ace emoji??,"So, I was thinking for Asexual Awareness Week, I'd add some emoji to my social media profiles to indicate I'm ace. I know there's no ace flag, but I can't even find enough emoji in the right colors to create a makeshift flag with four different ones.

Does anyone have anything they use to show their pride on their socials? A cake emoji seems obtuse, especially since I'm not really into cake.",asexuality
What to do about frayromanticism?,"Okay, I'm not sure which community to talk about this with, but I think I'm frayromantic. I have had many relationships and they all end about a month in because I lose feelings not long after they reciprocate.

I see a lot of stuff about ""🌺🌺Frayromantic positivity!🌺🌺"" but here's the thing: I LOATHE being like this. I'm a huge hopeless romantic-- like, my biggest dream is to eventually get married to someone who at least respects my asexuality, if not relates to it. But this just keeps happening and I'm terrified of dating. I've hurt so many people and I'm terrified of dating because I don't want to continue to hurt people. I'm miserable and don't know what to do about it. Does anyone know if there's a way to make this better? Therapy or anything?",asexuality
Am I asexual or I just haven't fallen in real love yet?,"So I'm 14 years old. It's really easy for me to be romantically interested in a person, but I don't think I've ever felt something as sexual desire to a real person I know. I am on NoFap, but I definitely enjoyed watching porn. I've found out that porn isn't really interesting if I can't see facial expressions. Am I ACE or just not mature yet? ",asexuality
"There's an interesting/visibility article on the BBC website, raising awareness about us!",,asexuality
This might be a silly question,"But do asexuals mostly date other aces?

I’m 18 and ace, but I’ve never dated, so I’m not sure how it works.",asexuality
"Moses Sumney's album, ""Aromantisicm""",,asexuality
I made ace bracelets!!!,,asexuality
#AsexualAwarenessWeek Day 4: Other attractions? QPRs? What?," \#AsexualAwarenessWeek Day 4: Other attractions? QPRs? What?

I have already spoken about two types of attractions and glossed over a third, but I should delve into what an attraction is. Outside of particles of matter, attraction basically is the interest in something or someone. Sexual attraction is a sexual interest while romantic attraction is a romantic interest (which is subjectively determined by the people involved).

i) Platonic attraction, which I briefly mentioned near the end of the last post, is the (sometimes strong) want to begin a friendship with someone.

ii) Aesthetic attraction is the interest in or appreciation of someone's features, physical appearance, and/or style.

iii) Sensual attraction is the interest in acts or the appreciation of things that entice the senses, like someone's shape, the way they move, how they smell, the sound of their voice, etc.

iv) Some people would also include emotional attraction as a separate attraction though it overlaps or is often included in some of the other attractions. It is the want for a (strong) emotional bond with another person.

Often, people experience multiple attractions at the same time, i.e. romantic and sexual, platonic and aesthetic, sensual and sexual, etc., and some can be confused for others if one doesn't know how to differentiate between them. Often, aesthetic attraction is confused for romantic and/or sexual, and platonic is confused for romantic where someone believes they have a crush on another person when they really just want to know the person. That is called a squish by the way.

When it comes to attractions and relationships, most people know of sexual, romantic, and platonic ones. However, there is another type of relationship that is slowly growing more well known: the queerplatonic (or quasiplatonic) relationship. Popular among aromantics but not limited to them, it's a non-romantic relationship that still has a great amount of affection, commitment, support, and trust. It's not lesser than a romantic relationship, and some people say it's more than a friendship (which should already be a pretty important relationship).

Some people are exclusive within their QPRs. Some are life partners. Some get married, raise kids, file taxes, or live together. Some look for nothing else outside the relationship, and most are perfectly content.

They are not just friends or roommates, and they shouldn't be told not to get too attached lest they miss out on a romantic relationship. To those in QPRs, this type of relationship could be their primary with all else coming afterwards. Their partners come first when it matters, and they are happy.

Tomorrow, I will delve into the gray area of asexuality, giving some more attention to gray-asexuality, demisexuality, and parts of the rest of the aces spectrum. Stay tuned.

TL;DR: There are other types of attractions besides sexual and romantic. There are platonic, aesthetic, sensual, and emotional attractions. A queerplatonic/quasiplatonic relationship is a committed, non-romantic relationship.

Extended Research Resources:

AVENwiki (Attraction): r/http://wiki.asexuality.org/Attraction

Asexual Education (Attraction and Vocabulary): r/http://asexualeducation.tumblr.com/attraction

AVENwiki (Queerplatonic): r/http://wiki.asexuality.org/Queerplatonic",asexuality
Am i selfish for asking my partner to remain monogamous?,"I'm pretty sure I'm ace, I've been bouncing the idea around a lot lately. My boyfriend is really frustrated though, because he has a really high sex drive. He said he wants an open relationship because its unfair to ask me to be sexually active and unfair to ask him not to be, which i think makes a lot of sense. I can't expect to ask him to not want sex if i also actively know what it is like to be asked to want sex you know? But I'm like really concerned about how that would go, from jealousy to other insecurities. He knows that i have no sex drive at all but i haven't really told him I'm ace but i guess thats pretty obvious either way. We've been together for 3 years in january. We're also both trans, im mtf and he is ftm. Thoughts?",asexuality
My friend made this cute Ace Pusheen design for me!,,asexuality
So I made a meme,,asexuality
a wild ace(s) appeared in Riverdale! It's not like there's ever gonna be an ace aro person on the show...*grumble grumble*,,asexuality
So I don't know if I'm ace.,"To start, I'm a 19yo female. I'm also a virgin. I only had a relationship for about two weeks and I broke up with him because I felt overwhelmed. I only experience sexual attraction rarely. I like guys, but looks alone won't get me to do it with them. As said before, I have no true sexual experience, so I don't know if I'm being ignorant or if I'm truly ace. I think I might be a gray ace from what I read on this subreddit, but I'm not really sure. What do you guys think?",asexuality
Had a pleasant surprise when opening a new box of tissues! I guess this color scheme is catching on,,asexuality
My sister made me some Ace socks!,,asexuality
“An invisible man can rule the world!”,,asexuality
"Questioning, need help finding the answers.","20/F here, known all my life I'm more attracted to girls, am now branching out to see if it's a possibility I'm a lesbian. But my attraction to people has always kinda been the same as like, art? Which is why I feel like I'm more attracted to girls, they dress up nice, smell good, turn themselves into pieces of art with make up and styles etc and it's beautiful, but not really... exciting?

I've had experience with both sexes, girls mainly in my first two years of high school so it's been a while so I'm willing to try again, I guess? Broke up with my boyfriend because we were never having sex at my request and I knew it wasn't fair to him, told him I needed to explore my sexuality and he understood and we're still good friends (10/10 good dude.)

I've questioned whether I'm asexual for a while, sex just feels like a chore and like it's not worth it at all, when I talk to my gal friends about it they're convinced I've just never had good sex which isn't too far from the truth. I'm a pretty modest person in general, but I wish I wouldn't be sometimes, but I guess it's just my weird morals? I don't know. I still like getting off, I just hate having to deal with other people in the mix as far as I can tell, all the effort and time spend rolling around naked and sweaty with someone just doesn't feel worth it ever.

So I guess my main question is can you be ace and still enjoy getting off on your own? Should I just keep trying or just accept the fact that I'm ace? (Which I'm totally fine with.) I'm just confused. Help. ",asexuality
Got my ace ring last night!! I found it at a thrift store and thought it was perfect! I’m so excited to wear it to school today!!!!!!,,asexuality
So many people having their birthdays on th asexual awareness week,I guess you could say that you guys were born for it! I'm sorry,asexuality
"So, this guy was standing in front of me on the escalator today wearing ace colored camo pants! I don’t really think it was an ace thing, though I could be wrong, but pretty cool either way. (Especially during AAW)",,asexuality
Aces are vampires and sexual attraction is hunger,"I had this thought that is stuck in my head so you all got to deal with it now.

Overall, in most of their representations, vampires don't need food.

But in some sources vampires can still enjoy it, its taste and texture. They still never feel hungry though.

In different sources vampires can eat, but they either don't feel taste or can't enjoy it. That's okay because they never feel hungry.

And in other sources food tastes disgusting to them and they avoid eating if possible. Good thing they are never hungry.

In conclusion, I love weird analogies.",asexuality
Representation,"So today in class, we are doing presentations and a group did theirs on Asexuality. I can’t tell you how good it felt to see my orientation on a projector screen. I finally felt like I was getting some recognition. I even came out to one of my colleagues. Today has been a good day with feeling valid and heard. ",asexuality
My ace inspired outfit #1 for asexual awareness week!,,asexuality
I just joined a few hours ago. HOW?!?,,asexuality
What the hell happened to our relationship and how much choice do we have in sexuality?,"Newer ace bro here, sorry for the long post, haven't like talking about stuff like this online before, but I need to let it out. So my original ace best friend for 7 years, then ace girlfriend, now neither (long story) turned out to be erm... not who I originally thought or loved.

Thing was, our breakup was one of the most confusing things I have ever experienced. As a backstory, she had helped me figure out I was actually ace, I just never really payed attention to things like this. She told me she was a hetero-romantic sex-repulsed ace and talked me about all the other kinds of aces out there. Since I had clearly liked affection and never thought about the possibility of sex and never wanted to, I figured I was the same, and still am, and it was comforting to know that I had made the right choice to ask her out.

Fast forward a couple months later (a few months ago from now), and one night at like 2 AM after a long work day, I am half brain-dead talking to her and half playing MW2. I ask if we can get together to play some vidya/watch some anime or some shit, then I half jokingly said we could cuddle a little as I could really use some affection to make me feel better about work (another long story). Now keep in mind, I told her at the beginning of our relationship I want to talk about serious things in person and not over a flippin screen, but she just deadpan says she doesn't like my affection. So while I'm struggling to process what I just heard, she tells me she is now aromantic and doesn't want to hug, cuddle, or kiss anymore.

So naturally, tired me freaks out, and I guess justifiably so since the last 8 months of our relationship seemed super questionable since she never told me to slow down or stop my affection towards her, even when I had asked multiple times. But she says something along the lines of still being to love me in other ways. I am still freaked out, but manage to go to bed after that. Now the real kicker, the next morning, instead of meeting up, slowing down, explaining the aro thing to me since I didn't really understand it, and then asking if I wanted to continue the relationship (I would have), she just goes ahead and breaks up with me over freaking discord of all ways (I found this super insulting for the previous reason). She claims she still wanted to be friends, but I was skeptical and drowning in tears so I said sure and just got off.

Now afterwards, there was a lot of messy shit as she pretty much didn't bother to say anything meaningful to me in weeks, I didn't even get comfort from her or even a thanks for the money, time, and emotional effort I put into our relationship. After the last week of silence from her, I finally snapped from that and other life troubles and pretty much melted down over text and told her to go away, I know I said some other regretful shit but I don't really remember what I said since I deleted the texts after my... episode. I was silent for a couple months since I was pretty depressed at this point. When I finally apologized for snapping and saying whatever I did, and asked her if she really wanted to try and be friends again, she didn't even want to be friends anymore.

She had previously scolded me when I asked if sexuality, or parts of it, can be a choice, yet she was able to flip like that, which is what really freaked me out... And then claiming to still love me, then the next morning, breaking up with me and saying she doesn't love me at all? I still cannot explain it, and she didn't offer an explanation later. Keep in mind we were friends for 7 years, and this was a first relationship for both of us, but everything was going fine for 8 months before that night. I had no idea that she was gonna do that.

So my main question is, how much choice do we really have with sexuality and being ace? I never chose to be ace, its always been part of me but I never knew what to name it before, but I was wondering if people do change like that. And has anyone else had a similar experience? Everything just happened so fast. I have somewhat gotten over it and typing this out helped, but it still hurts a little deep in me since she was my best friend for years... I am not well versed with this kind of stuff, and was never exposed to it until she started showing and explaining it to me.

Thanks all.",asexuality
Asexual Boyfriend,"Hi! 

So this is a throwaway account (just because my SO isn’t out to anybody and my normal account has my name and I don’t want anybody to connect the dots) but I was looking for a little advice?

Background: my SO &amp; I have been together for a year. We moved VERY quickly &amp; already live together. I’m a bisexual female &amp; have been very open / honest about this from the get-go. I’d consider myself an active member of the LGBT community &amp; I had prior knowledge about asexuality before meeting my SO (I’m pretty sure I explained what it was to him? Irrelevant but this isn’t a new concept to me.)

One issue in our relationship has ALWAYS been sex. I’m not very self confident &amp; after being in an abusive relationship &amp; being sexually assaulted at 16, I’m very insecure about sex. My SO struggled with getting hard at times (which led to separate issues) and didn’t always seem very engaged in sex. He rarely, if ever, “stuck it on me” so to speak and constantly feeling like I was initiating sex was getting me down. I thought he wasn’t attracted to me, etc. 

Last night, I attempted to initiate something &amp; he kind of ignored me. (Now obviously I don’t have a problem with him saying no or anything but he just ignored me. It kind of hurt) so I brought it up to him, asking him why. This is when he tells me he thinks he’s asexual (I say thinks because he seems unsure himself, I definitely don’t mean any disrespect) 

This sparked a conversation about his romantic attraction and then it was late so we went to bed. He also said that he would understand if I left him, because I wouldn’t be ~satisfied~ or whatever and I told him to not be silly. 

I wanted to know how can I support him? How can I be respectful of him? I enjoy sex, it’s something that I worked hard to get myself comfortable with and I don’t want to deplete that by never having sex. I still love him &amp; want to be with him but does it ever work out between people who are asexual and aren’t? I don’t want to end up resenting him because we never have sex. I know he can’t change it and I don’t want him to. I just want to be respectful &amp; support him but I’m not sure where to start. 

Any success stories with relationships? 
(Also, it’s a long way off because I want to finish education first, but I do want kids someday. Is that plausible? I don’t want to force him into anything. I’m just so lost I don’t even know where to begin. Any advice is totally appreciated, thank you!)  ",asexuality
Take the 2018 Ace Community Survey!,,asexuality
My sister is also ace!,"Hi all! So today I went out for dinner with my sister (19yo) and at one point I asked her if there was anything romantic or if she liked anyone, because I had the intuition for a long time. She said that she wasn't interested in anyone, and she had never had anything romantic or sexual. 

Well I guess the title is technically not true because when I asked if she was ace, she said she didn't want to put a label on herself to not miss out oportunities, but she sounds pretty asexual to me. I've also never seen her interested in guys, she has some girl friends but I think they're just friends and when I suggested otherwise she looked kinda weird out so I think she hadn't even considered it. 

Nothing else just wanted to share it, I think it's really cool that me and my sis are both ace and I don't feel so alone in the world :)",asexuality
Would appreciate hearing how others have dealt with different self-identifications.,"Hey pals. I apologize if you're just overrun with this type of question, but I've been having some Doubt about my asexuality lately, and I was just hoping some people could weigh in with their experiences and insight on discovering which, if any, labels best pertain to you.

So I'm not super worried about categorizing myself in general, so if I never land on a name it's not going to shake my identity or anything. For the past few years I've identified as asexual, which I suppose still fits, but I'm not sure if it's a particularly useful label for me to describe my experiences and feelings.

In high school I called myself straight, since I'm a woman and I didn't particularly want to have sex with other women. I didn't really want to have sex with men either, but straight is the ""default"" and I hadn't really put that much thought into compulsory heterosexuality or anything at that point. I generally said I was abstinent if anyone asked, but I still kind of dreaded the idea of having sex if I did ever get married. Then around the time I started college I discovered that asexuality is a thing and it felt like a huge relief. I had gotten crushes on guys in the past, but sex never played into the mental fantasies I had about the objects of my affection. When I removed sex from my mental image of romantic attraction I realized I did also like women, so all of my friends know me as biromantic asexual. 

Lately, however, since I've had a few years to digest my relationship to sex and sexuality, I'm not as afraid of the idea of sex as I once was. I don't really date much for no particular reason and sex is not a particular goal of mine, but it seems like something that would be fun with a partner of any gender. In that respect sex to me is totally divorced from romantic attraction, more like an interesting thing I'd like to do with someone, like skiing or macrame. I wouldn't be as flummoxed if that was it, but I've also had a couple of moments seeing attractive women where I would involuntarily have a sexual thought. 

It's nothing super dark or dirty and probably totally par for the course for most allosexuals, but for someone whose sexual thoughts are almost always intentional/forced and totally unrelated to physical appearance it just sort of threw me for a loop. The first time I experienced what I would consider sexual attraction was seeing Haley Atwell on that show Conviction that got cancelled, where she was wearing a red dress to some formal function. Since then, over the past one or two years, it's only happened with a handful of women in real life and on tinder.

I guess if I were going to go into really detailed labeling I would probably be biromantic demisexual? Or maybe a demisexual lesbian? I still like men in a romantic fashion, but I don't remember ever having that same sexual attraction. Is that just societally enforced heteronormativity, and maybe I don't actually like men at all? Could I actually be a lesbian and suppressing it subconsciously? At this point what is even the value of going into such specific labeling? Since I'm more open to sexual relationships now, if I tell people I'm bisexual or gay wouldn't that achieve a similar purpose as far as dating? With my friends (who are almost exclusively LGBT) I'll probably continue to identify as ace, but I think a big part of my hesitation is being tired of explaining it to new people when it doesn't really make a difference in terms of my experience with them.

 I'm certain I'm overthinking it, but I'd really like to know what kind of identity journeys other people have gone on, and if anyone has experience a similar evolving relationship with sexual attraction. Or just feel free to debate the merits of different label usages in different contexts. Thanks guys!

TL;DR I'm not sure if I'm ace or bi or gay or something else, and why/if I should bother narrowing it down to something hyper-specific.

&amp;#x200B;",asexuality
Question: Do you have a type?,"When I told my cousin about me being ace, he was adamant about finding out if I had a “type”. I  took it as what type of person do you feel romantic attraction towards typically, but the question still felt strange. Can anyone here give me some insight? Do you, yourself, have a type? Are there physical or mental qualities that you find attractive that form that type for you?",asexuality
A few questions!,,asexuality
"When I Realized I Was Asexual, Things Got a Bit More Complicated","Sex is valued by society and expected in marriage, so what of those not inclined to it? #AsexualAwarenessWeek https://www.theodysseyonline.com/being-asexual-can-be-complicated",asexuality
Aces who have an ace significant other. How did you found each other?,"Is your relationship different than straight/gay relationships other than sex?

What's the best thing about them? 

Is it your first relationship? 

Do you play video games?

Yeah, im bored... Sorry. Also reading a lot about struggling half ace relationships, would be nice to hear about positive ones too. ",asexuality
"[Asexual Awareness Week] This post is just a positivity one for all my gay (homoromantic) and biromantic asexual guys - we exist, and we defy society’s harmful stereotype that men are all aggressive, horny, sexual beings.",Thank you queer and/or ace guys for being you! ,asexuality
What is the difference between libido and sexual attraction? Especially for men?,"I assume it’s like feeling the need to get off, without having feelings of wanting to have sex with someone specific, right? Sexual attraction would be like “I want sex, and with this specific person” Am I correct or wrong?",asexuality
Didn’t even know this was an option?,I used to just go along with things when my exes wanted to have sex bc I knew at least afterwards I could just cuddle comfortably without being bothered to have sex. But now I’m dating someone whOS ACTUALLY A DECENT HUMAN BEING and who legit stops when I say I don’t want to do something. And I’m like whoa. This was a thing the whole time? I could just not have sex? Completely mind blown my dudes. But now I’m wondering who I am in terms of sexualness; not that I feel like I need a label but what in heck do I want? And idk how to tell my partner bc I don’t even know what’s up honestly. Mostly I don’t like kissing bc it feels like it always has to lead to sex but I like soft kisses. The idea of sex just makes me sad tho. But also maybe I’m not ace and this is just trauma. idunno ,asexuality
"My one and only ace accessory, I keep it in my work badge",,asexuality
Kinda new here,"So ughh...i've just recently found out about this thing called Asexuallity,just to find out it kinda fits me...seeing as there is a flair here ""Am I Ace"" I assume it's a common question lol

So..i'm 22 Years old male,i've had relationships but I never really cared for the sexual parts of it.

Never awfully wanted to have sex,did it 'cuz my ex wanted to so I said sure why not...but didn't really feel the need to do it,nor have the need to do it again.

I can see a good looking girl and think ""DAT ASS"" or ""Nice rack"" but i'd just never go ""I'd tap that""

I don't take any meds that lower libido,don't have any mental thing about me,no problems down there or anything...I like girls,and I like loving and being loved, I just could hardly care less about sex and sexuallity.


So ughhh hi I guess? 
Never met people much like it,most people are sex crazed,other men espacially...so it's hard to find people I can relate to in this aspect",asexuality
"DAE run life as asexual but for a day or 2 once every couple months just cant ""get enough""?","Title mostly covers it. 

I (23M) am married to a wonderful woman (20F). While we do have sex ~once a month, its mostly for her.  But I have these weird bouts where for 1 or 2 days I seem to be permanently horny. 

Its annoying.  For 1, its distracting at work. For 2 it almost never lines up with my wifes own cycle of needs. (Aka she's not in the mood then).

I guess I'm just complaining. Venting, whatever. Fuck Hormones man.",asexuality
Found this on Tumblr and thought I should share it here,,asexuality
"Hello my dudes, is listening to mainstream music hard bc the music sucks or bc you can’t relate to all the sexual themes?","This is me assuming the you don’t like mainstream music. If you do like mainstream music then that’s good too lol 

I’ve been trying to clear up my ignorance about LGBTQ+ communities. I’m just wondering if all the sexual themes in mainstream music/media makes it hard to enjoy or even relate too. ",asexuality
First Time,"as of today’s date, I've officially defined myself as grey ace and it feels as if a shit ton of weight has been lifted, so many questions I had haunting my daily life and sleep throughout my childhood until, literally this morning, have been answered.
growing up in an Asian-Moslem family leaves no room to not be hetero, virgin until married, and have two kids. but I've always found myself “shy away” from the topics of sex. I thought sex was a taboo thing cause I've never done it, but somehow I know that it's not of my interest to even do it? it doesn't DISinterest me, it's just that I can do 25 other sexual actions THEN probably think about having sex. 
I've definitely stepped out of relationships because it got sexual- because I thought it... had no purpose to it? almost every time me and my partner did, say like, third base, I ended up with a hollowing empty feeling inside me, we could've fucked each other’s brains out and autopsy each other's thoughts and scars, but instead, we wasted our time doing this... boring thing. but I thought it was just me being hopeless romantic.

but I came across this forum, and honestly, nothing can top finding even a tiny bit of yourself, after you feel like you've lost yourself for a very long time ",asexuality
"I'm very lonely, but not because I lack sexuality","Kind of just venting the frustration of my loneliness but hear me out. I haven't dated or had sex in 10 years now and that has never made me feel lonely. What makes me feel lonely is how quickly everyone loses interest when they realize there is no chance of a relationship with me. Dropped like a hot potato every time. I just want to make some friends, hang out, go to the movies, the park, the bar, whatever. As soon as they hear I am asexual though they distance themselves from me no matter how good of a time we were having before. I am 27 and it seems like the only thing anyone is interested in is finding a mate, leaving me all alone.",asexuality
Happy Asexual Awareness Week!,,asexuality
Should I tell my Ex that I'm Ace?,"She hates me, and we go to a really small school. Everyday I feel her slowly killing my friendships with her resentment towards me. She's kinda homophobic, and says that her hatred includes Ace's. But I think she should know why I broke up with her in the first place. This message might be a little unconcise, but I'm a little miserable right now. ",asexuality
Ways to be intimate in romantic partnerships?,"Hey everyone,

I (28 / non-binary) don't know if my partner (45 / non-binary woman) is asexual or not - she told me she is questioning -, but as a matter of fact she barely ever feels any sexual attraction to anyone. She is sex positive though and we do sometimes have sex. She also doesn't like kissing - short pecks on the lips are okay(!) for her and she kisses me hello and goodbye, but only because she knows that it means a lot to me. For the most part, nonsexual cuddling works out well between us, but when she's feeling particularly stressed even that gets difficult. 

I do not consider it bad in general in any way. It only gets difficult within the relationship, because I am allosexual and love to kiss and have sex. My main way of showing love and feeling loved is being physically affectionate. Kissing is what I miss the most in our relationship. It is really hard at times, because I sometimes feel a passionate desire to make out and be sexual with her, but I love her and would never want to make her feel uncomfortable so (naturally!) I won't do anything. She still notices my desire at times (the look on my face and a change in my ""energy"" for a lack of words) and feels guilty for not being able to fulfill and / or reciprocate these desires.

I am wondering if you have any tips on how to create intimacy and (felt) connectedness in an ace/allo relationship - for both, her and I. What are your experiences? Any thoughts / practices that helped you and your partner(s)?",asexuality
"For months, I was terrified of dating because I realized I was asexual, but I met someone who understands and accepts me for who and what I am, and I haven’t been this happy in a long, long time.","I’ll keep this short as I can. I realized my sexuality back in March and finally came out to people in August. I originally blamed a large portion of my previous relationship’s issues on my asexuality,  namely because sex and body image were huge issues for my ex-girlfriend. 

I’ve been so afraid of dating and letting anyone I’m interested in know that I’m asexual since, but I met this girl at my job and fell for her instantly. She was just so adorable that I couldn’t help myself. I asked her out, she said yes, and we had an amazing first date; it was so good that she asked me to go out with her again two days later and we had an even better time. She told me she really liked me and wanted to go out more, and I felt like I needed to lay it out then and there for her. 

I told her I was asexual and that I don’t really have a libido, but I really liked her and really wanted to kiss, cuddle, and hold hands with her. She understood and we kissed and we’ve spent a lot of time together since. She doesn’t care at all and accepts me for who I am and I’ve just been so happy lately that I had to share. Thanks for reading. ",asexuality
What can/should I do about my non-asexual partner?,"She respects my boundaries, and doesn’t do anything without my consent. My issue is that I feel so guilty. I want to be able to enjoy sex with her or even making out, but it makes me so uncomfortable. ",asexuality
"Posted this once or twice before but what better time than Asexual Awareness Week to advertise my band's song from an ace perspective, written because there wasn't enough with that message out there :D",,asexuality
Happy Asexuality Awareness Week... from a fellow Allo!,,asexuality
What is sexual attraction even supposed to feel like?,"Is it some tingling sensation in your abdomen and nether regions? Is it as simple as thinking, ""I want to do things to/with that person?"" I've never really liked labeling myself because I feel like who I am and what I like has the potential for fluidity and change, but I don't think I can recall ever feeling sexually attracted to someone. 

If it matters, I'm biologically female and 19. I've heard plenty of guys and girls gaping at stereotypically attractive individuals, like celebrities or what have you, expressing something that, to me, seemed to exceed my idea of attraction. As if, given the opportunity, they would be more than willing to have sex with said person. Perhaps I've interpreted incorrectly, so is this a sensation people actually feel about others?

I've had like two whole crushes in my life (or at least what I considered crushes), but the feeling did not entail, ""I want to take my clothes off when I'm around you,"" it was more like, ""I want to be REALLY good friends with you and talk about our greatest fears and passions in the late hours of the night and maybe kiss sometimes."" Which is a confusing place to be in when everyone else seemingly wants to do the no-pants-dance.

Sorry for the essay, I don't really expect everyone to read it, but it at least feels nice to have spewed some of what I've pent up to people who might understand.

Edit: because I suck at spelling.",asexuality
"I made this for my “coming out” Instagram post, but now I’m too nervous/anxious to post it. I wanted to at least post it here",,asexuality
Can I be a lesbian and an Ace at the same time?,"Hi everyone 
 so I'm 19 and have never been interested in sex. But I am romantically attracted to women. So my questions are do Ace feel romantic attraction?
And if being a lesbian and Ace at the same time is possible what would be the flag?
Thank you :) ",asexuality
i want to 'do things' to certain people sexually but not have them done back to me. does that fall within the spectrum?,"im starting to realize most of my fantasies mostly involve me giving pleasure to the other person but not really receiving physical stimulation from them. i dont necessarily mind it, but it confuses me. it feels like the emotional and sexual parts of me are very separate. i can do one or the other, but whenever i try to integrate them, idk i end up very frustrated.

im 32M and have had very few sexual encounters in adulthood (lots as a middle schooler until high school put an end to that). i can be attracted to both males and females, romantically and sexually, when i find the right person. the reason i think i might be ace is i very rarely have the motivation to actually do something about it. 3 times in my entire life, to be exact.  most people i cant stand to be around or look at more than 15 minutes, so when i find one i actually wanna spend time with it's a joyous occasion.

it's like ""i can get myself off"" no matter who im with. i just wanna play with their parts and give them a good time and then cuddle and talk afterwards and have like an actual relationship.

there was a guy i legitimately fell in love with. i was crazy about him for 2 years. we were good friends and eventually i confessed to him. it went something like: ""youre my favorite person in the whole world and i want to be with you, but i dont have any strong desire to fuck or whatever"". 
well he ended up taking my virginity one day, and i kinda hated the experience. now i realize it was because i let him lead and we didnt do what i wanted. i just wanted to suck him and have a long night of love, without the sex.

so yeah. very confused guy here",asexuality
#AsexualAwarenessWeek Day 2: What is asexuality?," \#AsexualAwarenessWeek Day 2: What is asexuality?

&amp;#x200B;

The simplest definition of asexuality is an orientation where a person lacks sexual attraction towards anyone.

&amp;#x200B;

In the simplistic context of four primary orientations,

A) Heterosexuality is sexual attraction towards the opposite gender and the lack of attraction towards the same gender.

B) Homosexuality is sexual attraction towards the same gender and the lack of attraction towards the opposite gender.

C) Bisexuality is sexual attraction towards both the opposite gender and same gender.

D) Asexuality is the lack of attraction towards both the opposite gender and same gender.

&amp;#x200B;

To be more specific though, asexuality is a spectrum:

i) There are people who experience no sexual attraction called asexuals or aces.

ii) There are people who experience sexual attraction only rarely or in certain conditions called gray-asexual, gray-sexual, gray-aces, or graces.

iii) There are also people who only experience sexual attraction for people they share an emotional connection (platonic, romantic, etc.) with, meaning they are not attracted to strangers or people they don't know well, called demisexuals or demi.

&amp;#x200B;

There are various other categories that fall within the asexual spectrum (aspec), varieties of asexuality or grey-sexuality, but the above are the most common terms/adjectives used by aspec individuals.

At least, 1% of individuals are asexual, meaning 1 out of every 100 people or about 77 million people globally overall though some studies have indicated that the number may be higher.

One thing that is important to remember is that just because an asexual individual cannot experience sexual attraction, it doesn't mean they cannot experience romantic attraction (aromantic) nor does it mean they cannot love in other ways. The next post will explore romantic attraction and the split attraction model.

&amp;#x200B;

TL;DR: Asexuality is an orientation where a person experiences little or no sexual attraction, but it doesn't mean they cannot experience love.

&amp;#x200B;

Extended Research Resources:

AVEN FAQ: r/https://www.asexuality.org/?q=general.html

What Is Asexuality: r/http://www.whatisasexuality.com/intro/

AVENwiki (Demisexual): r/http://wiki.asexuality.org/Demisexual

AVENwiki (Attraction): r/http://wiki.asexuality.org/Attraction

AVENwiki (Flag): r/http://wiki.asexuality.org/Asexual_flag

Asexual Archive (Glossary): r/http://www.asexualityarchive.com/glossary/

The Huffington Post (Asexuality Spectrum): r/https://www.huffingtonpost.com/…/asexual-spectrum_n_3428710…

Asexual Education (Attraction and Vocabulary): r/http://asexualeducation.tumblr.com/attraction

AVEN (Sexualities Master List): r/https://www.asexuality.org/…/123256-asexuality-sexual-ori…/…

AVENwiki (Lexicon): r/http://wiki.asexuality.org/Lexicon

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

https://i.redd.it/bmw7pqwghst11.jpg",asexuality
Representation in the new jaiden animations video!,,asexuality
"Not quite sex-averse, definitely sex-organ-averse?","For context, I have a pretty limited sexual history, with one f/f sort-of relationship. I do feel arousal and pretty rare sexual attraction. Often it's more that if I'm feeling sorta randy for whatever reason, people can then look sexually attractive, whereas otherwise I really just see folks as ""looking nice"" or attractive. I can see people or features as sexy, but that doesn't at all mean I want sex with them (whereas often others seem to make a direct correlation between any sort of attraction or appreciation and wanting to ultimately bone).

My issue is that I really, really don't like sexual organs. Breasts, yes. Strong arms, yes. P or V, nope nope nope nope. I just find them (including my own) odd, unappealing, and frankly sorta gross. I've sort of watched more porn and looked at more pictures primarily to try and acclimate myself to it. And while sex DOES feel good (depending on certain things), and I do enjoy it and like the connection it forms with a partner, I can't deal when focusing on the organs themselves. With either sex/gender I can try to blank it out for the benefit of the act, or touching for the sake of pleasing a partner, but for example anything oral is just a million percent off the table and I don't even really like it on myself. I don't know why this is, and it hasn't changed much.

Does anyone have any advice or experience in this area? I don't know if it's something that's holding me back that I should work through, or if it's ok to simply be this way and try to find a partner who's ok with it.",asexuality
Question because Im curious,"If you are ace and romantically attracted to a single sex/gender, what about that gender attracts you in a nonsexual way?",asexuality
Am I even asexual anymore?,"Uh hi, I tried asking this question somewhere else. But I ended up, getting harrased for it. So, I guess I'll try here.

So, yesterday I decided. It'd be funny, if me and a friend read some sexual stuff about dudes. I mean, I've done it before and didn't feel anything. But when, I did it that day. Oh boy, I'm pretty sure I got ""turned on"". I was really scared, cause this has never happened. I tried, then reading sexual stuff about girls assuming it'd work the same and it didn't. Since, then I've been questioning my sexuality and even romantic attraction. I mean, I still like girls but I'd rather hold hands and kiss her and her hold me and stuff like that. Meanwhile with dudes, I don't want that I'd like to just have sex and end it there. At least with most dudes, see a while back I grew feelings for my buddy. He's so nice to me, he once called me "" baby"" whilst joking around and it lighted up my day. I'd love, to kiss him, hold hands with him, hug him etc. I'd also, would like to have sex with him too. But, I'm thinking it's probably different cause he's a transgendered dude. But at the same time I don't, because I never really see any differences between a cis or trans person. They're the same to me. I'm hoping, it isn't inner transphobia or something cause I used to be really transphobic. But, I hated when I was like that so I don't think it can be that? There's also, another factor here. Gentilia scares me, I can read or hear about some dude's or girl's junk down there but seeing them. Makes my heart race, and makes me feel ill. The idea, of having it inside of me is really gross to me. So does anyone know what this is? I just want, help.. 
TL;DR: I used to be asexual then read some sexual stuff about dudes. Got really turned on, then tried the same for girls. It didn't happen now On confused as fuck. ",asexuality
The acest thing I have ever done,"Over the summer, a very good friend of mine got married and a month or so before the wedding he had a stag do.

Now, at the time, my friend didn't know that I am ace. Even I don't know to what extent I am – some sort of grey between ace and demi I suspect, but I'm not entirely sure and to be honest I don't care much either. I'm doing OK as things are so I don't really need to analyse it too much.

So on this trip, there's my friend, who doesn't know I'm ace and probably just thinks I'm bad at chatting up women, a couple of his mates whom I've met before but don't know well, and then a large number of people I've never met. And on the first night we all went to a strip club.

I had been warned about this because it had been mentioned in the group chat, so although I really didn't want to go, I did have a sort of plan (just sit quietly, keep drinking and politely refuse any dances). I'd been to these clubs before on a previous stag night, so I had an idea of what to expect, and I reasoned that if it was just too horrible then I could slip away while the boys were distracted and head back to the hotel.

For those of you who have never been in a strip club, the basic set up is that there are loads of couches and tables and a few stages with poles for dancing. The stages are well lit but everywhere else is very dark. There are normally one or two pole dancing shows going on and all the other dancers walk around the tables in their lingerie, talking to the punters and trying to sell dances, which take place in private side rooms.

I had hoped to sit somewhere in the middle of a group so that I couldn't be isolated by a dancer, because even though in my experience they are nice and don't mind if you're up front and say you're not interested, I was uncomfortable being there and wanted to be left alone as much as possible. Unfortunately, I had to go to the toilet when we arrived, so I was last to the seating area and had to sit on the periphery. Nice job, bladder, ya dick.

So I sat down and started talking to one of the guys and everything was fine, but after a few minutes two dancers came over and sat down next to us. Now, there are loads of things I really admire about strippers (I feel that there must be a more PC term but I can't think of it), and one of them is their ability to just butt into conversations. I mean that sincerely; if I need to talk to someone who is talking to someone else, I loiter nearby until my awkwardness draws their attention. These women are just like, bam, I'm here now and involved in your social interaction. And it's awesome. And they do it just in their underwear! Mind-blowing self-assuredness.

The dancer next to me started talking and she was perfectly nice, but I just wished I was anywhere else at that point and I felt super uncomfortable with the whole situation. Luckily I was very conscious of the fact that she didn't care about me and was just there on business, which was totally cool, so after the initial pleasantries I said, ""Just so you know, I'm not going to be getting any dances tonight, so if you want to try someone else then please feel free, but also if you just want to chat for a little while that's also fine."" She asked why I wouldn't be getting a dance, and I just said these places weren't really my thing, and she said, ""OK, cool, thanks"" and walked over to one of the other guys. So far, so good.

A short while later, another dancer saw the gap next to me and jumped in. Things started as before: an initial polite exchange, followed by my early defensive move. But this time she interrupted me and said, ""hey, why do you think I only want your money? I'm just talking!"" I knew this obviously wasn't true, but she was nice so I went along with it anyway. We chatted a little more and she asked me about myself, and I asked about her, and she was so cool and interesting. She was from Eastern Europe and had lived in loads of different countries, so she spoke loads of languages (which is totally my bag) and was here for university. She was learning Japanese had plans to go to Kyoto to study more and wanted to become a translator over there. And she told me about her experiences living all over Europe and what she thought of the UK and her experiences of dating British guys. She was so fascinating and our conversation felt so natural and easy, even though only one of us was fully clothed.

But wait, there's a punchline! The acest thing that I have done! So, before I knew it, we had been talking for 45 minutes, and one of the guys handed her some money and said, ""Ffs, what the hell is he talking to you about, please give him a dance,"" so she grabbed my hand and led me to the back rooms, in spite of my protests. I felt like a petulant child being dragged around a supermarket by his mother. Except with a load of onlookers cheering.

We got into the private section and she told me to sit down in this little booth thing, and I said, ""Look, I meant what I said before. If it's all the same to you, I'd really like it if we could forget the dance and just carry on talking. I was enjoying our conversation and this'll be the easiest £20 you'll ever make."" She looked at me a bit stunned and said, ""You don't want me to get naked?!"" So I apologised and said ""no thank you, it would just make me feel really uncomfortable,"" wondering if talking a stripper into keeping her clothes on meant I qualified for some kind of Medal of Ace.

She sat down next to me and asked why it would make me uncomfortable. Now, I didn't really intend to share my asexuality with a stranger (and in fact I had never told anyone about it/my suspicions of it) but I thought, what does it matter? I'll never see her again, she won't tell anyone else, none of the boys can hear, and to be fair it is a brilliant reason not to get a dance. So I told her I was asexual. And she said, ""what, so you're not into sex _at all_?"" I said no, not really. And she was sort of like, pfffff...wow. And I laughed. She asked me a bit about it and was generally kind, understanding and curious, and then we picked up where we were before. A little later she said the others would be wondering where we'd got to and we went back to the group.

I was a bit disappointed because I thought she'd leave, but to my great pleasure she sat next to me again and we kept talking until our group left about half an hour later, at which point we hugged and said goodbye. The other guys kept asking me all weekend what we'd been taking about and just didn't understand why you would have a normal conversation with a dancer in a strip club, which I found funny and quite sad. I'm not against this strip clubs per se, as long as everyone is there voluntarily, and I appreciate that it's a business, but I don't see why that means there shouldn't be normal social interactions between dancers and punters.

I've actually thought about her loads since that night, and I'm sad I'll never speak to her again. She was so lovely and had loads of qualities I lack and admire in other people. She's a doer and not a dreamer/procrastinator like I am, and I really look up to people like that. I hope her future is full of success in everything she does.

Thanks for reading my novella.

**tl;dr** – I went to a strip club and old silver-purple tongue here managed to persuade a stripper to keep her clothes on.",asexuality
Am I ace? Or do I just have a low sex drive?,"I'm 18, have had two serious relationships in the past, only one was sexual. I enjoy having sex, but I never really *crave* sex. If someone told me I could never have sex again, it wouldn't really be a big deal to me. The thing is, when I *do* have sex, I enjoy it, but I never really think about sex unless someone else brings it up. If I see someone attractive, I don't really think about sleeping with them, instead I imagine cuddling them, holding hands, kissing them etc. I also don't masturbate. I never have the urge. But again, the few times I have masturbated, I enjoyed it.

So, I'm basically indifferent about sex. I like it, but I can live without it. Does that mean I'm ace or somewhere on the ace spectrum? Or do you have to dislike sex entirely to be ace?

Edit: Also, porn does nothing for me. Whether it be a video, picture, or erotica.",asexuality
a c e e n e r g y,,asexuality
I am increasingly afraid that I'm not actually Ace.,"First off, I understand how insensitive that title is in this community. Many people here really wish they weren't Ace and would be excited at the possibility that they aren't. That possibility not only exists for me, but seems more and more likely. And while a part of me is excited, a huge part of me is dreading it for a number of reasons.

The first is that I don't want to be alone again. Before I discovered asexuality and this community, I has always just considered myself a weird straight person, which was very isolating. I still felt disconnected from allo's; I just didn't have a term to describe myself. Then I started reading about asexuality and talking to people here and I finally felt like I had found my people and that I belonged somewhere. I've really enjoyed the last few months with all of you. I don't want to go back to just being a weirdo straight guy again.

The second is that, even if I am allo, I don't know how to **be** allo. Even if I do experience sexual attraction, I have no idea what do with it, nor do I have anyone that I can express it with. My luck with women has been a complete disaster for almost a decade now and I'm fairly certain that no one has ever been sexually attracted to me. Realizing I was Ace was actually quite a relief because it meant that I didn't need to worry about that anymore. Being a virgin and having absolutely 0 sexual experience at 27 years old is no big deal if you're Ace, but as an allo, it makes me feel absolutely horrible. I don't even think I'm that unattractive or anything; it just hasn't happened for me. 

The third is that, of course, all of this doubt comes flying in right after I'd just gotten comfortable identifying as Ace and coming out to people as Ace. Hell, I just came out to my parents last night, and they were very supportive. If I take it back now, I confirm a number of the worst ignorant stereotypes about Aces: ""You're just sexually repressed; Asexuality is just an excuse for ugly people; You're just a hopeless nerd; You're just socially awkward; It's just a phase; You're just depressed; Etc."" The sexual repression one is easily the most relevant: I grew up in an environment where sex just wasn't talked about and I've never been in a situation where sexual expression was allowed or appropriate. 

All of that makes the prospect of being allo really uncomfortable, but it seems incredibly likely at this point. Conversations I've had with other Aces have really cast a lot of doubt on my own asexuality, and a couple of experiences I've had in the past couple of days really drive that doubt home. The first was because of a girl that I met briefly last night while walking my dog. She was very attractive and was wearing a dress that really emphasized her figure. We ended up interacting for less than a minute, but I had that ""anime nosebleed"" meme moment for the entire time and I spent a fair bit of time afterwards thinking about her. The second was this morning, randomly browsing Reddit when I saw [this picture.](https://i.redd.it/z4ho9uhpxpt11.jpg) Don't mind the text, because it doesn't matter. When I saw this picture, the very first thought that ran through my mind was ""She's really cute, that thing with the strap is really hot, and I want to see more."" This was accompanied by a sudden rush of sexual energy. If that isn't sexual attraction, then I don't know what is. And it's honestly freaking me out because I've spent so much time and energy these past few months immersing myself in the Ace identity and accepting myself for what (I thought) I am. Now I don't know what to do or what to think and it scares me. ",asexuality
I need some advice,"Hi, Not sure if this is allowed here, but I need some advice.

I really like the girl who happens to be asexual. I'm not super informed on the whole topic of asexuality so I figured I should get some more information first.

Anything about asexuality, and about dating someone who is asexual would really help so I don't screw anything up because I'm uninformed.

Thanks!",asexuality
I need advice,"So I’m just starting to accept my asexuality and could really use some help.

How did y’all overcome that feeling of just being so different from everyone else?

I get that there’s nothing wrong with being asexual and that everyone is different, but I just overwhelmingly feel so different. 

Any tips?",asexuality
Not sure if I'm ace,"Hi everyone, I'm new here. I started to wonder this a long time ago, but never gave real thought to it, as I found it something quite difficult to define and explain or sometimes just an excuse for my social awkwardness.  So, I think I'm somewhat on the spectrum. Let me explain: I ""do like"" women, like, looking at them, watching sexual content, sometimes masturbating, sometimes not; I find women attractive in real life too, but have close to zero interest in start something, or having something sexual with them. I had a long relationship some years ago (it lasted something around 2y), and it was very weird. I liked the girl, wanted her to feel good, but had no sexual interest for her, although I ""liked"" her body the way I described above, but just couldn't have sexual arousal no matter what, and it ended because of that. I was destroyed by what happened, and that changed me forever, I should say, it made me very insecure about any new relationships, and although I had something ""romantic"" (around 6,7 months) with another girl after that, it never had a sexual ""oportunity"" and I didn't looked for that either because I was affraid of what would happen and maybe also not interested. Anyway, all of that was 3 years ago. Since then, I never had any sexual (or romantic) contact with anyone, and really don't feel like it in the long term. So it returned to me, I may be somewhere in the spectrum? Someone has experienced something similar? Should I ""just look for help""?",asexuality
Asexual awareness week (x-post /r/AsexualMen),,asexuality
I started a gay ace YouTube channel! Slice of Ace,"Hi, fellow aces! 

I identify as a homoromantic asexual, and I've recently started a YouTube channel to talk about asexuality. I think it's important to raise visibility, and so that people figuring out their orientation have someone they can relate to. I've had positive feedback so far, so I thought I might share it here as well, in case anyone was interested :) I don't know how much crossover there is between this Reddit and AVEN, but I thought I might as well give it a shot

[https://www.youtube.com/channel/UC3vDNqa\_MMGI43NAO2C-JJw](https://www.youtube.com/channel/UC3vDNqa_MMGI43NAO2C-JJw)

Have a wonderful day, and a wonderful Ace Awareness Week!",asexuality
I totally just came out in a YouTube video,Been a while since I made a YouTube video but I found myself mention that I'm asexual very casually even though a lot of people that know me don't know that. Just found that funny and wanted to share :P,asexuality
I'm ready for Asexual Awareness Week!,,asexuality
Currently feeling pretty hopeless.,"I know I’m young and I have plenty of time to figure things out, but I’m currently being haunted by the thought that I’ll never find love. I’m asexual and heteroromantic, and I constantly have fantasies about being in love with someone. I want it more than anything in the world.

I guess the idea that I’m not at all attractive, in addition to being ace, hit me like a fucking truck tonight. I feel like I have nothing going for me and that I’ll die alone. My only hope is that some ace guy will fall for me, as I’m sex-repulsed and can’t imagine being with a sexual person. But I’m terrified that I’ll never be remotely attractive and that my ugly face will drive even the ace guys away.

I don’t know what I’m expecting you guys to do, but I was just feeling really hopeless and alone and didn’t know where else to go. I’m not out to anyone yet and I guess I was hoping one of you might have some reassuring words or similar feelings.",asexuality
DAE not 'get' porn? Like it's literally never occurred to me that I would want to watch other people have sex.,"Lol. If I'd never heard of porn, the idea that you could watch videos of people having sex, it'd never have occurred to me that such a thing even existed, or that there was any demand for it. I don't get it. I don't get the purpose. I don't get why there is such a huge porn industry.",asexuality
Target coming through with the ace representation,,asexuality
How do asexual men deal with the need to ejaculate?,"I would consider myself, at a minimum, asexual-compatible. Sex isn’t a necessary part of a relationship, but I still feel a physical need to ejaculate. If I go too long without, I get painfully sensitive and have frequent wet dreams. The only way I have found to relieve this is masturbation (my partner is ace) and it’s honestly a chore sometimes. I imagine a “true” asexual in my position would be quite unhappy. I’m sure this varies a lot person by person, but I guess my questions are:

Do you just accept that wet dreams will happen and not let it bother you too much? Do they happen at all? 

Is masturbation more common in asexuals than I thought and men just have to deal with the choice between that and discomfort?",asexuality
Ace social sites,"I've heard of asexual dating/social sites, and I was wondering if there were any recommendations. I wanna start meeting people around me and maybe even do the whole dating thing if it feels natural.",asexuality
First Kinsey Test: Entirely Accurate,"I got an X on the Kinsey Scale. ""Non-sexual"". We know that's ace now, but it's an old scale. Was expecting x and I got it. Lol. ",asexuality
A goodbye to the asexual community: I still love all of you,"I’m titling this as a goodbye because I’ve finally realized that I’m not actually ace. 

I first started using that label for myself about four years ago. I’d never felt sexual attraction and only brief flashes of arousal. While coming out (to myself and others) as ace was a big relief in some ways (I felt less broken and less pressured to try to have sex), there was a part of me that was always felt like I was missing out. There was a lot of regret because I *wanted* to be sexual and wasn’t.

A little background: I’m 21 now and I’ve been on various antidepressants since I was 13. One of the major side effects of those kinds of meds is decreased libido. About a month ago, I got on a medication that not only really really works for me, but doesn’t usually have sexual side effects.

It was like being hit by a sexuality train, if I’m being honest. Not only am I less depressed, but I’m really enjoying exploring this side of myself. That said, I will miss being a part of the asexual community (as an ace, at least) and I promise I will always support you guys and be the best ally I can be. 

May the cake be with you!!",asexuality
Chill Asexual Discord :),"The Chill Asexual Discord is a server for people on the aromantic and asexual spectrums. We have ~500 members at present. Idea is to be an open social space. Light moderation. Chill atmosphere. Beyond providing a supportive environment to discuss aro/ace issues, we're a place where people can connect over shared hobbies and interests. Channels range from anime/manga to automotives. Voice chat is popular. See link provided, if interested.

https://discord.gg/6wgBr5n

~Chill Asexual Discord Staff",asexuality
Puzzle Piece with ace colors I drew to celebrate the start of Asexuality Awareness Week and for coming out to my friends!,,asexuality
I will try to come out!,"Well, asexual awareness week started and I really want to come out to my friends but I just can't say it on person! So I thought I could just change my profile pic on my social medias to something that basically screams ""Hey look, I'm ace!!"" (don't know what image to put yet though). I don't know if it will work, probably don't, but hey at least I'll try!",asexuality
Can you become asexual after previously being sexual for years?,"First time redditer here and I am reaching out because I feel so alone in terms of my sexuality. Here's the sparksnotes version:

I am a 22 year old female and have NO libado. Like none, nada, zip. Even if I imagine my dream man naked in my bedroom, I wouldn't want to have sex. I think about sex a lot, mostly because I am frustrated as to why I don't want to have it because its ""normal"" and I feel...broken?

But here's the thing, 2 years ago, I was VERY sexually active and enjoyed having sex with all my partners. Even kinky stuff!! One day I was having sex with my current boyfriend (we have been together 4 years now) and it didn't feel good and kind of...hurt? It had never hurt before and I wasn't into it so we stopped. He NEVER has pressured me into having sex and I have never been sexually abused so there's no trauma or anything. But then a week or so later, we tried again. And it hurt again and felt uncomfortable so we stopped. Same thing kept happening for MONTHS and I went to my OBGYN asking for help and a checkup to see if there was something wrong. Nothing. She said ""sometimes women just loose their sex drive, but it'll come back!""

Well that was TWO years ago and I have had sex maybe twice with my partner since then and it was very random and spur of the moment. Nowadays,  I get uncomfortable if he tries to ""touch me"" down there or start kissing me too deeply and I don't understand why. I truly do love him, he is my best friend and I am still very much physically attracted to him. I love cuddling and light kissing but I have no desire to do sexual stuff anymore. I have tried lubes, toys, foreplay and masturbation, you name it. NOTHING has worked...I was reading that some asexuals just have sex to make thier partners happy but I literally can't do it because I start overthinking it and then it feels uncomfortable and I get tense (which is why I think it hurts). 

He is very supportive and tells me we don't need sex to be happy and in love but it's hard sometimes because he doesn't ""understand"" why I don't want to have sex and admits that he thinks I have lost feelings for him or would sometimes question if I was being unfaithful. (I have NEVER and would never cheat on him.)

Anyways, I guess I am just looking for support and answers. Am I not alone? Has anyone else had this happen to them? Are you in a relationship? How does it affect the relationship?
",asexuality
Misunderstanding Asexuality,"So I’ve known I’m totally ace for probably a bit over a year now. As soon as I discovered the term, I knew it was me, as I’ve never felt sexual attraction or urge to do it with anyone. I’m out to a few select friends, but no one in my family. 

As well, I’ve recently been diagnosed as being somewhere on the autism spectrum, although I’ve shown traits of it my entire life. 

My mom recently brought up autism and some article about it and asexuality which I thought was a good sign, until she was talking about it a bit more 
She didn’t really seem to be of the opinion that asexuality was like being gay or bi, aka just how you are, but rather that it was like depression or anxiety, as she said attraction can be affected by mood swings. I really doubt this as I’ve never felt any sexual attraction to anyone ever no matter my mood, but she was pretty sure in herself and now I’m feeling confused.

I really don’t know how to bring this up with her anymore without outing myself or creating suspicion, and now I feel a lot less sure about coming out to my family anytime soon...

Anyone on here have any thoughts / experiences with anything like this?",asexuality
Am I 100% ace or Grey ace?,"Hi everyone. This is something I've been confused and concerned about. I'm a 16 Y/O Male and currently in high school. For a majority of my life I've never really understood why people are so obsessed with sex. My Girlfriend is Ace and I find great comfort in that fact. Compared to my peers I don't care about sex in the slightest. In fact when people talk about it I'm uncomfortable. 

I masturbate once a day but besides that I don't bother or care about sex. Am I Grey Ace or Full Ace? ",asexuality
[questioning] How did you know?,"Hi guys.

I \[22f\] have always identified as bisexual. That part I *am* sure about. Romantically, I'm interested in people regardless of gender. I've always known that about myself. However now I'm starting to question what that really means to me. 

I've been in a couple relationships, but they quickly grow stagnant and I end them, except one relationship when I was 18, but the girl was closeted and the relationship was secret, so I think that might have been what kept me going back - because things were secret, not as much was expected (and possibly why it felt like I loved her). I should also note that I'm still a virgin despite being in relationships - it's always felt, to me, like it's never the 'right time', but now I'm starting to wonder if that's just me not really... wanting to at all?

Lately, I've been on a couple dates with people that I get along with on-paper, but in real life there's just nothing. On my part, at least. No matter how much I like them, the minute anything gets intimate it's like my brain just stops any feelings for them. Suddenly, I don't know how I got into this situation, or why I'm there with them. Now it's starting to get stuck in brain. As though I'm constantly disconnected from other people, no matter how lonely I am and how much I would actually like the companionship aspect of a relationship, because I'm just waiting for the moment they kiss me and the butterflies stop. 

Thing is, I never considered myself asexual before this as I *have* felt sexual attraction. Mostly in a solo setting, but a couple times when I'm drunk I've made out with people and thought 'hey, maybe if I wasn't a virgin I'd go home with them', but then drunk!me also eats McDonalds food and I hate that sober, so I don't trust her judgement.

So now I guess I'm wondering if that's a part of asexuality, or if asexuality is a complete disinterest? And if discovering your asexuality was a slow thing, or something you realised relatively quickly? It's incredibly frustrating, on my part, to know whether it's a Depression™ thing or actually asexuality, since I knew I was bisexual from a young age (early teens, saw the term on tumblr, immediately felt a strong connection with it) so it was never a journey of self-discovery, you know? How do I know whether this is real, or if I'm just a slow bloomer? 

tldr; bisexual freaking out because she doesn't feel anything for anyone, is it possibly asexuality? Is it normal to take so long to realise?",asexuality
"The Rise Of The Walking, Talking Amoebas—And Why You Shouldn't Be Afraid","The Rise Of The Walking, Talking Amoebas—And Why You Shouldn't Be Afraid via @twitter https://t.co/d8UvcSixY4 This is first article I wrote on the topic. I've learned a lot more since (obsessive researcher), and a more personal account is to come this week. #AsexualAwarenessWeek",asexuality
Aesthetic attraction can be confusing,"So I just wanted to air some stuff out that I've thought about for a long time. I had a lot of trouble trying to figure out if I was just a lesbian or an ace lesbian, mainly because I'm really into aesthetics.

A simplified way to say this is that I find girls to be very aesthetically pleasing, so sometimes I'm confused whether that equates to me being sexually attracted to them or what. I say really gay things about how I think women are super beautiful and gorgeous all the time and a lot of people would never guess that I'm ace. It was a confusing thing to figure out.

I eventually came to this conclusion: no matter how aesthetically attractive someone is to me, I still don't feel any sexual attraction. I had to basically put a microscope to what it means to be aesthetically vs sexually attracted to someone. Basically aesthetic attraction to me is me just wanting to stare at them and honestly just bask in their presence without wanting to do anything vs sexual attraction which is thinking ""wow I want them to do things to me."" 

I have a lot of women I think are extremely attractive but I wouldn't really want to do anything with them, so that's how I figured out that yeah, I'm asexual after all. I hope this helps anyone who's going through something similar to my experience because I sure know I wished someone explained this to me.",asexuality
Ace case.,"So I've been ace for a few months, I'm still new to this. New to my feelings of being ace. New to figuring out what this even means. Also new to disappointments in relationships when you tell the guy you are asexual and they still try to get sex out of you here and there. New to telling myself that aces can find good lasting relationships too. New to the utter fear of being alone forever because you can't find any guys who don't want sex, just romance. I have generalized anxiety disorder so the anxiety and fear of my new feelings of being ace and being alone forever has been horrible. Have you guys had any good lasting romantic relationships with non aces? ",asexuality
*possible triggers* do you think being ace makes/made you more prone to abuse/manipulation?,"I am sorry if I cannot phrase my question better, but let me contextualize:

I met a bunch of people in the past who thought I ""owe"" them sex for going out with them, even trying to make agreements with me like ""at least once a week sex, because this is my right and this is healthy behavior"". Or telling me that there MUST be something wrong with me if I don't enjoy sex, like, some trauma in the past or maybe I need to go to a therapist or maybe I should try this new kinky thing... I didn't really know what I was back then, so I honestly believed there was something wrong with my brain that I needed to fix. I remember drinking  a couple of beers before sex just so I could handle it, because there was so much pressure on me at times and zero understanding when I didn't want to.

I know that 'normal people' maybe need sex, but I don't agree with putting so much pressure on someone. In my opinion, it is still better to break up for sexual non-compatibility (usually I was the person who did that in the end, they never stopped thinking that pressure was a solution). Tbh, I wasn't really aware why I was feeling like that back then and I TOTALLY believed I needed to fix myself, which is probably why I ""let these things happen"". 

Nowadays I am more aware of sexual orientation and I am more able to defend myself, though sometimes I feel still a little 'weird'. But knowing that being ace is a thing allowed be to realize that I can just say ""no"" whenever and leave whenever. It's kinda like a safety blanket.

I think more information on sexual orientations, a less sexualized society and more awareness on consent (for others and for my own boundaries) would have helped heaps.

Wondering if there are more people with similar thoughts?",asexuality
Things You Should Know About Asexuality Video,,asexuality
Happy Asexual Visibility Week!,"It's all week, October 21 - 27.  

[Ace Awareness Week](http://www.asexualawarenessweek.com/#)
",asexuality
Just realized this shirt has ace colors on it :),,asexuality
Can someone please explain how asexuals can have kinks?,"As an asexual, the idea of having kinks is so foreign to me that I cannot comprehend it. Could someone please explain how other aces have kinks? Because from all that I've heard and read, I can't grasp how it's still asexuality if you have kinks as kinks are a form of sexual desire. I'm not trying to be acephobic or rude or anything, I'm just generally confused. ",asexuality
Is there a word for this?,"To get right to the point, I don't know what to call how I feel.

I feel sexual attraction at pure random.

There's not any other way I can put it.

At one time, I could see something and go ""eh"", but then another time see something similar and feel completely different.

The level of attraction also is completely random.

I could feel basically nothing one time, to a lot another time, to full on anime nosebleed another time.

The closest thing I can think of is Grey-a, but I don't think that works because Grey-a is described as Only feeling sexual attraction rarely and/or not very much.

I don't think it really works since it's not necessarily *rare* for me,   
but it is inconsistent, and isn't constant in the slightest.

Does anyone else feel this way? Is there a name for it?",asexuality
"Ace bird! I love it. Found on FB group Asexual Aces, creator: AJ Dream Crafts",,asexuality
Ace Tie,,asexuality
Similar experience with sex?,"I consider myself asexual. Even before having sex for the first time I knew I had no interest in it at all. Whenever I had crushes on men I'd exclusively think of hugging/kissing/cuddling/talking with/to them. Eventually I got into a relationship that lasted five years. Both of us were virgins, and thankfully he never pressured me for sex. He was always interested though, and toward the end I could tell we were on the brink of breaking up and I stupidly conceded to sex. I don't regret it because 1) we didn't have it more than five times 2) if I was going to try sex, he was the perfect person to do it with 

While having sex I was super disinterested, like I felt as if someone had turned me off, like I was zoned out or something, almost as if I was extremely bored. (I don't have any trauma regarding sex btw) I always wanted it to end, but I was happy to make him happy, plus it was the only way to feel close to him since at that point he would pretty much ignore me most of the time

I feel like the chances of me finding another asexual person to be with are slim. Despite not liking sex, I do like making my partner happy and see myself having sex to feel close to them/ make them happy/ keep the relationship going. I mention the last part because it seems like people who aren't asexual find sex to be a crucial part of the relationship. I would be very happy if I didn't have to have sex ever again though. 

Anyone else with a similar experience? Or does that disqualify me from being asexual?",asexuality
Any Supernatural fans in this sub?,,asexuality
Great to finally see some ace rep at my Ross,,asexuality
Trouble Accepting Asexuality,"I’ve been in a perpetual state of asexual denial. For the years that I’ve been somewhat conscious of this, I have tried to rebuke and suppress the idea that I could actually be asexual.

I’m somewhat close to accepting it but am now entering a state of mourning over this. Did anyone else go through denial and mourning? I feel so different and I feel like I don’t get to have the gift of sensational desire for someone. That I’ll never be able to fully love someone in all realms: emotional, spiritual, and physical.  Yet, at the same time- I’m happy I’m not ruled by sexual urges and happy that my mind isn’t “infiltrated” by constant sexual thoughts.

I’m in a relationship now and it’s looking like a long-term investment but I am petrified to ever have this type of conversation with how she will react to it.

Now that this has become a more forefront of a thought in my reality, as I engage in sex with her- I definitely enjoy it a different way than her and I am aware. Though I wish more than ever I could experience what she is feeling as it seems so blissful and intense. I’m unable to achieve that. And she can sense that, to a certain degree.

I guess I just need some positivity and assurance about asexuality. I am out as a lesbian and if I ever accept this, it would definitely be a whole new concept of coming out. ",asexuality
Are these Asexual tendencies or is it just me?,"So first off apologies for this question (and I'm a little worried my title isn't the best), I'm guessing you might get this often.

Basically I saw a post here recently that people who are asexual may still like to hug people and be close and even masturbate etc.

I guess I found this interesting because I've always felt similar, I guess I usually see myself as straight. I like females (I'm a male) and I do get the feeling of wanting to hug them, be close, or just hang out, kiss etc.

But I've never felt like I want to have intercourse with them, its just the feeling of being close, or hugging.

I'm unsure if this is really similar or not, I do masturbate to porn, so maybe I am straight. But I'm in my mid 20s right now and never had sex and never really tried to or cared? I guess I prefer being able to be close to someone but never really cared about that extra step?

Maybe its more of I don't know what I'm missing because I've never tried? Apologies for this confusing post! Thanks for any info.",asexuality
I had a really ace thought...,"So you know how there are text based porn games or whatever? I was in the shower earlier and I had this thought: ""What if this game had a fanfic where the MC literally just rejects all advances? I would be super into reading that."" Like wow, I was honestly like yeah, see that porn game there? What if it was 0 porn? Like man, I just thought it was an interesting thing so I wanted to share that.

I sometimes have doubts about being ace because I'm chill with sex and smut and all that, but it's nice that random thoughts like this help reaffirm my identity. ",asexuality
Do you guys think I'm ace?,"I only ever had crushes in kindergarten. one time in 2nd or 3rd grade I saw someone's vag and I think I was attracted to that (don't really remember). Never had those feelings past 3rd grade. I never feel like I absolutely have to have sex. I decided to try not masturbating a week ago and it's actually really easy to do. When I stopped though I started being slightly aroused by pornography. When I was masturbating I wouldn't be attracted to porn at all. I've never fantasized or desired to have sex with anyone ever, I don't know if this is because I feel like it would be awkward and uncomfortable or if it's because I'm ace. I feel like sex isn't that important. I don't really look at people and think ""I would love to have sex with them"". idk, I guess I just thought I was ace because it made a lot of sense that I wasn't that interested in sex and didn't want to be in a relationship.  I'm starting to doubt if I am because I find gay porn to be totally uninteresting but straight porn sometimes gives me minor arousal. I can't tell if the arousal is from me thinking I would have arousal, which would give me an interest bias. Is this what aesthetic attraction is? ",asexuality
Sometimes being ace in a relationship is hard.,"My partner is very self-conscious, thinks he's ugly, and expresses his insecurities aloud sometimes. So me not ""wanting"" him doesn't get to reaffirm him feeling like he looks good, though honestly I'm certain he'd be insecure even if I wasn't ace. (I don't think his continuation of demeaning comments helps his mental state out, but I digress.)

He's a jokester, but he seems to use jokes to display or mask his insecurities. He occasionally jokes ""that'll never happen"" when sexy things get mentioned, which is sometimes funny, and busted up laughing when I saw a penis-based monster in the video game I was playing a few days ago, Persona 5, and was grossed out and kind of gagged by him joking, ""You don't want the Throbbing King of Desire?"" (monster's name)

He said some jokingly self-insulting comment last night and when I tried to encourage him that I *do* want to do things with him eventually, he got quiet and didn't know what to say.  I could tell he was thinking I never will, or that I won't be very into it. (We haven't had sex, so we're not sure yet.) Eventually I said, ""I like how you look. I just can't in the way that you want me to.""

Whatever that ""way"" I should see people is. It's hard to even grasp.

He's supportive of me being ace, and he doesn't seem to have a very strong sex drive himself. I just think he doesn't feel wanted. I know I just need to show him that he's wanted in other ways, but it sucks that me being ace can make him feel that way. He has his moments of weakness, and I can't fill them with the instinctive reassurance that I should, because I know it'll feel like I'm lying to him.

Being ace in a relationship is just tough sometimes, even with a supportive partner.",asexuality
Troubles telling my parents I'm ace,"The title might be a bit misleading because I have really cool parents and it's my fault for being a bit awkward. This story might also be a bit long because I'm bad at writing.

Anyways I tried telling my parents I'm ace today because I went out with some girls this weekend. I thoroughly enjoyed the evening and their company but not in that way but my parents didn't get the memo so they said ""soooo which one of these girls is the most attractive?"" Which is their ""sneaky"" way of figuring out who I'm into and I took the opportunity to say I'm not really attracted to girls or guys. To which they responded that that would be weird. 
So now I feel weird and awkward because I didn't have the balls to stand up for myself and because my parents now know something is up and I failed to explain what.
I don't know why I'm having trouble with this because as I said my parents are really cool and generally undersanding. I've come out to alot of people now and I feel my parents simply don't understand what being ace is. The real problem here is that I just don't know how to explain it to them because I feel like just saying I'm not sexually attracted to anyone or anything won't be enough for them.

How did you guys and girls come out to your parents?",asexuality
I went to a psychiatrist for the first time ever. She attributed my asexuality to my anxiety disorder.,"I've been thinking of myself as asexual since I was 12 or so. It felt amazing learning something that described me. Fifteen years later, I've never changed. I've realized I'm heteroromantic, but my asexuality has never wavered. I don't have sexual urges or feelings. I fantasize about having coffee or having intellectual conversations with men I've met, not what they look like naked.

My anxiety was getting to be incredibly difficult to tolerate, so I caved and went to a psychiatrist referral by my primary care doctor. Since it was an initial visit, she covered *everything*. I talked about the excessive amount of men who have rejected me, the fact I've never really dated, and tried really hard to make it clear that the interest was never sexual at all. Honestly, I just want a companion to nerd out about TV shows, go to concerts, talk about our emotions, and travel. A friend with more commitment, basically. I ended up having to blurt, ""I AM ASEXUAL."" I was so frustrated. 

She knew what asexuality was, amazingly. But I will paraphrase what she said afterwards because it is burned into my memory like an annoying Top 40 hit.

&gt; There are spectrums for sexuality. Unlike being transgender--you're either trans or not trans--sexuality is fluid. People can be staunchly straight, or staunchly gay. They never deviate from that identity and that's okay. Bisexuality and pansexuality blur those lines and can change frequently. However, hypersexuality and asexuality are political. People who are hypersexual tend to be so because they are wanting to proclaim their freedom to have as much sex as they want and will tell the world it is their right. Asexual people are on the other end, politicizing their lack of sexual attraction to show they're above all of that sex nonsense. What I find is that both hypersexuals and asexuals are removed from a healthy sexuality. In your case, your anxiety is preventing you from having heterosexual sexual relationships.

I never said I wanted a heterosexual sex. I said I was happy being asexual. I never said my sexuality was a cause of anxiety. Work gives me anxiety. Talking to strangers gives me anxiety. Going to the doctor gives me anxiety. I do not care about sex *at all*. I never have. I don't have any of those feelings. Honestly, I love it. I have tons of free time for actual pursuits that interest me.

I told her I didn't agree and she rambled a bit more, but I spaced out because I tend to disassociate when I'm frustrated.

So after she diagnosed me with severe generalized anxiety disorder with social anxiety components, she told me some remedies to use while waiting for the SSRI to kick in.

She said to *masturbate to alleviate anxiety*. I told her I am not interested in that and would find other ways to help myself, like petting dogs, trying makeup at Sephora, or reading books.

*I AM NOT INTERESTED IN SEX AND THAT EXTENDS TO MASTURBATION.* I really wanted to yell that, but I am too polite to yell at medical professionals.

I honest to God walked out of that session realizing that if she had told a gay person that their anxiety caused them to be gay and they need to have straight sex and masturbate like a straight person, she would have been kicked out by the end of the week and her license would've been revoked by the end of the month.

If it's not inherently obvious, I am frustrated and I am only reminded of why I avoided mental health stuff in the first place.

**EDIT:** Thanks for all the responses! I found a counseling center in my area that specifically lists that their therapists are LGBTQIA friendly, so I will be trying there.",asexuality
Am I Ace?,"I don't really like any genders, I never grew up with someone who I liked or anything. Does this mean I'm Ace or something?",asexuality
We love a Halloween ace quote,,asexuality
How do you know?,"I was never one to think, talk, imagine or even research about sex.  Hearing my friends do anything sex related always made me cringe, or at the very least, uncomfortable.  I’ve been with my fiancé for 3 years now and when we first started dating, of course we had sex, but I remember always feeling relived almost when it was over.  Don’t get me wrong, I LOVE him but I don’t want to think about sex ever, let alone do anything in that nature.  

I’m not sure where to go from here, really.  I love knowing that he’s there, and cuddling and affection in that nature but anything more than that is almost too much.  I recently have “relapsed” from my trauma of understanding I was molested when I was younger, I don’t know if this is my way of suppressing my emotions or if I am a sexual?  Honestly, I’m confused.  I feel so different when it comes to talking to my friends about their experiences and I’m just so lost. 

How did you realize/understand that you were a sexual?  How do I understand it? 
Thanks so much in advance

",asexuality
WTF even is kissing?,"Seriously, even if you aren't ace you have to admit, the concept is weird as hell.",asexuality
Whenever I buy fancy lingerie I want to set up a dick appointment,Not because I'm horny but solely because I want to flex,asexuality
This post from tumblr has a lot of chaotic ace energy so I thought I'd share it here,,asexuality
I feel like someone should tell him there's an ace up his sleeve.... it's me....I'm the ace🙄😂,,asexuality
I’ve been learning to sew recently and decided to make an asexual inspired dress!,,asexuality
For the weebs among us..,Do you have any aromantic character from an anime popping to your mind ? Is there any ? ,asexuality
I'm scared going off my antidepressants will reveal I'm not really ace,"Throwaway because I get more personal than I want to be on my reg. This post may also be a big mess because that's what I feel like.

I've been on antidepressants since 2014 and made the connection between myself and asexuality maybe a few months later. The antidepressants worked great and I've called myself questioning/on the ace-spectrum since. I still struggled with really labeling myself asexual, but I'd more or less come to terms with it.

Then one day a close friend of mine (who knows that I'm maybe ace) said that they were almost put on the same antidepressant that I'm on but opted to go for a different one when their doctor told them that ""the medication could lower your sex drive"" and said that they thought of me.

That sent me on a bit of a spiral that day. Am I really asexual or is it just the medication? Will everything, the identity I've been struggling with, change if I were to stop taking them? For my own sake I forcibly pushed those thoughts to the back of my mind. I wasn't in any state to go off the antidepressants anytime soon, so I figured that this sudden questioning of self didn't need to happen yet.

Well, I guess now's the time.

I'm at a point in my life where I think I'm ready to go off my antidepressants. I want to try, at least, and see if I can make it. I'll go back on them if I need to so I'm not overly worried about that. What I am worried about are those questions I pushed back before. 

When I first made the connection that I may be asexual I spoke about it with close friends and we all agreed that it would explain a lot. I wasn't as gung-ho about having sex as the rest of them, and at points the thought of having sex made me uncomfortable (but maybe that was also my Christian upbringing?). I remember not being as interested in having sex prior to going on the antidepressants, but of course now I'm doubting that. Back in high school I thought my level of interest in sex was normal because people just didn't talk about their sex drives or how often they were masturbating so I had nothing to compare myself against. Sure I found men attractive and had sexual urges that I've attributed to hormones, but I never wanted to act on them. I'm a virgin and don't feel the need or desire to change that. But now I'm scared. I'm scared that when I go off my meds I'll hit with, I don't know, a sudden sexual awakening? What if I go off my meds and it turns out I'm not asexual? I've been struggling with accepting that I'm ace for years and it might be a little much for my freshly off-medicated brain to handle if I realize that was all just the medication.

**tl;dr I'm not sure if my medication is the reason I don't need sex and if it is this struggle with my identity will get worse for me**",asexuality
Finally worked up the courage to order my ace ring today!,,asexuality
I can't define my sexuality,So I know societee tells us is right to be attracted to men. And I can't tell if I'm attracted to women however I've never been attracted to anyone I have been in a few relationships I've had sex couple of times however I've never been attracted to the people I've had sex with. I do have a high sex drive and I like and enjoy sex very much I just have never been attracted to the person I'm having sex with or talking to or Making up with I've been intrested like sexually intrested but it's never gone to  attracted. I get turned on I read romance novels  and arotica off through the website literotica.  A masturbate regularly when I say rightfully they say about 1 to 3 times a week sometimes more I don't think anything is wrong with me they could be that I just haven't found anybody I'm attracted to but I did wonder if anybody has any insight mean that I may be  asexual?,asexuality
Hi I dont want to have sex but I want other stuff? (A little detailed I'm kind of an oversharer),"Hi. So I'm a F, 24, and I dont want sex, ever. I never think ""oh yeah sex, I want to do that later"" or ""wow that person is pretty I want to have sex with them"" but I have sex anyways. I havent told my bf, M, 25, that I feel this way. I even initiate fairly often because I want him to feel desired but if hes not in the mood that's like the best news. I even like sex after its started. I mean the sooner it's over the better even if it is starting to feel good but I can climax. In fact I do really easily, usually a couple times if the sex lasts more than like 6 minutes. But it's boring for me. I have some kinks that actually turn me on, like the idea of getting tied up turns me on, but I dont want to have sex even when I'm turned on. I do like getting got off with like a finger just as long as it stays on the outside.  That makes me think I cant be asexual. I think I would be more than happy if someone didnt ever want to penetrate me again, but I'd be sad if I could never have someone kiss me, or tease me or use there fingers. So, what sexuality is that? Or is it just straight? ",asexuality
Do asexuals have a conflict with LGBT? Do LGBT have a conflict with asexuality?,,asexuality
Has anyone tried dating sites/apps?,"I'm curious about getting into the dating scene. I've only dated once, in my freshman year of college. It was a ""way more interested in me than I was in him"" situation. It was also really chaste (pecks on the mouth).

So it's a combo of ""I want to try dating"" and feeling weird that I lack experience my friends have. Also I'm, like, really really oblivious when it comes to certain cues like flirting. The few times I haven't been I've just been uncomfortable. I thought a dating site would streamline things a bit so I at least know that this person is hypothetically interested. 

What have you guys thought about dating this way? Have you ever revealed you're ace and gotten some weird flack? Was it widely successful? What apps or sites did you like or dislike?",asexuality
Am I the bad guy or the victim? Or neither?,"I feel broken, defective. I'm 26 and I've never experienced sexual attraction. I feel everything else: attachment, love, aesthetic attraction, even arousal on occasion... But never in connection with an actual person. It took me a long time to understand this because teenage me was oblivious. I didn't fully realise what it meant until recently.

Now that I do, and that I want to be open about it with my partner of 8 years, he acts like it's a choice I made, that I'm inflicting upon him. In a way he's right, I didn't disclose my low libido when we started dating because I didn't know it was different. We were just out of high school and for us late bloomers sex was something new and exciting, so of course I was into it. But now that the novelty has worn off, I'm just not that interested in sex any more. He is, because he's a normal human being.

He loves me, I love him, but I'm simply not sexually attracted to him, or anyone else. He's miserable about having to initiate all the time, and mostly I'm willing but not into it. I feel ashamed of myself for having trapped him in this situation. He's too decent and loyal to do anything other than resent me, and of course he's strictly monogamous.

I don't know if I could ever make him truly happy. Would it be kinder to let him go?",asexuality
"The drunker I get, the more of a flaming ace I become","Boy, I was just thinking about how I curve straight men when I was drunk and I am like the fuck. I've only had sex with a guy drunk once, and it was because he was a friend I trusted, and we planned to meet up already when I was sober. Even then I was just saying dumb shit the whole time because that's just how I am. I have no idea why he keeps hitting me up. 

* I remember once at a party some guy was like ""let's do shots"" and I was like ""I love you,"" and this man starts trying to get close and feel me. I responded with ""platonically lol."" And then he just fucking left me I didn't even get the shots OK. 
* I'll make out with dudes for fun and then when they want me to go to bed I'm just like ""you fucked up, I'm queer, c'ya.""
* Drunk me receiving a ""you up"" text story. I don't think I ever talked to him ever that. 
   * him: ""u up""
   * me: ""ya y""
   * him: ""i'm horny""
   * me: ""lol just watch porn""

God I hate myself why am I like this. ",asexuality
DAE wish they aren’t ace?,"I can appreciate that I’m unique etc etc and I remember seeing some biblical quotes for LGBTQ+ that said that ace people are closer to God because they’re more like him and like I guess those things make me feel better but.

A lot of times I just feel like my life would be so much easier if I wasn’t ace. I’m scared of joining dating apps because I know what people are looking for on those and I’m not it. I’ve never dated anyone, and maybe it’s just because I’m not attractive enough, but I’ve been asked out maybe twice in my life. I wonder sometimes if people just... get a vibe. I’m nice enough I think, and I usually put effort into my appearance. I’ll admit I gained some weight in college which probably has to do with it but in high school I was like a size 6-7 and nobody liked me then either. 

I can never relate when people share sex stories and I get uncomfortable which shuts people down because they think I’m judging them. I get judged when people know I haven’t had sex but I never like those people enough to tell them the reason why. 

Idk. It just feels like life would be easier if I could just have random hookups or join apps or anything. ",asexuality
Quotes for Aces,"With Christmas coming up I wanted to get the Ace in my life a bracelet with some sort of engraving.

I want something sweet but most quotes are full on romance overload. So what kind of quotes/phrases do you like? Do you think it's a terrible idea? What sort of meaningful gifts do you like? 

Aiming for something that makes her feel safe, special, protected and cared for without going romance overboard. ",asexuality
"Aces who have kinks and/or fetishes, how open are you to sexual activity that heavily incorporates them? Would you consider yourself to be sexually attracted to people that would engage in those kinks/fetishes with you?",,asexuality
When you went through puberty did you feel like you really changed much?,"I mean the stereotype of teens that age is always horny and hormonal, constantly talking about sex. However when I look back on it I really dont remember any of that. I just continued living through it with the exact same.",asexuality
Calling Asexuals interested in helping with a Student Documentary,,asexuality
How do I go about not feeling so lonely?,"Hey, this is mostly just me getting my thoughts in order, so feel free to ignore.

Being asexual and not really wanting a relationship, I feel I'm kind of backing myself into a corner in that I have no one I'm really comfortable around. I had a rather major depressive episode in my late teens, (I won't go into detail on that right now) as a result I don't have any friends that I talk to regularly (or consider to hold substantial attachment for or from me) and I'm somewhat stunted in my ability to make friends. I really just want someone who I can hug and feel comfortable talking to, and while I do have family, I can't say I really have THAT comfortable a relationship with any of them.

Also, the last time I did get to talk and cuddle with someone (almost a year ago now), he'd kissed me... Which, while he did stop once he figured out I wasn't into it and I think it was meant to be more comforting and supportive than a display of desire (I'd been crying my eyes out for like, 30 minutes before it'd happened), It still made me pretty uncomfortable.",asexuality
Coming out as ace when you're an ace lesbian,"So this is my first post here on this subreddit, but I wanted to share my coming out experiences as ace. So I first figured out I was ace in sophomore year of high school and that's also when I decided to come out. My best friend took it well and she herself told me she was aroace, so that was super cool. When I told my other friends, I just remember this one guy who asked me straight up, ""So are you a plant?"" He was dead serious too, which made it all the worse. That honestly pissed me off so bad but I get it, he thought I might the biological asexual, like reproducing asexually. So that was my first bad experience with coming out as ace.

Something kinda worse happened at that high school and the GSA club at the school decided that ah yes, the A in LGBTQA+ stood for ally. I was pissed off at that too and at that point decided that I wouldn't come out as ace anymore, just as a lesbian. When I transferred to a different school, I felt more comfortable finally telling my friends I was ace, and those experiences were nice. Of course, I always did act extremely gay so they tend to forget after a few months that I'm even ace. I didn't mind that too much.

And then, I came out to my teacher, someone who I really looked up to. She was totally cool with me being gay, but when I told her I was also ace, she asked if I was sure and I should wait until I try stuff before making up my mind about it. And honestly, I understand she came from a place of genuine concern and all that, but the fact that she really questioned my sexuality like that when I came out as ace but not as a lesbian, that's when I decided that I didn't want to really risk it anymore. 

At the university I'm at now, the student population aren't exactly the most ""woke"" about social issues, let alone LGBT+ ones, so I just don't say I'm ace anymore. I'm almost guaranteed that they'll either ask me what asexual meant, whether I was sure, whether I should try sex first, or any other shitty responses I don't have the energy to deal with. I do come out as gay though because surprisingly, they don't ask any questions and just accept the fact.

TL;DR  
Coming out as ace is harder than coming out as a lesbian because homosexuality is at least known while there's still lots  of misinformation about asexuality along with just ignorance about it. ",asexuality
I got bee pins with aro and ace colors!,,asexuality
"Will ""Invisible Orientation"" help anyone ? I have a copy of the book that I read when a friend came out to me, and I no longer need it. Will ship to anywhere in US. Price : Wishing me good luck for my midterms..",,asexuality
Do you think the disinterest in sex...,"is due to lack of attraction? Or low libido? If it's the latter, can hormone altering pills help?",asexuality
Funny stories about being ace,"Wanted to put something a little lighthearted on here. 

So a few years ago I went on a 10-day Contiki tour in Europe. Our group (about 50 people) had a few couples, but mostly it was of solo travelers or people traveling with their friends. And at one point (I think in Switzerland) our tour guide gave all of us single travelers a piece of chocolate, and told us to let it melt in our mouths because we'd been without sex since the tour started (well I'm sure some people hooked up on the tour) and that chocolate was the next best thing to sex. We were supposed to close our eyes and imagine having sex with our dream partner and all of this. I was just closing my eyes thinking, ""yum this is good chocolate."" 

I didn't know I was ace at the time (didn't know there was a word for it then), but I just remember thinking, ""really? are people are so desperate for sex? They can't go for a week or ten days without it? What's the big deal?""

I like chocolate, but if I couldn't have chocolate for ten days I'd survive. Wrapping my mind around this idea that non-aces are like ""omg I haven't had sex in a few days. Help!"" was weird. Thinking about that experience now it just makes me laugh. I think I found out about asexual as a term a few months after this trip. 

I'm curious if anyone else has any weird stories like this where they just couldn't understand an allo or allo-situation.
",asexuality
Coming out to my girlfriend,"I (18 male) recently realised I am, or at least think I am, asexual, but hetero-romantically inclined (not sure if that's the right term?) And I've had a girlfriend for about a month. Sex has never been on the table, but I think she should know, and I'm not really sure how to go about coming out but staying in the relationship and not coming across as weird. Any advice you have to offer would be appreciated, because I'm worried she won't want to continue with the relationship ",asexuality
The moment i realized it,"Um, so this is new, bear with me!

The moment i realized i was ace was when I got my friend a girlfriend. We had been friends since middle school and we had just started our second semester in 10th grade. He was the closest guy friend that I had at the time. Now that i look back, i can see some hints that he liked me, but I digress.

I remember meeting this one girl (let's call her Katie) that had recently joined our friend group was avoiding me and glaring at me everytime I was near Kyle. It was weird for the group, especially since i was the ""mom friend"" of the group. I didn't want another fight to break up the group, so one day, I approached her at her locker before school. She automatically assumed that me and Kyle were dating, and she was jealous because she liked him. I told her the truth, we weren't dating, and that I was just a really good friend to him. I liked him, but not like that. He was like a brother to me. We became friends after that. 

About a month later, she pulls me aside and asks me for help. She wants to date Kyle, but she doesn't know what to do. I'm delighted! They're really cute together! I'm here for this! So I agree to be her wingwoman. I start leaving them together more, I bring up topics that I know they both enjoy, generally just making sure that my Kyle sees how cool she is. But he's not seeing it. He's walking me to my locker, he brings me my favorite candy, really just sticking with me. So i pull out the big guns. One day, the ""dad"" of the group, a senior offers to buy us some doughnuts. But he needs someone to ride with him as a alibi that he went to pick someone up. I see my chance, so i offer to go. Before i leave, I ask Kyle to walk Katie to her locker because she got a new one and needs help finding it. My plan worked because when were came back they were talking and getting along well. I mention to him later that she does like you a lot. Not even next week, they had started dating! I was so proud for them! I was super happy that Kyle and Katie were happy. But one of my friends asked if i was jealous, since she ""stole"" him from me. I was confused How? I thought of him as a brother, why would i be jealous? They answered that it was obvious that Kyle had a giant crush on me. I shrugged it off.

Now that i look back. It was kinda obvious that he liked me, which makes me feel bad! But whatever, they were a cuter couple in my eye. 

TL;DR: I had a friend who liked me, so i got him a girlfriend. 
",asexuality
I don't really like cake either :(,my life sucks,asexuality
Thank you for being you!,"27m here...

&amp;#x200B;

Didn't even realize this was a thing until a month or two ago... It's definitely made me do some thinking. I just found the subreddit the other day and have been reading through posts like a madman lol.

My current relationship is suffering from lack of sex. Which is nothing new to me. I have no problem going four months or more without sex while in a relationship (and I'm talking about while living together).  Out of all my long-term relationships (three over a year or two), every single one of my SOs has accused me of being gay. Which as you can bet led to tears and nasty arguments.

Now I'm not gay, but my best friend since middle school is now openly gay- even though he struggled with coming out for some time. I've definitely been attracted to some guys, but never sexually- and more so attracted to their attention. 

Same goes with women though, I definitely have a type- and I enjoy looking at a nice butt (some guys have nice asses too!), but more so because I appreciate people who take care of themselves. Although I'll admit I used to take care of myself better- but have stopped working out and gained a little weight after becoming depressed and lost in relationship problems (mostly because I don't want to have sex but I love her more than anything and have been confused as to why...). 

I enjoy sex, but I'm more attracted to pleasing my partner- and the companionship attached to the act, rather than the act itself. All of my relationships have started out with a decent amount of sex- but the frequency always fell off fast- and they all ended more or less because for want of sex on my end. In my head I can't help but think of sex in relationships as a power move, he/she who controls the sex controls the relationship- and it's always felt like something I had to do, and had to do well, in order to maintain my relationship.  

I can personally relate to so much of this subreddit- reading what everyone here has to say has made me a lot more comfortable with being me, so I just wanted to say- Thank you for being you! And I hope you have a wonderful day!",asexuality
Do you think I am asexual?," I'm sorry if this isn't an appropriate post. English isn't my first language.

I'm a woman in my late 20s. I've struggled with dating and relationships and questioned my sexuality whole my life. I first thought I was straight who just gets no love, then maybe I'm gay, or maybe I'm bisexual, and now I'm thinking maybe I'm asexual. I took a quiz today, and it says I'm lithsexual. Is it even a thing?

I've never had sex in my life or in a relationship with anyone. I can't really say that I don't like sex or I don't want to have sex when I haven't had it, I actually don't know for sure if I don't want to have sex at all. Maybe I'm awfully afraid of it, or feel guilty about sex? Or I have very high standards? So I've tried to have sex with someone, hopefully with a boyfriend, for many years. I got more and more miserable the more I try.

Every time I meet someone interested in me, I automatically think of the chances I would have sex with them, because I badly want to try to see if I really don't like it. I don't know why but I just don't feel like it most of the time. I can't just force myself to have sex, could I? This thought makes me very uncomfortable and I push them away. I feel extremely bad for them because I think I can't give them what they want from me. Not just sex, but the intimacy, the connection. Ideally, I want to be connected with them platonically first, but it's obvious they want more even though they say it's fine being just friends. After telling them I might be asexual, I became friends with some of them, but I am still not very comfortable.

There were a few guys who I found extremely attractive and gave me butterflies. But I still don't think about ""sex"", whatever that means. Do I other people think they want to have sex if they like them a lot? Do other people want to see them naked? I get very excited and nervous around them, I consider that as ""sexual attraction"". They are such cool people and I would love to be in a relationship with them. I wouldn't mind having sex with them if that's what they want. Didn't try it yet, so I can't be sure. They are usually out of my league, though. I'm even thinking about paying a hooker to have sex with me, to take my virginity.

For some reason, I usually find kissing very gross. I like cuddling a lot if I like them, but not kiss. Only when I'm drunk I can kiss without being grossed out. But I'm not sure if that's because I haven't found the right people.

So, I got back to try being with girls again. Not with a lot of success, because where I'm from LGBT isn't as open as the western world and it's a lot harder to find lesbians. And honestly I wasn't that excited about this idea than I thought. I craved male attention even though I could see myself being romantically attracted to women and I've been attracted to women before. I even get tingly feeling when I touch boobs, thighs, ass. I still crave male attention. I think it's more of an idealization than actual attraction too, I think. I just want to look at them and appreciate their beauty. I just don't have a lot of fun when I'm dating a girl than I'm dating a guy. But I think I can try more.

Another thing is, I masturbate and watch porn regularly. Quite often, in fact. Like 3 times a week. I never think about someone and I only focus on my orgasm though. I don't like to look at vagina for some reason so I almost only watch kiss, cuddling, anal, oral, SM or other stuff. Sound and the pleasure of people is what turns me on, and pain, to be honest. But I do not want to be part of that. I just like to get pleasure from clitoral stimulation and that's it. I never think about wanting other people to give me pleasure. I am satisfied and I am happy. I can't be sure though, that if it's because I am afraid of having sex with someone of it's because I'm asexual.

I am so frustrated because I am really lonely. I don't think I have connection with anyone. I have friends, but it's different from a relationship. I want to be in a relationship. I want to be intimate with someone, not physically but emotionally. I don't know what to do anymore.

I don't know if anyone will read this, but thanks a lot if you did.",asexuality
Question for all the aces!,When you guys tell other people your ace for the first time what reactions do you normally get?,asexuality
My roommate is the absolute sweetest!! She came home today and gave me this after I told her I was ace!,,asexuality
Friends find me weird.,Whenever i tell my friends I am okay with meeting women and even dating but dont want sex. No one believes me and they think I am just pretending or its just a phase. Its incredibly frustrating for me. Cause its impossible for them to understand why would anyone not want to have sex. ,asexuality
Other ace symbols.,"I feel like Morrissey from the smiths is another great example of an ace icon; a lot of his music has helped me cope with my asexuality, and it seems like a lot of songs he's made are based on his lack of sexual desire. Just a thought!",asexuality
Do you compromise re: sex in an ace/non-ace relationship?,"The tl;dr version is that 2 months into my relationship, my boyfriend came out to me as ace. He said he's gone through ace phases on-and-off before. That said, I miss interacting sexually with him and I've been abstinent from any/all sexual activity for around 8+ months. Is there a type of compromise an ace and non-ace person come to? Does the ace-identifying person default as the person 100% in charge of whether or not you're both sexually active? I'm asking because I'm trying to do my best to respect his boundaries, but I need points of reference from others and input on how others believe the sexual dynamic of a relationship should work.

&amp;#x200B;

Thank you!",asexuality
Is it common for Apothisexuals to have Erotophobia?,,asexuality
Slightly Asexual,"So from what I understand about it is that there is a spectrum of asexuality. This spectrum seems to go from mildly uninterested (which is me), all the way to those who are completely disgusted by sex. I've had sex and enjoyed it, but it wasn't the greatest thing in the world to me.

 I'm more of the romantic type; I get more out of being in a relationship. I always turn down any opportunity of having casual sex because it just doesn't interest me at all. I'm not bad looking so I have had the opportunity before. I'm pretty shy so I really have to get to know a person before I'm willing to do anything even close to being intimate. The idea of a one night stand actually terrifies me. 

Considering I'm right on the edge of the spectrum I was wondering if it is okay if I call myself 'ace?' I'm running out of ways to be able to describe myself lol. ",asexuality
"How do you ""know""?","Sorry about the lack of organization but I wrote this stream of conciseness cause I can't really organize my thoughts

&amp;#x200B;

I'm 18, never had a crush or felt that lust to have sex. I've been asked out by girls a couple of times in high school but never thought it would be interesting or even worth my time. My main question is: How do you know you're asexual or aromantic instead of just not interested or ready yet. I'm definitely sure I don't have a girlfriend but when I do have dreams of having one it's just like having a really close friend and we play games together. This is kind of stream of conciseness right now, so my other question was how do people know they want a romantic relationship. Like, I've never felt that feeling or interest. Do all normal people want to be in a relationship at some point in there lives? Im basically asking how do you know if you're asexual instead of just straight and not wanting to be in a relationship. I can safely say im 100% not interested in having sex or being in a romantic relationship but I can't predict the future so it's really impossible to know if I just need to find ""The one"". I did have a crush once in kindergarten and 3rd grade but then never again. I'm wondering if it was a crush because I'm not sure if it's even possible to have those feelings that young. To be honest I would definitely prefer to be asexual / aromantic because I have by choice never been in a relationship and I'm in my first year of college now and I still don't want to be in that kind of relationship. If I ever did decide I want that it would be really hard because I would have no idea what it's like to be in a relationship and if I wait too long I might end up being 30 and not married if I do want someone. Also I don't feel disgusted by sex so I do wonder if I saw a naked woman in the right setting if my opinion would change but if I'm thinking about it I would 100% say no but again I can't predict the future.

&amp;#x200B;

If I wanted  to be in a relationship it would be pretty easy to find out based on if I wanted to have sex with them but I don't want to be in a relationship in the first place.

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",asexuality
What am I?,"This is pretty complicated so I hope I do an okay job of explaining everything. I really hope someone can help me because I’m really lost.

Im a hetero female. I’m intensely attracted to guys and I’d even say I’m “boy crazy”. I love the male form and I often watch gay pornography. I don’t really like hetero porn because there isn’t as much focus on the men. I’ve always fantasized about sexual situations which I’m not involved in. Guys by themselves or with other guys. 

The problem is that I don’t feel like I can bring myself to have sex. I have the desire to see them naked and touch them but not to have the same done to me.

I’m a 23 year old virgin and I’ve never had a boyfriend. I have self esteem issues regarding my looks and my body (especially my body), which probably plays a part. I also have social anxiety that makes meeting and getting close to people hard. 

I’ve been in situations where I could have had sex but I always chicken out. The idea of getting naked and having sex horrifies me. I’m also afraid that guys will be turned off by the fact that I won’t let them reciprocate during sexual activities. 

I often hope to myself that if I got close enough to someone, that it would all come naturally but I feel that I’m too far gone. 

I thought that maybe I was asexual but it doesn’t feel right. I’ve thought about aegosexuality but I’d don’t I quite fit that because of my desire to pleasure others.

Sorry for such a long post and sorry if I sound silly but I’d really appreciate any input.",asexuality
Still struggling to find a guy who likes me and understands me,"I don't want penetrative sex, I don't want kids, I just want a long term loving relationship for companionship. Anyone else feel the same? I'm heteroromantic asexual. I don't drink or smoke and I'd say I'm spiritual. Have many other ppl been successful, where ate the best places for aces to meet ppl to date?",asexuality
Why does it take so long for you to notice you're ace?,"Many people say they knew they were asexual around 20 years old, but me, I am not even close to 20.

As a common sense, you know that many people get married because they love each other, right?
And then you eventually know why children are born, and then don't you be like ""What the heck!?""?
Can you imagine ""love someone sexually""?
I can't.",asexuality
Is it ok to call myself an ace if I'm really just ugly and unattractive to other people?,,asexuality
I get horny in my dreams and i have no idea why,"So last night i had a dream and for some reason out of the blue i thought, PORNHUB! And throughout my dream i was just really horny. i didnt act upon anything but there was this bottled up disire for sex and when i woke up it was all gone. If i have no sexual desire in the real world, why do i get horny in my dreams?

P.S, not the first dream like this. ",asexuality
You are the only who can understand me,"I am recently feeling bad about my life. I have 23 years, ace since my adolescence and i’m going through a period of sadness, not depression fortunately. I am afraid, the more the time goes on, of being alone. I have few friends and recently got in a good friendship with a friend i met on PS4, i love him like a brother but i’m introverted enough to share with him my mood. I’d like to be loved, to share time with someone who can understand me accept me and love me, so i seem to search this in friendships but friendships are not forever and even if they last long it’s not the same of romantic relations. All this doesn’t help me to succeed in my studying career (i am at university), and rn i’m a bit desperate to ask you, on reddit, to give me some suggestions. I want to be happy, i want to wake up at morning and feeling better than this.
Sorry for my bad english.",asexuality
Hardcore Advice Needed! I've done all the thinking I can on this...,"I apologize in advance for this being lengthy, but I needed this release and I hope people can give me some insight or relay similar experiences.

\*Deep exhale\* Alright, so last Nov/Dec I started seeing a guy. We didn't hang out for any other reason other than we enjoyed each other's company. We started hanging out every day, and then at some point he stayed over 5/7 days of the week. Meeting someone who I had connected with after so many years of thinking I'd never find anyone was so phenomenal, and felt like a high I've never experienced previously. We talked about sexuality at great length and how we at several points throughout our lives had periods of being asexual. I used to be a member of several ace message boards, went years without being even remotely physical with anyone, etc. That said, the first two months or so we were very sexual. Since I wasn't heavily experienced sexually (though I've always known how to navigate just fine), it felt so cathartic to be in a situation in which I didn't have to feel self-conscious. My body finally felt loved and celebrated in all the right ways, and I was beginning to open up to new ideas and wanting to explore. He'd leave bites, scratches and bruises (all consensual, of course) and it was something I'd never had before and always looked forward to.

&amp;#x200B;

Around March, I'd moved into a new apartment and he still at first wasn't officially living with me. He was still staying 5/7 days of the week, and after a month or two he finally just gave up the charade and moved in entirely. Before I'd moved into the new place, we weren't very sexually active. This was okay for me, as I didn't seek him out originally for sex and the connection we had transcended it. That said, I remember us having a conversation about BDSM dynamics and flogging, etc. He said he had a flogger and would bring it over to the new place. He did, but it to this day has sat in the closet. And so we're going about our lives and everything's working out wonderfully, and then one day instead of his usual full mutual parsed-lips kiss, he puckered his lips and gave me the quickest of kisses. This may sound silly to you, but a massive red flag went off in my head. No matter how sexually inactive we were, we still kissed in the morning, night, and several times throughout the day if we were together. I kind of went into shock, because my mind jumped to so many conclusions and I just went to bed numb and stayed in bed until 1pm, which I never do. As an open communicator, I brought it up to him when I woke up and I asked him what that was all about. He mentioned that he's been feeling ace again, and that he's averse to anything sexual. It was a hard pill to swallow, because it felt like I was in mourning over something I had lost. I had one conversation after that about it with him in that house, and that same night he came home and was sexual -- it felt exhilerating and yet I somehow felt guilty because I'd never want to pressure him into doing anything he's not comfortable. After all, I'm in this relationship because I admire and appreciate HIM -- not what I can morph or turn him into. Also, being ace isn't being broken or in need of fixing and I had told him as much.

&amp;#x200B;

Moving forward, we signed a year lease together at a new location in late August. We stayed with a couple who are both of our mutual friends, and one of them identifies as ace as well. I remember talking to their partner one night on the porch and they said they were so sexually frustrated because they hadn't been sexual in 3 weeks. And not to discount or minimize anyone else's particular situation, but I remember being gut-punched and wanting to laugh because at this point it'd been around 7 months for me.

&amp;#x200B;

So we're in this new place and getting settled and it feels great building a life together with someone. We furnish the apartment and split the costs of everything and it feels great having that level of commitment with someone. I started noticing that instead of sleeping nude with me, he'd sleep with basketball shorts on and a blanket inbetween us so that he's not pressed against me in more sensitive areas. And then one day I was doing my makeup in the bathroom mirror and noticed a particularly strong and distinctive smell. It was from the rag hanging below the mirror which had clearly been used to masturbate with. This messed me up so much mentally and emotionally because of my past traumas. I'd only ever been in two relationships before -- both partners stopped being sexual with me and lied to me stating they were asexual (which they blatantly lied about) and proceeded to cheat on me. I'm going to toot my own horn here because I was extremely compassionate, loving and kind through both those processes. I simply wanted open communication and honesty, and instead I was gaslighted and dragged through the mud emotionally. And why I bring those former relationships up is because they'd go to the bathroom and masturbate -- chronically -- even after telling me they weren't sexual whatsoever and specifically mentioned not feeling any desire to masturbate. And so though I know being ace means being anywhere on a spectrum, it still hurt me so deeply that all these old wounds had opened up. I did my best to work through it, but literally every time my boyfriend would go to the bathroom I'd have a full-blown panic attack. Which is absolutely ridiculous and not how one should live their life. I did everything I could to work through my own issues -- as they were my own -- to figure out a way to heal and come to a healthy mindset and place of acceptance.

&amp;#x200B;

Then one day I was in the restroom and I'd left my phone out in the living room. My boyfriend had left his tablet in the bathroom, and so I opened it to check the time. What popped up, however, was porn. I need to clarify that we've had a very mutual agreement that we have access to each other's devices, accounts, etc, but we've never once exercised that because we have a vice grip on our level of trust. If you can't trust someone, I don't see how you can be with them. It will only cause you constant fear, pain and anxiety. That said, I felt so horrible about stumbling upon that discovery. Again, his life is his own, but this has now affected me to a point where it's causing me daily pain and distress. I brought it up to him and he said that he masturbates to relieve himself on a physical -- not sexual -- level, he doesn't do it while looking or watching porn, and that he looks at porn or sexually explicit content as a means to try to potentially feel sexually active once again. I'm not here to discount what he says, but it certainly was of little to no relief to me. I know for a fact he's not cheating, he's very loyal, he talks about the future (ie. where we want to live together next year) and it seems that he's just genuinely going through some heavy inner dialogue about his sexuality.

&amp;#x200B;

About a week later, I was on Tumblr and lo and behold I stumbled upon his ex's blog while looking at Tumblrs of our mutual friends. It was SUCH an intense and obtuse thing to have happen, though it makes sense because we all belong to a goth/alternative community in the city we live and everyone pretty much knows one another and is connected on social media. That said, I read posts she made about how much she missed sex with him, how he was hyper-sexual, how they experimented and had sex in public. Everything was extremely detailed and explicit, and I finally just broke. I spent all day on the floor crying after that. I was mourning this person who was so outwardly passionate about their partner -- even platonically -- and I was mourning his body and how much I missed it. I wanted and have been wanting to do all of the things she wrote about. Things I had talked to him about wanting to do within the first month of dating. I just imagined him in all these vivid situations and wanted nothing more than to have a part of that.

&amp;#x200B;

I brought it up to him and it was essentially just a cathartic way for me to release emotion. It wasn't dramatic -- it was just me wanting to be on the same page. And everything was fine afterward, though nothing had changed between us sexually or physically. Now fast-forward to about a week later and last night he was masturbating in the bathroom (the acoustics in there are SO awful because you can hear near about everything) while I was waiting for him in bed in the room over. I started panicking again, and so I just went out for a smoke and when he went to the bedroom I stayed on the couch and slept there. It's the first time we've ever slept apart from each other, and it's also the first time I'm just not sure if I can do this anymore. I love him so very much, but I simply can't afford to be stuck in this cycle of anxiety. I've been patient, kind and understanding but the pain within me won't go away. We're building our lives together here, and even while I was typing this he asked me which room we should paint first, but I just don't know how to move forward. I don't want to be poly just to scapegoat my sexual desires onto some random other person. Though I may not be ace right now, I'm VERY particular about with whom and how I share my body with others. I want my boyfriend's body and physicality, not someone else's. I've contemplated it heavily in the past two weeks, and as much of a solution as that'd be -- and one he'd surely be fine with, as he's been in poly relationships before -- it's just not something I want.

&amp;#x200B;

If you read this far, I'm groveling you. I know this was quite lengthy, but I wanted to be able to surmise the entire situation. That said, does anyone have any advice? Has anyone been in a similar situation? Usually I'm SO independent, so it's jarring and weird for me to post something like this online, but I've exhausted all my own resources and attempts at figuring out what to do.

&amp;#x200B;

Thank you. &lt;3",asexuality
"Casually house-hunting when, suddenly, I find my perfect kitchen!",,asexuality
I wish I could have figured this out twenty years ago.,"So here’s the thing. I’m 37, and I’m a virgin... because the thought of sex really kind of creeps me out. I’ve dated, but never seriously. They have all been either long distance or with ultra-religious zealots who don’t believe in sex before marriage. Neither option has really worked out for me. Everyone is always telling me that I’ll meet the right person, or some such thing. And I’m always afraid to give my honest answer: I just want someone to cuddle with while I game, travel with me when we can, and grow old together. I have never been interested in more than a romantic relationship. I get crushes on people, but I fantasize about doing such wild and crazy things such as holding hands. It’s been this way for me forever... I figured I was just broken. I’m really good at pretending to be what society expects, to a certain extent. 

I didn’t realize asexuality was a thing until a friend of mine said something one night about 6 months ago (there was a lot of alcohol and I don’t even know what I was saying but I was crying to my friend about something when he interrupted and said “I'm asexual, how do you think I feel?” And it literally stopped me in my tracks.) I didn’t know it was an option. 
But now that I know? It makes so much sense. And I feel like it is me. And I belong.



Except I don’t.  And I can’t. 
There are too many lies, too many people who believe I am a normal woman with a healthy sex drive. Too many people who wouldn’t understand. Too much time spent desperately trying to fit into what is expected of me. I can’t be me, because I don’t know how. 

I don’t even know what my point is, but this is my life now... thanks for reading.",asexuality
Why don't we have an r/asexuality chat room? Does anybody want to chat in general?,"I think it would be fun if we had an asexuality chat room. I'm not a mod so I don't think it's up to me. Does anyone want to chat? I don't know what to say to strangers but I'm so lonely and I don't want to bug my friends by calling them up when I have nothing to say. Realizing I'm ace has just been a huge difficulty in my life and I feel sort of lost and confused ever since I realized it almost three months ago. Message me if you want, leave a comment encouraging others to message you if you want to get some messages too",asexuality
Starting a project about asexuality.,"Hey guys! I’m starting a presentation about asexuality for my alliance club. I have some talking points down to start: the different types of attraction, the difference between asexuality/libido/celibacy, scientific research into asexuality, what falls under asexuality, and ignorance/exclusion in the lgbt community. Does anybody else has some suggestions that you believe are important to inform people about? All input is welcome, so are personal experiences!

I also posted this in the discord. ",asexuality
I got my ring!,,asexuality
Supporting and including an ace friend,"Hi guys. I hope this is an okay place to come for a bit of advice! 

One of my best friends is asexual. She doesn't talk about it much at all, and she's still relatively early in her coming out process (only myself and a couple of other close friends know, to my knowledge). I really want to learn how to better support and include her, because I admittedly don't know a great deal about asexuality and the things ace people experience. I'm especially hoping that I can be a better support system to her when it comes to things like ""Never have I ever"" games and sexual chats that often end up happening at parties etc. There's a Halloween party coming up this month, where I know games like that will be played. I don't think she'd want me to make a fuss or stop people playing, but I'm wondering if you guys, gals and pals have any advice for how I can subtly make her feel more comfortable and included in that sort of environment?

I apologise completely for my ignorance, and I really appreciate any words of wisdom :-) ",asexuality
If there were cuddle hookups would you do it?,"If hooking up to cuddle was as easy as hooking up for sex i would do it all the time. I'm so lonely and I just want to cuddle someone

EDIT: anybody in PA? ",asexuality
A big win!!,"I've never made a reddit post before, but I'm super excited and wanted to share!! A couple months ago, I met my first ace friends. Fast forward to now, looks like I'm going to be moving in with them! There's 4 of us, so essentially we make a four of a kind hand ◇♧♤♡ Even better I can bring my kitty and he'll have friends too (hopefully not enemies). Anyways, just some positive vibes from a shy closeted little ace haha",asexuality
Big Mouth Netflix Show,"For anyone who watches this show, Season 2 Episode 9

&amp;#x200B;

I started bawling because jessi has not been very sexual or romantically interested in anyone this season and my therapist said I'm probably asexual because I became depressed really young and around the same time i went through puberty, so I wasn't able to develop properly :-) really heavy stuff. wanted to know if anyone relates or watches the show",asexuality
Our (unknown to the world) Precious...,"Yesterday at work (I'm a casheer if that's even relevant) a guy was buying a cup of coffee when I noticed his 60px solid black ring on his right hand. I've never met another ace, so I asked him if that's an ace ring (trying not to sound too excited about meeting another ace) and he replied ""no, whats an ace ring?""

I smiled and said nothing though the feeling of hopelessness hit me like the bolder from Indiana Jones.

I don't think much about my sexual orientation, cause when I do I feel so left out. Have any of you guys met another ace irl because of ace merch? ",asexuality
Dwayne from Death in Paradise has a particular fetching suit....,,asexuality
"Had my first date tonight at age 22, feeling confused","Back-story, I'm trans (male to female) 7 months into my transition. In the past I have thought I was gay, straight, and bisexual at different times. Most recently I've though I was only into dudes. I've never dated and only had one sexual experience, due to the fact that I've hated my body and not wanted to share it with anyone else.  

That one sexual experience, from a year ago, was basically a kink hookup, where we did BDSM stuff but nothing romantic or penetrative. That was enjoyable. I enjoy pain and being dominated.  

Tonight I went on my first date, with a guy. It went well, we had plenty to talk about and it never felt awkward (which is huge, because I feel like such an awkward person). I agreed to go back to his place and we made out, I gave him oral, a hand-job, but nothing more than that. He offered to give me oral but I told him I wasn't interested in it (cause I hate my genitals).  

So, what I enjoyed: The conversations, laughing, cuddling, him putting his hands all over my body, me putting his hands all over his.  

What I didn't enjoy: This was my first time kissing, and I didn't like it. It felt weird and unpleasant to me, just bleh. Giving head, wasn't that great. I did it with a condom because I'm paranoid of STDs and so the latex taste didn't help much for sure. Giving him a handjob was whatever - I somewhat enjoyed seeing him get off but it wasn't that special or anything.  

So yeah, all in all the sex just wasn't that great - especially the kissing, I hated that. I know the first few times usually suck, but I'm just not sure if it's something I'm all that interested in doing tbh. 

I find guys attractive and sexually lust for them, but I'm not sure I want to actually have sex with them? And women, I mean I find to be incredibly beautiful but I haven't had a fantasy of having sex with a woman in like 8 years.  

Idk, I'm starting to wonder if I might be ace? I feel like I'm missing some component out of sex that other people seems to get from it. I know just 1 or 2 experiences is not a lot to base this off of, but I'm starting to think down this path because I just don't feel very motivated to try it again.",asexuality
Needed to vent,"I recently, (like, 2 months ago) came out as ace, and at first I was super excited and happy because I had finally figured out a core aspect of myself that I'd been struggling with for a long time! Realising that I dont feel sexual attraction, and I dont need to was such a huge relief for me!! 

Now however, I've fallen into a bit of depression because I still feel romantic attraction, but every time I'm interested in somebody, they're always allo, and see sex as something fundamentally important to a relationship. I know its a bit of a stretch to think I'll be alone forever, but damn it really feels like it sometimes. As a side note, I'm a trans girl so that already makes my dating options limited as it is :( ",asexuality
Asexual And Having Sex With Boyfriend,"So I'm totally cool with being asexual, I just don't share it with everyone so only my best friend knows. 

When I've met my first boyfriend, I didn't tell him. Now I'm stuck pretending to be turned on and faking orgasms etc. Oh well. I didn't tell him because I thought it might turn him away and I could see a bright future many years ahead of us... when he's not a 20 year old man. 

Then when we officially got together, I didn't tell him because I didn't want him to feel undesired. I adore him. His face makes me stop breathing. His body is a fine piece of greek sculptury. Our hobbies and worldviews allign. He's kind and smart and overal just awww let me hug you and maybe we should procreate one day. But sex is just not interesting for me, despite how experienced and hard-working he is.

I'm wondering whether I should tell him. We only have time to meet once a week or so, so it's not like I'm constantly buggered (pun intended). Maybe I'm worried to tell him because deep down I fear that everyone just wants sex and nobody really loves me, which stems from past sexual abuse. Also I realise that a healthy sex life is one of the pillars of successful long-term relationships. That and I don't want to deprive him of something he likes. Buck heck, he could get a few friends with benefits for all I care. As long as we get to do Netflix together, he can Chill with whomever he wants.

Well, looking forward to reading your experiences and opinions. Stay ace!",asexuality
General Concerns About Sex,"I've been out for almost a year now and I'd like to know how some other people deal with sex and relationships. I've always had romantic attraction and currently have been interested in someone for a year, and that made me question whether or not I would be willing to have sex if I were to pursue a deeper relationship with them. I think that I would be, but the trouble I'm having is that I don't know if I'd be able to perform like someone who is not asexual? Are there differences? For some extra information I have almost no libido, and I don't masturbate or watch porn nor have I ever. I'm not sex repulsed, I just never felt the need to do either of those things. I know the body has natural responses but what if mine work slightly differently? And could I pretend? Sorry for all the questions, I'm just at a point where I figured I should ask someone about this. Thanks.",asexuality
Am I asexual?,I am wondering if I am asexual. I don't experience sexual feelings but maybe I am a late bloomer. I am 14 turning 15 in January but I think I am a late bloomer. Perhaps a demisexual? Idk I haven't been emotionally close to someone to know. I am 100% biromantic but.. about sexual feelings I am not sure? idk what's y'alls opinions? Late bloomer perhaps?,asexuality
I just got my first tattoo,,asexuality
I just wanted to say Thank You,"For awhile, I’ve wondered if I might be asexual. While I don’t currently believe I’m asexual, I can relate to much of what is here and finding people with like experiences was incredibly validating. This whole community has been really helpful in understanding my own sexuality. Resources like AVEN have been really helpful in making sense of and putting into words what I feel. At every part of my exploration I’ve seen nothing but acceptance and understanding and a willingness to explain. Thank you for making this an enjoyable endeavor.",asexuality
Open invitation to our Ace Space discord server!,"Hey everyone! I wanted to let you awesome people know that we have an ace discord server, and you're all invited! We currently have 63 members, and we're all super chill and like to hang out and have fun talking!

If you've ever been worried about not having people who understand you and/or are tired of the sexual pretense that seems to exist in many social interactions, I think you'll love it here with us!

All that we ask is that you play nice with everyone, and I think we'll get along great!

Discord link: https://discord.gg/sJpeUXU",asexuality
"Aw, hellz yeah- the next campaign I run is going to have a dragon in it named Bipanace. IDGAF",,asexuality
still the best pic describing asexuality that i’ve seen 👌🏽,,asexuality
How to deal with ace phobia?,"I am living in a house with someone who is incredibly ace phobic and I’m completely unsure how to deal with it.

I tried asking them to stop making me feel bad/wrong for not wanting sex, but they just tell me: “No girl wants to just cuddle, you’ll never get anywhere with anyone if you don’t give them the dick” (almost a direct quote).

How should I try to stop their stupid comments from getting to me?",asexuality
Even the asexual related tags aren't safe...,,asexuality
Confused,"Hi all. I have recently begun to wonder this

I'm a 21M. I broke up in April. All through the relationship being intimate used to be a chore. I did it just for her. 

I don't masturbate regularly. But the curious thing is, when I do, I do it for like a week once almost every day. Then I forget about it for like a month. In this period I don't even think of masturbating, and I don't miss it when I am busy I'm work. 

I have a pretty low sex drive as well. (Also I don't follow any religion if that helps about being strict)

Recently I have realised that I haven't even had a crush on someone, don't flirt, and generally don't have any intention to get with someone at all. 

I do get turned on sometimes, watch porn when masturbating. When I see someone hot, I recognise them as hot, but I don't feel any sexual attraction to them. I'd much rather talk to them, share conversations, and make memories than get in bed together. 

Is this happening because of the fallout from the breakup (got cheated on) ? Or is it because I'm ace (suspected it from before the relationship) ",asexuality
My coworkers started saying “no allo” instead of “no homo”,"Today my coworkers were joking around about the “no homo” phrase and how you could hypothetically do something gay then say no homo and it would no longer be gay. I am open about my asexuality to them, so I explained to them that asexual people call everyone else allosexual. I then joked that if I did something sexual and said no allo, it would kind of be the same thing. They thought it was funny and started using the phrase. Even though they are being silly around about it, it makes me glad to see ace culture being utilized by my friends. Thought I would share! ",asexuality
I didn’t know we were hated so much.,"Until today I hadn’t known that even people in the lgbt community felt so spiteful towards us. 

This might be old news, but there are people who believe that we’re just “snowflakes” trying to wedge ourselves into the lgbt community to feel special. I even saw someone say that “relationships without sex are just friendships” and that we couldn’t be in true romantic relationships because of that. And these things were said by members of the lgbt community, who you’d think would be accepting of sexual minorities. I hadn’t even been considering myself lgbt and it made me feel like shit.

I knew exclusionists existed but I didn’t know that they were this vicious until interacting with them, and I feel depressed about it.",asexuality
Question for my Lovely Ace Folks,"I was wondering what your boundaries are! At what point do you feel someone is overstepping your ace boundaries?

For context, this was a thought that came up due to a post I saw from an ace fellow. Basically they had told someone they were ace, and at some point after that conversation this person flirted with them. A lot of people seemed to think this was ""not respecting the fact that they're ace"", which made me curious because I didn't feel like it mattered. Having people be interested in me sexually is a compliment. So for me, flirting isn't a boundary. So I was kind of curious about how other people feel!

Edit: To clarify, I'm asking for how you personally feel.",asexuality
please help (any tips for coming out?),"i already posted on this sub but I still feel the pressure from my friends for me to lose my virginity and I'm pretty sure I'm grey ace but I don't know how to tell them? I know they won't understand, any tips for coming out?",asexuality
Support?,"Guys, 

I came out as an asexual. I’m struggling accepting and discovering who I am. Any support or word of encouragement will be greatly appreciated. ",asexuality
Is this asexuality or not? Confused.,"Will try and condense this as best I can.

I'm in my late 20's.  Always  preferred to wait till I'm married before having sex, though at times I'd rather just do it sooner rather than later. 

I suffer from OCD and have had many intrusive thoughts so unsure if this is just another one.

Starting to wonder whether I could be asexual, or whether me just not having had sex before has made me basically fearful of doing it first time.

I've had girlfriends, and though we never had sex, we did everything else. I was aroused when I was with them. Problem is, a lot of the time it took a lot of stimulation for me to ejaculate - arousal was fine though. I'm circumcised and even masturbating it takes me a while to feel anything. 

I have had wet dreams involving me and other girls.

Anyway my libido is pretty low right now. No girlfriend, haven't had one in a while. If I'm shown sexual content though, I become aroused. 

I've kinda distanced myself from talking to girls now, due to the worry that if it led to it, they'd wanna have sex and I've just not done it before. Now I'm not sure if I'm just asexual and I just don't wanna have sex? I dunno. Getting so confused about this.


",asexuality
"Confused and feel like I'm stuck in the wrong sexuality, aka my strip club experience",,asexuality
Someone told me this sub may enjoy this cake with 7 different purples ombré style.,,asexuality
Asexuality has no scientific proof!!!,,asexuality
"made the mistake of reading the replies, but anyway. love christine",,asexuality
Empowerment of realizing you're Ace,"I wanna know how you guys personally felt while discovering you were Ace!

I actually just came to the realization that I am a couple days ago now and honestly it feels great. My whole life I've felt like an outcast for not caring about sex at all among other reasons. It's like there's always been something missing, something I didn't quite understand about myself no matter how much time I spent getting to know myself. And then bam! I did the research, am now identifying as asexual, and it's kinda like I feel whole now.

So how about you? I know some people become depressed from thinking that they'll be alone forever and some just accept it, but I wanna know exactly how it made you feel.",asexuality
Can someone who was one sexually become asexual?,Just curious.... Can someone who was once sexual *become* asexual later in life (around mid twenties)?,asexuality
"Are you openly asexual outside of Reddit? Also, if you don't mind me asking, what gender/sex are you?","I'm a male ace, but I haven't met many other guys who are asexual (as in zero). Do you think guys are less likely to be open about asexuality, or are guys just less likely to be asexual? Probably a bit of both I would imagine.",asexuality
Having Sex With Partner Even Without Sexual Desires?,"Hello, everyone. 

I am an Asexual (24F) in a relationship with a man (29M) that has a normal sex drive. 

My partner has been so wonderfully supportive of my asexuality and has never once pressured me to have sex with him. However, like a person with a normal sex drive, he wants to have sex. Obviously. 

I can see that the lack of sexual contact starts to put on strain on our relationship, so occasionally I will bite the bullet and have sex with him. 

Now, I'm sorry if the next part is a bit TMI (I am trying to keep everything PG-13.)

As I assume many other Asexuals probably know...it has nothing to do with his performance. He is a very generous and attuned lover. The best I have ever had. Logically, I know this sex should turn me on...but at most I just feel love and connection (I know it sounds sappy, but it's true.)  

Do any other Asexuals in this group have sex with their partners, and if so...what do you do to make it a bit easier for you both? ",asexuality
Turtles,,asexuality
When grey-a turned into demisexual (x-post /r/AsexualMen),,asexuality
Not ace but wrote an ace fic,,asexuality
Idolizing romantic relationships but also actively seeking/avoiding them,"Hey all,

First post here, I'm 25F thinking I'm somewhere one the asexual spectrum.

Like the title says, I have a tendency to idolize romantic relationships. I love watching good romances develop in TV shows, movies, and books, and I feel like that's something I want for myself. Even seeing good relationships my friends have makes me so happy for them and admire the romance.

In many attempts to turn this desire into reality, I have repeatedly joined dating apps and sites (tinder, bumble, pof, okcupid, coffee meets bagel, and more!) only to never meet anyone and delete/deactivate my accounts either the same day or within 3 days. I'll match with people (mostly guys because girls are way pickier lol), maybe start a convo, and then ghost away. Or sometimes I'll just swipe left on everyone because I know I don't want to meet them. 

At first I thought it was because I'm a bit shy/socially anxious. As I've gotten more comfortable with myself over the years, I think it's not shyness at all. I'm confused by my own actions.

Is this common with asexual romantics? If I were allosexual would I be more likely to try to meet up with people?

I might just be immature for my age and not ""ready"" to date/have a serious relationship yet???

Edit: tl;dr: I keep taking steps toward dating due to liking romance and then steps away from dating due to who knows??? Is this something asexual romantic people do?",asexuality
Am I asexual or do I have a problem with my libido?,"I already made a post in r/askwomenadvice about this but they told me it might be smart to write about it here aswell.  
It's not a long post so I'll just post the link here so you can read it for more information: [this post](https://www.reddit.com/r/askwomenadvice/comments/9o3blp/how_to_have_a_libido_aka_i_think_i_need_your_help/)  


Does this sound like asexuality to you? Or more like a libido problem?  
It wouldn't bother me to be asexual but ... it bothers me to not know what's going on.  


I'd love some advice! Thanks,

May  
",asexuality
My Dad bought Ace dice without realizing. I need to find out where he got these.,,asexuality
Advice on Coming out?,,asexuality
"I am but a simple, confused woman [long-ish] [plz help me]","Hello all! 

I've been thinking a lot about whether or not I'm ace, but I've only just begun to do some real research on the topic. I'm fairly certain that I fall somewhere under the ace-umbrella (possibly demisexual?) but I'm still trying to figure things out.  

My first clue that I might be somewhere on the ace spectrum is the fact that I've never looked at someone off the cuff and thought that I wanted to sleep with them. That kind of thought is actually pretty frightening or even gross to me. I only just learned that this is not how many/most people think.  

I'm 22/f, and I became sexually active when I was 19. When I had sex the first time I remember thinking ""THAT'S what all the fuss was about??"" Being raised VERY *VERY* Christian, I was brought up in a very sex-negative environment, with sex effectively being this forbidden fruit that you could only enjoy within the confines of marriage, BUT within the right contexts, it was the most wonderful thing. I had sex with my then boyfriend very often when we were together for those first few months of our relationship, but then my sex drive(?) just kind of, stopped. I thought it was due to starting birth control, or other psych meds, but I've been off everything for many months, and the drive hasn't returned(?)  In terms of fulfilling those sort of needs when I do have them, I feel like im fine on my own, and honestly another person would be a bit of a hindrance to getting the job done.

I have a hard time remembering clearly how I felt about wanting to have sex during those first few months: whether it was something I actually wanted, or if it was just something that I did because it was new, and exciting and I was supposed to like it. I do, however, remember not getting much enjoyment out of the act itself (although we were both virgins, so that might have contributed.) The enjoyment I did get was in making my boyfriend happy, and I really did enjoy that part of it, but that's all sex ended up being for me within our relationship. I ended up realized I was queer and the two of us split so I could learn more about myself, but we are still on good terms. Every once in a while we will have sex, but for me it's more of a ""I wonder if I'll like it this time,"" or ""I want to to this thing for him because \_\_\_\_\_\_\_."" The answer is still no; that I have not thus far enjoyed sex for sex's sake. 

I did have a fleeting sexual encounter with a friend of mine (f) but we were both drunk, and she ended up being pretty abusive in the long run. Through my drunken haze I am hesitant to say whether I did or didn't enjoy the experience, but I remember being very removed from the situation (as I typically was.) I never felt like I was ""lost in the moment"" and was always very aware about what I was doing and what was happening (which is impressive considering how intoxicated I was.) This leads me to believe that my disinterest in sex in my first relationship wasnt due to who I was with or lack of experience. 

&amp;#x200B;

My main questions/concerns are:

\- Is my oppressive upbringing surrounding sex the reason I'm uncomfortable with it? If so, will I ever overcome it?

\- I do still like to make out, spoon, flirt, and other things like that. 

\- I adore non-sexual physical affection, and even derive some enjoyment out of borderline sexual affection such and making out.

\- I  *want* to enjoy sex and have a mutually enjoyed sexual relationship with someone, but I don't think I ever will if it's the like as the ones I've been in

\- Is it possible I just haven't been with the right person, or just haven't had a ""good"" sexual experience? I have never been able to finish while with another person, even if I'm the one working on myself

\- If I'm not ace, I'm worried about settling without having the chance to be with someone who I also want to have sex with

\- If I am ace, where do I even go from here? How do you cope with not being interested in something that is so crucial to being in a relationship with some people?  I'm not against compromising and having sex with someone because they want to, even if I don't, just because I want to make them happy, but I know that a lot of people's enjoyment from sex comes from knowing their partner enjoys it too. I just can't lie to someone about that anymore

Thank you so much for taking the time to read or respond to this. I can't explain how much it means to me. 

I am just a simple woman trying to figure out what the heck is going on ",asexuality
Wrote yet another ace fic,,asexuality
Wrote another ace fic,,asexuality
Ace moment...,"&amp;#x200B;

https://i.redd.it/tyk1p9y2r4s11.jpg",asexuality
"I'm not sure if celibate, asexual, or if I just gave up on relationships.","I'm a 22 year old female, have never been in a relationship, and only kissed a guy maybe twice or thrice in my entire life. I kind of find relationships pointless at this point in my life, as it's inevitable that the parties involved are going to leave each other anyway. I'm kinda just indifferent to sex and intimacy, though there are times where I'm repulsed by them (which might be due to childhood trauma). I've questioned whether or not I'm asexual, as sex doesn't really occupy my thoughts on a constant basis. If anything, I find such things to be quite overrated.

As aforementioned, I did kiss a guy a few times. I didn't feel anything, and while I did find him attractive I just thought he was cute and didn't have a sexual interest in him. In hindsight, I think that I would have been better off not kissing him. I tried French-kissing him once, and it made my stomach turn (we usually kissed with closed mouths). It didn't help that each time I kissed him I ended up getting a flu-like illness that lasted for a week. So yeah, I just don't like kissing with tongue either. I might like cuddling or other forms of affection, though I might not be too fond of it if things gets sexual.

The only form of sexual activity I enjoy is masturbation, and even then it's rare for me to reach orgasm or even masturbate in general. I don't really think of anyone or anything when I pleasure myself: I just flick my bean until I've satiated my ""hunger."" That's all masturbation really is for me: an itch that needs to be scratched. I used to watch porn, but it just wouldn't do anything for me if it was just people having sex or masturbating. Even if it was more sensual or romantic erotica, I wouldn't get aroused by it.

A part of me feels broken because it seems as though sex is such an integral part of relationships, yet the rest of me just doesn't care anymore. Honestly, I'm not sure if I cared to begin with and I wonder if this sort of thing was just pressured onto me. I guess it doesn't matter, as I don't really find myself attractive enough to garner such attention from others anyway. I'm coming to terms with that, and while I'm trying to find fulfillment in other things I still feel like I'm abnormal for feeling differently from others. Overall, I just don't know how to feel anymore.

Any thoughts on this? I'd really love to hear some feedback or criticism, as I'm open to improvement.",asexuality
Aro/Ace Song- More Than Friends by ASHS,,asexuality
Recently identifying as asexual,"I've been thinking about making this post for a while and I figured I'd finally just write it out. I'm not sure why I feel the need to, but maybe it's just to get it out there: maybe this is my way of declaring it to the world and accepting it as a part of myself. Maybe this post is kind of like a liberation of this thought from my brain, and a celebration of my individuality. I don't know, but I feel compelled to write this post and come out to the world, if you will. 

(also, this post is pretty long, so I apologize in advance, haha) 

I never really thought about the idea of asexuality until recently (thank you Todd Chavez) as I never really considered that I didn't feel the same way about sex as other people. I've always had crazy crushes of people growing up, but I didn't really realize that my peers felt sexual attraction to their crushes too. Sure, I was able to see my crushes as objectively good looking, but I never realized that other people felt a sexual compulsion - an urge I still haven't really felt - before. The idea of sex always repulsed me and it wasn't ever something I really wanted to do, despite my deep urges for partnership and my intense romantic attraction to people.

I realized that I never felt sexually attracted to any gender and I think that was my major que that I might be asexual. A lot of my peer group wasn't very promiscuous, so I don't think I had any inclination that I didn't feel the same way as other people. 

Despite this, I think part of me feels like a fraud as an asexual as I have had a steady boyfriend for 5 years. We have sex and I generally enjoy it, and that makes me feel fraudulent in identifying as aswxual. But I enjoy sex because it feels like a special activity that makes him happy and gives me a feeling of closeness with him that I don't have with anybody else. To me it's special and I love making him happy that way, but it's not usually something that's at the forefront of my mind.

I told my boyfriend that I'm fairly certain I'm asexual and he accepts that part of me. I feel extremely lucky as a romantic that I am in a relationship where my sexuality is acknowledged and accepted.

I know telling people that I'm asexual would get brushed off and be misuderstood because in my artistic/design practice I explore sexual identity and use genetalia and pornographic images a lot. I know sex is a normal part of people's lives and I want to explore why it makes people uncomfortable to talk about sometimes, including (and especially) myself. It seems that people don't quite understand what being asexual entails, and that just because I don't feel sexual attraction doesn't necessarily mean I'm sex adverse (though, I acknowledge some people are) and can't explore what this subject means to me. 

I also know that asexuality is a spectrum and that it isn't as cut-and-dry as that. I know it's okay to enjoy participating in an intimate activity with my parter or draw penises all day, and a word like asexual doesn't define my complexities as a human being. There's more to me than that. I think I just feel like something finally describes how I feel, how I've always felt, and explains how I fit in the world a little better. I'm anxious that maybe I'm actually wrong, and that I'll still be adrift and not know what I am, or where I fit - but that's okay too. I accept myself and my complexities and I'm okay with the fact that I don't feel sexual attraction and don't feel frequent sexual urges. 

Anyway, I'm not sure how many people will read this long-winded coming-out-to-the-world confession, but it felt good to write it out regardless. It's a bit of weight off my shoulders. 

PS. I'm not sure if that's the right flair to use, but it felt appropriate I guess. ",asexuality
Im thinking about founding a reading circle for queer/ace philosophy.,"The idea would be to create a subreddit dedicated to reading philosophical articles that deal with queerness, asexuality and aromanticism. Maybe a dash of feminism. There would be an article every 2 weeks/every month, that everyone interested can read and talk about in the comments.
Often I have a desire for an accuracy that casual conversation about asexuality/aromanticism simply cannot deliver. I find it helpful to read such articles to systematize my understanding of these very complicated issues.

Is anyone else interested in participating in such a subreddit. Im especially looking for one or two co-moderators (ideally with a background in philosophy), because i dont feel like Im capable of managing something like that on my own.

But be warned: Im a sucker for postmodernist theories xD",asexuality
Is there a way to become asexual without hormone treatment?,"I am a 16 year old straight guy. Seeing all the occurrings  across the world with straight guys getting in trouble because they flirted with girls, I want to become an asexual, or something close to that, so that I never get sexually interested in girls again. Also, that will help me with my studies and career as I know of too many stories where good careers were destroyed due to a fling or romance with a girl(or a guy, for that matter). Is there any way to do that without undergoing hormone treatment? Or is it just impossible?",asexuality
Quoiromantic,,asexuality
First time in my life I'm grateful that I'm Ace.,,asexuality
I hate relationships,"There was a time in my life where I was desperate to find the thing that society drills into us from when we are small children. The whole fantasy idea of love, and “finding the right person”. People in our society often throw out phrases such a as “there is someone out there for everyone” and “when I meet my future husband/wife etc.” People day these things as if there is some kind of guarantee it will happen for them and everyone. That some magical, perfect person will just fall from the sky and you’ll live happily ever after. Yep. I used to be one of those starry eyed fools that thought that I would magically find “mr. right”.  I set silly stupid goals for myself that I had to be married by a certain age. And I went from relationship, to relationship, to relationship for 8 years.

Fast forward to now. I’m 24, and I’m an aromantic asexual. While I have always been asexual, my aromantic identity didn’t come until more recently in my life. I am a survivor of 3 abusive relationships, and sexual assault. I went from that girl who was desperate to be loved and find “the one”, to the woman who lives in reality. I had a rude awakening to say the least. Love doesn’t happen for everyone. There isn’t someone out there for everyone, and some of us are better off by ourselves. And that is very true of me. I’ve learned to embrace my freedom and singleness. I have known several amazing women in my family who never got married or had children. And they are the happiest, strongest, free spirits I know. 

I made a 180 in my life. I went from desperately desiring love, to not needing or wanting romantic love at all. Since my experiences, I am no longer able to feel romantic feelings towards others. And that actually makes me so happy! To just enjoy the company of others, and it not be ruined by stupid, messy romantic feelings. The thought of ever dating someone again makes me want to throw up. And to be honest, I hate relationships. Why on earth would I ever give up my personal freedoms to say I’m “with” someone. Fuck that shit. I look at my friends around me, when they’re complaining about their SO. And I think to myself, wow, all of this stupid, petty, immature drama for the sake of being in a relationship. The things people in relationships fight about are so futile and meaningless. I wonder why people put up with so much pain and frustration for something so temporary. Relationships don’t last. Maybe 1 in a million do, but for the most part, they end with broken hearts. You could spend years trying to build a relationship with someone, but it only takes seconds to end it all. To me now, it all just seems so pointless and stupid. Why waste your energy? We only get this one life. Why waste it chasing after people and getting your heartbroken over and over again? There are so many better things you could do with that time. 

Our society is so obsessed with sex and relationships, it’s ingrained in everything. Ads, music, tv shows, movies, literature, etc. they all seem to revolve around those things. People are taught not to be happy and confident on their own, and being single is seen as a negative thing, like there is something wrong with you. We’re trained to feel incomplete with out a relationship. But relationships don’t fix what’s wrong with us on the inside. It’s annoying how you’re treated like an alien because you have the audacity to say you’re complete on your own, and don’t need sex or relationships to fill some kind of imaginary void. All of it is so stupid. I wish people would stop wasting their lives on such useless drama, but I can’t make that choice for them. It’s just sad to see so many people hurting over something they would be better off without. It may sound strange, but I never realized how truly happy I could be until I gave up relationships. I didn’t see how much I held myself back, how much of my own life I sacrificed, for something so fragile and useless until I left. 

I just needed to get this off my chest amongst people who may be able to relate to this. Thank you for reading. 
",asexuality
Got my Todd tattoo today! It works well with my ace tattoo.,,asexuality
"I really want to be in a relationship, I want to be loved, to cuddle with someone, to receive kisses from that person, but I just can't.","I'm turning 20 soon. Some of my friends are already engaged while I have never had a crush in my entire life. I can acknowledge attractiveness, like I can see a good-looking person and think ""oh, they're really cute!"", but I just can't see people in a romantic way no matter how hard I try, and it's really crushing me because I'm so lonely.


I very much like the idea of a relationship, I like the idea of going on dates, of spending time with someone special, I want to know what it feels like to kiss somebody. A friend confessed to me last year, so I decided to go out with him even though I had no feelings for him, but I started feeling really guilty two days later because I just felt disgusted when he tried to hold my hand. I didn't like it when he complimented me, I had no desire to constantly text him or see him, so I broke up with him a few days after that, and I feel sad to this day because I completely destroyed our friendship.


The reality is always the complete opposite of what I imagine it to be. So I read tons of romantic books just to feel the butterflies in my stomach, but I can't have these feelings for someone in real life. And I feel like a horrible human for being disgusted by others touching me. And I get incredibly sad because of the fact that I may end up feeling this way for the rest of my life.",asexuality
Aro/Ace Label Survey,,asexuality
Looking for advice,In short I'm brand new to reddit. Over the last 50 years I've been confused about why I cannot hold on to a relationship and also have no urge to presue one. I've been watching a show where one main character finds out he is asexual. Through watxhing tue series I have connected and related to almost everything he does and I relate to the feeling loving the emotional and mental relationships but I did not desire the physical. I do not mean or want to come off as ignorant but I'm looking for advice or guidance in order to understand the way I do about physical connections. Once again I do not want to disrespect or come off as ignorant I am just trying to understand why I feel the way I do.,asexuality
"I don't know if I'd call myself ace, but does anyone else feel like this?","Using a throwaway because I like anonymity regarding this kind of thing. It only let me put on one flair thing but warning, I will talk about certain concepts of sex, though not graphically.

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

So I'm an adult man attracted to women. Because of a congenital condition related to the reproductive system, I'm not physically capable of having PIV sex. I'm ok with getting myself off alone, but I'm not comfortable with other people touching me in a sexual manner. I've tried it more than once with someone I loved/trusted/was attracted to and I just wasn't into it. I just couldn't ever relax and even though I guess mentally I liked the idea of her trying to get me off, the physical act didn't really do anything for me. I can feel mentally turned on by someone, but I'm not into anyone trying to physically do anything about it to me.

I like the idea of someone being attracted to me enough to want to have sex with me. I've enjoyed performing non-PIV acts on women before, and absolutely not to be a douche at all, but according to their feedback I did a more than adequate job, which I liked to hear. It's weird, I felt totally satisfied by making them physically feel a certain way but I wasn't at all into them trying to return the favor. I really wonder if I like doing that kind of thing just because I like the feeling of being wanted and affirmed as a man despite my physical shortcomings. I also like that they appreciate what I'm doing and the feeling of intimacy that can come with it (one of my love languages is definitely physical touch).

That said, I've also been in a relationship where sex wasn't on the table at all. I felt totally attracted to her in every way and enjoyed touching/sleeping together/making out, but I didn't feel like I was missing anything by not having sex with her because the other parts of the relationship were fulfilling.

When I'm fantasizing about, say, a stranger I'm attracted to, I'll sometimes fantasize about having ""normal"" PIV sex with them, but in practice that's impossible so I generally fall back on thinking of the things I can actually physically do. Realistically though, I don't think I'd ever want to engage in sexual acts with a complete stranger. Too many uncomfortable physical limitations to reveal; men generally don't perform sex acts on women they don't know without expecting anything in return, which I of course wouldn't and which would most likely lead to questions I don't want to answer.

I notice attractive women, I can entertain loads of crushes, but I just don't have any literal desire for them to do anything sexual to me above making out or letting me give something to them. I think the closest label I've ever heard for how I feel is stone butch lesbian, but I don't even know if that term is still used and it wouldn't apply to me even if it was haha.

TL;DR/Conclusion: Ultimately, I kind of think that if I was in a relationship where I felt wanted, attractive, affirmed, and had sensual physical touch (as per the AVEN link), I'd probably be just fine without the sex even though I've enjoyed certain versions of it in the past. I guess I just want to know if I'm the only one who feels like this.

Sorry for contributing to the flood of ""am I ace"" posts, I'm sure it can get overwhelming for all you guys. Thanks for reading my monologue haha.

Edited to include warning at the beginning and some different phrasing that I thought was stupid after the fact.",asexuality
My boyfriend and I broke up today because I don't want to have sex,"Before him, I had never been interested in anyone romantically, so I had never even tried to date, despite being in my mid 20s. So this was my first relationship.

Before this, I had never thought about my sexual orientation much, so I just assumed that I was picky and had a low libido. When I started dating my boyfriend I realized that I wasn't feeling things the way most people did, so I did some research and came to the realization that I was ace. 

He said from the beginning that sex was important to him and we agreed that we'd give it a shot. Since I had never dated before, I didn't know what I liked doing and what I didn't, so we wanted to try to see if I could like sex. We realized that I didn't want to have sex.

And now here I am... alone... feeling like I will be alone forever.

I know that this had to happen, but it still hurts so much.",asexuality
"This has nothing to do with Asexuality, but I'm Eating Cake while listening to Jonathan Young's cover of Sasageyo",,asexuality
I recently asked out an asexual girl and to my surprise she actually said yes. I'm pansexual so we're complete opposites and I'm having a little trouble understanding exactly how she feels.,"I really like her, and her sexuality is definitely not an issue. I don't mind it at all. I just have trouble understanding other sexualities, and would love some help understanding exactly how she feels. I just don't want to accidentally say something wrong or assume something I shouldn't. 

What are some common misconceptions I should be aware of, or just general information?

I don't want to ask invasive questions either so if I do, I'm super sorry. ",asexuality
Any aces gonna be at the Atlanta Pride march tomorrow?,"I’m planning on heading out, wearing my colors proudly. :)",asexuality
"🎶 i'm a sick fuck, i don't like to fuck 🎶",,asexuality
Am I asexual or is there not enough information yet?,"Age: 20

Gender: Male

Medical: No issues

Activity Level: Run twice a week, lift three days a week

Diet: Healthy, paleo-like

When I was in high school, I never talked to girls. I could acknowledge if a girl was pretty. I wanted to have sex with them. I think? But I am not really sure looking back.

&amp;#x200B;

I hooked up recently, and I didn't feel anything the whole time. I could finish but it wasn't any fun. It was exciting leading up to it. She was a good person though.

My desire to have sex just dropped from the face of the earth after this.

I don't look at girls with desire anymore. My ""she's pretty"" radar works but thats it. I still would like to talk with them, but I don't feel that sex thing anymore.

I don't even feel the need to masturbate as strongly. I used to masturabate twice a day and now I can go multiple days without it.

I can sort of get aroused by porn still. Not as much.

&amp;#x200B;

Opinions? I feel like I can't be too sure yet. Perhaps I just require more emotional connection to be attracted sexually.",asexuality
Am I Asexual?,"I don't think I am but my friends friends really do. I'm not sexually attracted to anyone and I would be ok never having sex in my life. I do want a relationship with a girl just to cuddle although if it made them happy I would have sex. 

I'm 16 and while i'm pretty sure i'm done with most of puberty I think it's possible the sex stuff could kick in later, right?

",asexuality
Does anyone else forget that they are asexual sometimes?,I sometimes forget as it's not really something important to me.,asexuality
I'm not sure if I'm asexual or just disinterested in sex and relationships.,"I'm a 22 year-old woman, and have never been in a relationship. Personally, relationships seem almost pointless to me since it's inevitable that both parties won't stay together. Plus, I'm just not in the right place in life to have such a time-consuming experience. Sex seems pretty overrated and looks kind of gross and uncomfortable which might be due to trauma, though I still stand by what I say. I don't mind masturbating, though it's rare whenever I do it and I can't seem to orgasm or reach a climax. While I can recognize that people are attractive, I don't have the urge to jump their bones: it's just an aesthetic appreciation of an attractive person.

Overall, I just want to know if anyone has any opinions on what's going on with me.",asexuality
How many aces are LGBT+ in more than one way? Are there polls on this?,"It seems to me most aces are also homo-,bi-,pan- or basically anything other than straight romantic as well? It seems as well that there's lot of trans people as well, I'm a panromantic trans woman for example. I consider aroace people to be LGBT+ in more than one way, or GSRM in more than one way, but aromanticism seems almost like part of asexuality in some way. Some people are bisexual but heteroromantic so in that way those don't ""line up"". Not that lining up  is easier or better or something but my question mostly goes to the romantics and trans people",asexuality
"Tried dating, hated it, feeling discouraged","I decided to try dating. For reference, I'm halfway through my 20s and have never even attempted it out of pure lack of interest. For many years I've known that I'm asexual, but I was pretty sure I was at least some kind of romantic. So I thought, hey, I've got some free time lately, and it would be nice to spend it with another person. Let's give dating a real college try!

So I joined a dating website. I went out on several dates with several different people, and each time I felt nothing in terms of romantic attraction. By the end of every date I was exhausted from trying to seem interested in someone I didn't like, and from worrying about whether they expected me to kiss or hug them, or even worse, go on a second date. After about a month, I gave up on dating. Now, I just feel frustrated and even more lonely than before.

I'm stuck wondering--is it that none of those people were the right person, or am I actually aromatic? I really struggled with accepting the fact that I am asexual. It took many years to work through the disappointment I felt in myself at not being ""normal."" The thought I could be aromatic as well as asexual is even more daunting to me. I don't mind being alone right now, but I don't want to be alone forever. However, it seems almost impossible to find a platonic life partner.

Does anyone have any advice, or has anyone gone thorough something similar? I'm just really discouraged right now.",asexuality
"I know it's not the traditional band, but I finally got my ace ring today!!",,asexuality
I'm not sure what is happening with me,"I'm turning 21 this year and on my third year of university. I have a few friends irl, but not so close. I have no desire to date or having a romantic relationship in any form, and feel uncomfortable at romantic attraction directed toward me. I'm fine with some handholding and friendly cuddle, but anything beyond that is a big no.

Problem is, I also have a fairly notable sex drive, and masturbate fairly frequently. I feel enjoyment from relieving myself, but I still don't wanna do it with anyone. I don't feel sexual attraction toward anyone, I'm just fine with doing so myself. I can't imagine or don't want anyone else to touch my body.

I hope I can get some help on figuring myself out.",asexuality
It’s pronounced Quiche Dammit!,,asexuality
Confused and maybe some kind of Asexual?,"I'm 25 and I've never had sex or a relationship or anything. 

I find the idea of certain sex acts arousing and I have a pretty typical sex drive but I've never really felt attracted to anyone. There's people I that I'm like, yeah objectively they're attractive but that doesn't turn me on. I've also never had a crush on someone where I'm into them specifically. So when I masturbate I'll think about kissing someone, or having sex or whatever else, but it's all about the act and not the person if that makes sense?

Basically, I'm conceptually into sex but not attracted to people. Is this a thing? Are there other people like this? I am confused, please help.",asexuality
Doubt about crush,"I always thought that crush was someone you like and maybe someday you can possibly dating. But my friends told me that was wrong

Someone else thought the same as me or i was wrong all my life

PS: I'm Heteroromantic and maybe Demisexual, still don't know",asexuality
Coming out on National Coming Out Day.,"So, yesterday (October 11th) was National Coming Out Day and I did something I had no intention of doing... I came out as asexual. As mentioned above I had no intention of coming out as asexual but it happened. I follow this one girl on Instagram (she’s the younger sister of one of the girls I went to high school with) and she made a post for National Coming Out Day where she came out as asexual, I wanted to be a good friend so I told her I was happy to see that she was embracing her identity and I kinda got caught up in the moment and came out to her as asexual as well. I freaked out afterward despite knowing I had nothing to worry about, I never realized coming out would be that terrifying but now that I’ve done it I feel more reassured in my own identity.

So yeah, this is the story of my first coming out as ace.",asexuality
Is Plenty of Fish good for asexuals?,"I'm on Plenty of Fish. Is it any good for asexuals?

I've put on my profile that I am asexual and my headline states that I want a sex-free romantic relationship.

I know that there are sexbots. Two of the women I've messaged turned out to be sexbots.

I've messaged 55 women. I've mostly messaged them with ""Hello x, I am messaging you in the hopes of being friends and maybe more!""

I then ask them things about themselves based on their profile or I ask them what TV shows, films, music and books they like and I ask them what they like to cook and bake. 

Only one woman has replied to me.",asexuality
I Have a Problem and I Don't Know What to Do...,"Hey guys, I know this post sounds like it would be more fitting for r/dating_advice or something but I honestly feel the issue is atleast partly tied to my Asexuality, and that allo-commenters may not fully understand or sympathize with my plight like you guys will. Currently posting from an alt-account because the individual involved often reads my comments and posts. This is long but I could really use some advice.

I guess I should start off by saying that I'm almost 21 years old, and I've never been in a relationship. Outside of my depression, which branches out into self-worth issues, I'd say the biggest factor as to why is definitely tied to my identity as an Asexual woman. There have only ever been two guys that I've felt even slightly romantically attracted to, and it didn't happen quickly for either. It took well over a year in each case of getting to know the person well that definite non-platonic feelings arose, and ultimately nothing came out of those situations, because even if they did like me at all in the first place, those feelings probably vanished by the time I finally figured out my own. Without the component of sexual attraction, it just takes me way, waayy longer to feel that way about someone.

As such, I never even went out on a simple date with anyone until in college last year, where I tried to get out of my comfort zone and go out on dates with a couple guys when they asked me. Which only made things worse. One such instance allowed me to discover that I'm really adverse to basic romantic physical gestures. Stuff like hand-holding or cuddling makes me intensely uncomfortable, and not in the fun 'butterflies in your stomach' kind of way. I just don't like it, despite knowing I'm not aromantic. Maybe it would be different if it was with someone I actually know and was romantically attracted to, but even then, I'm really not sure it would change.

I've realized very recently that I'm not even sure I could ever really be in a relationship, Period. Even if a partner was cool with the no sex, I likely wouldn't even feel comfortable doing any of the other stuff that makes it a relationship, and that would never be fair to the other person. More so, I think I yearn for a kind of romantic partnership in an abstract sense, but anytime I'm even remotely confronted with the prospects of dates, dating, or even someone showing a romantic interest in me, I hate it. It's nerve-racking. It's always filled with more dread than excitement. Not because of the other person, but just because this realm isn't something I think I'll ever be fully able to engage in. So much so, I'm starting to wonder if I'm atleast somewhat aromantic despite having crushes before, even though I'm not sure how that would work. It's just complicated.

This is a problem because many of these realizations have come about from the main focus of this post, which is my friend, let's call him, Walter. Walter is probably my best friend. I care about him so fucking much. (Sidenote: He knows I'm Asexual and understands it). Last year, in my trying to get out of my comfort zone phase, he asked me out on a date, and I obliged because he's sincerely one of the nicest guys I've ever known, and what harm could come from it, right? It was pretty casual and enjoyable, although plagued by the same dread I mentioned before. For some reason, even though he asked me out, I didn't really think he actually liked me or anything, and I thought it was just a fun one time thing.

He actually ended up asking me out again soon after. I was kind of tired of going on dates, due to the stress and anxiety of it all, but my friend group was kind of pushing me to do it and I didn't want to hurt him. My mistake was in hoping that things might change if I gave it a chance. After all, I already felt close to him in a friendship sense, and it takes so long for my platonic feelings to turn into romantic ones, that I figured maybe they'd just develop naturally if I let the romantic side of things continue. We went on the date, and that was basically the end of things for the school year. We only saw each other a couple times over the summer. I thought things had died down until the start of this semester when he asked me out again and we went on our third official date, where I realized that maybe he really is just my best friend, and that I may never feel anything more for him even if I wanted to. That even if I could, my depression makes me feel so emotionally numb most of the time that I'm not sure I can connect with people on that level anymore.

Even now, I feel like I'm still trying to figure out if I'm romantically attracted to him, and the answer that I've come to is that even if I am, I have too many issues related to my depression, asexuality and romance in general right now to act on it in a healthy way. However, Walter has become a lot less subtle about his feelings. He's jokingly said during random conversations that he ""won't let me die alone,"" that he'll help me ""fix my intimacy issues,"" and just now after a conversation about Scott Pilgrim, he asked how many evil exes he has to fight before he can date me, which I awkwardly laughed at before leaving, all of which have sent me into panic-mode and forced me into the revelations about myself I listed above.

Over the last couple weeks of this, I finally realized how unintentionally and unknowingly terrible I've made this whole situation. Our 3 dates have been spread out over the course of almost a year, and while I've been personally spending that time just trying to simply figure out how I feel, that's the same amount of time that his initial feelings have had to grow. I can tell he really really likes me, and the idea that in trying to take my time before leaping into something, I've unintentionally led him on makes me legitimately want to kill myself. The last thing I'd ever want is to hurt him. Like I said, he's my best friend and a great guy. And I don't know how to tell him what I've just told you guys. My hang-ups regarding attraction, dating, and relationships are wrapped up in such a confusing web of interconnected factors that I don't even know how to explain it to myself most of the time, much less another person, and either way, he's gonna end up hurt even if he doesn't show it. 

I hate myself right now. I don't know how to talk to him about any of this. Do you guys have any advice?",asexuality
Do any aces cuddle platonically?,Would it be a dick move to platonically cuddle someone who I know wants more than that? What if I'm incredibly clear I don't want more than that? I think she'd like cuddling and I would too,asexuality
My friend painted me an ace pride flag as a mountain scape.,,asexuality
Should I go through with an asexual-based tattoo?,"Hello folks.  


So I've been juggling this idea around and I wanted everyone's opinion on if I should get my asexuality permanently on my skin. I only came out this year, though i'm convinced I've always been ace and accepted it for myself a few years ago when my engagement fell apart due to sexual frustrations. I'm fairly confident I wont ever stop being ace, but at the same time i'm hesitant to get something on my skin forever that will mark me as such. It wouldn't be anywhere always-exposed, but still somewhere accessible (my right underarm, well between armpit and elbow). I guess i'm worried it may be something too personal to get inked, but that's what i'm on the fence about. Any thoughts and opinions are appreciated.  


The picture would be a toy robot, holding a small screen showing the ace pride flag with the words ""I'm not"" ""a robot"" above and below. ",asexuality
Bad joke,,asexuality
A personal revelation,"I had a severe bout of insomnia this week and my denial functions shut off, leaving me with the understandably unpleasant realization that I am both entirely sex-repulsed and in possession of some very extreme kinks of the kind that can't be done in real life. You can probably see why I was in denial about that.

So what do I do now that I have become doubleplusungood at my doublethink?",asexuality
Thoughts on this dilemma I am having?,"First off thank you so much to anyone and everyone that reads this as it’s long, if you don’t want to read the background story, just skip to the important issue section at the bottom.

Background story:

First off I am not even sure if I am asexual although I have read about it before, or maybe I just have a hard time accepting it as a fact. I have had numerous crushes on mainly males in the past, but more often than not they didn’t include anything sexual(like me fantasizing about sexual relationships with them or anything), either way the last crush I had was about 5 years ago. I realize when someone is attractive within society, but I have no desire to engage in any kind of romantic or sexual activity with them. 

I am now a 22 year old female and have never had sex. The furthest I’ve gone is a few kisses that felt absolutely disgusting. I had literally no reaction to them besides being bored and opening my eyes periodically to see if he was done. And there was absolutely nothing wrong with this guy, he was tall, attractive, well built, and interesting to talk to, basically the checkpoints my family looks for.

I told this to both my mom and my therapist. My mom didn’t know what to say and my therapist said that I just didn’t meet the right guy. They’re all telling me all the fun that I am missing out on and how life is all about experiencing things. However, I cringe at the thought of being touched alone, the only person I hug is my mom and only if I initiate the hug.

I’ve been asked about my romantic life and one of the persons that tried to help me suggested I might be a lesbian and that it’s ok to be one it’s 2018. However, I don’t feel any attraction towards females either although I can recognize if someone, by societal standards, is attractive. I didn’t say anything to that because I didn’t know how to reply. At that point the thought running through my head was that it’s better for people to think I am a lesbian than to say I might be asexual because I keep thinking there’s something wrong with me for not wanting to have sex. I once told my mom there are other people out there that don’t want to have sex and she said “where are they.” And I didn’t know how to reply to that either, because I myself have never encountered one.

My mom also said that I don’t know if I like it or not because I haven’t tried it. Which is true, but do you really have to try something to decide if you like it or not? I mean if you’re repulsed by the idea do you still have to try it just to prove a point and say I told you so? And what if the reply that you get is along the lines, oh he just wasn’t good in bed try another one.

My excuse in the past for why I couldn’t date to both friends asking about my love life and to potential dates was that I was too busy studying to become a vet and I didn’t need any distractions. Well that excuse has ran its course because I dropped out of college due to other health issues, and basically have been avoiding everyone that might ask me anything about dating.

I keep seeing and hearing about people and how much they long for a relationship and sex. And I am just thinking there are so many more things I would rather do than that. And then I think and why not just masturbate, if all you need is sexual release. But apparently that’s not like the real thing, or at least that’s the answer I get when I bring it up.


The real issue:

Now although I don’t like sex, the most important thing to me has been to have my own biological children, because I think children are the most precious things, although they’re a huge responsibility. Ever since I was small I absolutely loved taking care of things, like plants and animal. I got into a deep depression when I couldn’t have pets for one year because I had nothing to care for besides my plants. They don’t interact with you so it’s not the same thing. I also enjoy helping people now that I am older although I haven’t ever taken care of anyone to the extent that a parent would take care of a child. Now, I am not satisfied with having pets, no matter how many of them I have because they’re never going to be able to talk to me and have deep conversations.

This didn’t seem as such a big deal to me at the time, I would just save enough money and get an in vitro fertilization. Then I brought it up to my therapist and her response was that she doesn’t think it’s right of me to deprive someone of their right to a father. And now I feel like an absolutely horrible person because I don’t want to cause anyone any pain and suffering for my selfish reason of having little ones. 

After that discussion I keep thinking of what I should do. I think it’s unfair to get into a relationship and pretend to like having sex. In reality I doubt I can keep up that facade for too long. And it’s not fair to the other person either, because I am tricking them. 

I would really appreciate some insight on the issue as it just makes me feel miserable right now.


",asexuality
Am I asexual / grey-A?,"Hello everyone. I know these types of threads are generally frowned upon, but I hope I can find some help and insight here! I've been looking up stuff related to asexuality the last couple of days on a hunch and I found that I identified with a lot of what I read. (Also sorry for the new account - I just use my main account for some professional / work-related stuff.)

So basically, I'm 24F and I believe I'm hetero demiromantic. So... the following is why I think I may be asexual or grey-A.

I was in a relationship for 10 years up until a few months ago. My then-partner was someone I basically grew up with. Both of us had terrible sex-ed being from third world countries so we basically just figured out how stuff works through trial and error and we never really did anything extraordinary in the bedroom (we also didn't have sex too often - maybe once a week). So what I mean to say is - my sexual experiences are very limited so I never had considered some aspects of my sexuality before. I hadn't explored sexuality in my teens at all because I never felt an urge to (incl. masturbation), but naturally as my then-partner and I decided to start being sexually active, I had developed a curiosity for it. After the curiosity was sated, I found sex to be... meh. I would always rather be doing something else, like playing video games or drawing, than sexual things. This was never a big deal - I figured it was normal.

Cut to some major life events that resulted in my relationship ending. I found solace in a very close friend after my breakup and we decided to try a relationship. I discovered a bit in that he has a very high libido - much higher than mine at least. I thought this was just a difference in sex drive, but the more we talked about it, the more I realized the two of us view sex completely differently from each other. For example, he feels sexual attraction from sensual attraction, aesthetic attraction and emotional attraction, whereas I only very rarely experience sexual attraction. Another example is that he feels deep emotional connection during sex - I do too to some extent, but I feel a lot more of that kind of connection when having a deep conversation or playing games with him. This led to me wondering why I don't feel arousal and attraction in the same way he does. I still like occasionally engaging in sexual things with my partner, but I wouldn't go out of my way to pursue that.

Some other things I've noted:

\- I never feel like initiating sex.

\- It's very difficult for me to get aroused (but not impossible).

\- Sex feels inconvenient and not satisfying enough to pursue.

\- I wouldn't do it for the sake of my own pleasure - only for my partner's.

\- Unless I'm already aroused, I feel no arousal from looking at porn or naked bodies.

\- I do feel aesthetic and sexual attraction - as in, I can appreciate when a person looks nice and I always have the urge to kiss and hug my partner, but I never see these things as being sexual.

\- I've never felt sexual attraction to anyone besides my partners.

\- I feel annoyed when sex is brought up or when something leads down a sexual avenue.

&amp;#x200B;

I'm not very good at writing my thoughts cohesively, so I hope this wasn't too much of a struggle to make sense of. I'd really appreciate any input on this as I'm trying to figure out if I just have dead libido or if I actually am on the asexuality spectrum. It would be nice to have an answer for the way I feel.",asexuality
Possibly maybe even probably aromantic despite never having thought of it before now.,"Thanks in advance to anyone who takes the time to read this. I super duper appreciate it! Also I apologize for the lazy grammar and formatting. I originally was going to post this in a group chat but it grew too long to be viable for such a thing.

**TL;DR: i think im an aro despite liking the idea of romance based on the fact that i've almost never experience romantic attraction to any specific person and the kind of attractions that i did have that could possibly be romantic were maybe not. im too inexperienced to tell.**

so i've only ever had two crushes in my whole life, both toward girls. one was in middle school that hit me *hard* and lasted basically the entire school year until summer break happened and the time apart killed my feelings which never then resurfaced (thank god). i think it helped a lot that i never acted on said feelings save for one or two times and i was such an awkward, weird loner at the time that it could never have worked ever anyway. and, yknow, it was middle school lol.

the second was pretty much a flash in the pan by crush standards. i think. i don't actually know since my experiences with crushes and romance are so few and so confused that they might not even have been crushes at all. i definitely know i didn't experience any sexual desires toward either person. i sort of just wanted to be their friend and be able to confide in them and get to know them. maybe some hugging or kissing or *gasp* even cuddling.

basically i developed some kind of feelings for a girl i shared a club with. after a week or two of intense self-motivating and deliberation i worked up the courage to ask her on a date - the only one ive ever been on full stop. it was... super awkward and weird but she was really nice about the whole thing which i really appreciate. here's the shitty part though. the second i got done asking her out and her saying yes my brain decided that ""crushes"" were not worth the trouble and dumped all feelings i had for her completely.

it made what was inevitably going to be a really lackluster experience into something even worse than that. i don't think i even called or texted her afterward, which as my sister was quick to point out, is something you absolutely, positively, must always do after a date whether you are interested or not. and i was totally clueless about it. oops. i don't feel too badly about it though because she only said yes to be nice anyway which honestly was super cool of her so props there.

since then i've never had a crush or particular interest in pretty much anyone. if there is a figure from the past five years that i was attracted to then i certainly don't have any knowledge of it. there have been only a few people in that time that had crushes on me. and funnily enough they have all been boys even though i've always considered myself hetero: one that i was oblivious to, one that i was averse to, and one that i hesitate to make any judgment calls on because the whole incident happend in one night while i was drunk. said person is someone id be curious to get to know better but there's so little to go on that i can't really say.

the point of all this rambling, basically, is to say that i think i might be on the aro spectrum in addition to being an ace though i had never really given it much thought before. i've always liked the idea of being involved with someone romantically. someone who is all at a once a friend, a confidant, an emotional support, a secret-keeper, and that would be willing to give me cuddles and hugs and possibly even kisses and vice versa. despite that though i've had no romantic attractions to anyone in the past few years and those that have had them toward me have left me slightly curious at best. basically enjoy the idea of romance but have yet to actually experience any or even an attraction to it outside of two isolated cases.",asexuality
Identifying as Asexual &amp; poly,"I have recently began to identify as Asexual. I am not entirely sure where on the spectrum I am yet.

Over these last 2 years I've discovered I have felt sexual attraction for one person ever. And it is my newest SO. But I have only ever had a squish on other people...the feature have been. 

I came out to my mum as poly 2years ago, and then as Asexual last month. 

I guess this is my coming out to you all intro. I don't want to make this too long. 

I would love to hear your own stories. Are you poly and asexual? Or even just introduce yourself. ",asexuality
"Asexuality is so blurry to me. A grey area, with no absolutes","This will probably be a rant-type post. Posting on a newly made anon account, since friends know by main one.

The hardest part of the ""am I Ace?"" question to me is that I don't know at what age it becomes not normal to not feel sexual attraction. I'm still very young, and I keep telling myself it'll happen sometime. But it's been 3 years since I first seriously thought of this, and a lot has changed since then. Everything, except the fact that I can't bring myself to like anyone. I keep getting my hopes up everytime I grow to like someone or when I get closer to someone, but it always ends up in me realising I want nothing more than friendship. If anything, I'm just confused as hell. Everyone else has their sexuality figured out by now, even if they had some doubts. Even if they were in denial. I have bisexual, lesbian and trans friends who have all gone through rocky roads but are by now pretty sure of their sexual identities. I feel bad for saying it, but sometimes I'm envious. Sometimes, I think it's easy for them. It takes a while to accept that you're gay, or trans, but I feel like you can be more sure of yourself than someone who doubts if they even have any sort of sexual attraction. Because my friends, they always had that to some degree. At as young as 10-12 years old, everyone started having crushes. Some were confused, since that wasn't supposed to be the gender they're attracted to, some were even more confused, since they didn't even like the gender they were born with, but they at least had something to go off from. All I had, and still have, is this feeling of missing out. I mean, what the fuck are crushes, even? Are you supposed to be very fond of the idea to date a person, so much so that you would make a conscious effort to be with them? Because I've never had that. I was so salty about it I made up a crush for myself. I think at one point I even convinced myself I was finally crushing on someone. But I soon came to realise that recognising someone is attractive is far from that. But yet, here we are, 4 years later and I still think about that ""crush"". And still, not much has changed. Except that I've started watching porn. But I can't even do *that* normally. I like the feeling of being turned on by it, but I just somehow can't enjoy the ""touching my genitals"" part of it. I've tried, even, and failed miserably. It still makes me feel pathetic. It should be pretty simple. Nerves on genitals that are supposed to make you feel good+touching=feeling good, right? If only it were that easy. But it definitely makes you feel weird when you're a somewhat-horny teen who can't even masturbate right.

Isn't this supposed to be an easy question? ""Do you want to have sex or not?"" But nope. At least, judging by all the time I spent thinking about this stuff. Easy answer is, I want to have sex. It sounds like a great thing. Who wouldn't want pleasure and intimacy, and all these great things? I just feel like me wanting to have sex has nothing to do with the real world. The two things exist in different dimensions. I could never link my want to have sex to any existing person ever, at least I don't feel like I ever could, even in the future. But who am I to jump to conclusions this quickly? I'm not exactly an adult yet, nothing's concrete before then, right? But I'm tired of waiting. I've practically grown up in every other aspect of maturity. Everything else has changed over the years, except this. I want to have sex, yes. I just don't want to have sex *with anyone*. I want this to change. I want to believe this will change. But it's getting harder with every passing month where I don't find myself being attracted to anyone. Anyway, thanks for anyone who has read through this. It's incredibly chaotic, it didn't clear anything up in my head, but at least it's written down.",asexuality
Question on Ace-Ace dating,"Howdy. I'm Jim, and I'm asexual, but not aromantic. My friend Bella is the same way, and we've been hanging out for a few weeks now entirely platonically. We have a lot in common, and she's one of the first people I've met who I feel in any way really understands my headspace when it comes to romance and sexuality. I've been wanting to ask her out properly for a little while now, but there's just one issue.

I just turned 22. Bella's only a few months past her 17th birthday.

Minority/majority age stuff in relationships only really relates to matters concerning sex, which is obviously not going to an issue if we're both ace, but I'm still having a hard time reconciling it in my mind, and I'm still fairly certain that most people in both of our lives would view any relationship we would have poorly regardless of context. It's also hard for me to not to still feel a bit like a creep. 

So I guess the question boils down to -- is maintaining a sexless romantic relationship with a minor still as weird if both of you are ace? Is it any less weird than if we were both allo? Should it matter if there's a genuine connection?",asexuality
High libido - no sexual attraction,"Not that it’s anybody’s responsibility to figure my shit out but me, but I’d like to hear some perspectives from people who are confident they are asexual. 

I’m 23, female, and I’m in a happy and loving relationship with a pansexual man. We were chatting on the topic of National Coming Out Day, and about how I just don’t feel comfortable labeling myself as heterosexual, although I’ve never felt a strong sexual attraction to people of the same sex. That being said... I’ve never felt a strong sexual attraction to people of the opposite sex. 

My boyfriend and I have a fairly healthy sex life, though I seem to have a much higher libido and want sex a lot more often than he does. But when I think back to growing up and puberty, I feel like I never had a real “sexual awakening.” There just wasn’t that click for me. I always dreaded when my friends wanted to talk about boys, because I just wasn’t interested. I remember the really uncomfortable feeling of having to pretend to agree that I found someone hot or sexy or cute. I knew that these people were attractive from an objective standpoint, but there was just no greater attraction from me personally. 

I wasn’t initially attracted to my boyfriend. We kind of started dating because he was sweet, kind, and exceptionally funny. Now I love him unconditionally and I do find him very handsome and find that I both enjoy and want sex with him. When we started dating, I kind of felt this relief that I wouldn’t have to pretend to want sex with good-looking strangers anymore. 

Anyway, all this is to say that I’m not sure I could call myself heterosexual, because although I’m dating a man, I didn’t know I was sexually attracted to men up until the point I was having sex with one. As a side note, I’m not entirely sure that my lack of attraction is genetic. I think it might have to do with some (non-sexual) trauma I experienced growing up. As a toddler, I was obsessed with boyfriends and fairytale-like romance.

Does that make sense? Is this a regular asexual occurrence, or something else? It’s tough because I don’t feel like your average straight female, but I also don’t feel like I can claim LGBTQ+ status. ",asexuality
I need help. Big Time.,"So I am from a very traditionalist family. All Christians, all nice amazing people. The problem is that when I mean traditional I mean they almost hurl at anything LGBT+ related. Or anything to do with sexuality other than straight. Some of the younger members like my one of my many cousins is accepting and I’ve told her. I’ve told both my parents and all of my friends know. Out of my huge family of over twenty, I have told three. So how do I come out to the rest as asexual. I’m afraid that it’ll get awkward, with me explaining what asexual means and everyday relationships. I want to be real with them but I don’t want things to change. I love my family and they love me. But how do I say it without just making everything awkward afterwards. I don’t know what to do. ",asexuality
my university has a lot of pride stuff out today! i got this cool pin and they gave out free cake!,,asexuality
A question,I had a weird thought do we have a band or song that we feel is very asexual or something similar(sidenote if not I feel warmness on the soul by avenged seven fold might be a good choice),asexuality
Like Teasing/Buildup But Not Sex,Does anyone else find themselves liking talking about sex or being teased but as soon as sex is actually on the table want to bow out?,asexuality
Just Curious,"(Not that asexuals can’t want or have kids)

But I’m just wondering how many asexuals here don’t want children. Especially to physically have children.

I’m an ace woman and I don’t want children. I’m curious if others feel the same way within our community and how you deal with it. ",asexuality
Coming out...in a way,"Hi there, so I am honestly nervous and excited about this. I have know for a long time that I am asexual. However, I have never told anyone not even on the internet. I have grown up going to church and I am currently and youth pastor. However, thats not a big issue as A) We do not view asexuality as a sin and B)LQBT+ is viewed as normal and not sinful where I live and in my family. However, I just don't know what to say or how to say it. I want to be married and have normal life growing old with someone. I  haven't found anyone who is fine having a relationship that doesn't involve sex. I have been scared to say something because for most people they cannot understand love unless there is a physical element to it. Anyways long story short I just watched Love, Simon and it inspired me to at least put this out there on the internet. I think it will help to know that somewhere out there someone knows and accepts and understand how I feel. Thanks for listening and I look forward to hopefully talking with some of you :-) ",asexuality
"Happy Coming Out Day! Out? Not out? Doesn’t matter, but share your story here!","I’m always curious to hear people’s takes on coming out as ace.

Have you come out to family? At work? What was it like?

Are you not out but want to be?

Don’t feel the need to come out publicly?

I wanna hear your stories!",asexuality
How many of you have been on or are on SSRI's or similar medications? I believe I have Post SSRI Sexual Dysfunction (PSSD) and have having a hard time seperating this from potential asexuality.,"In 2014 I was put on 10mg of Citalopram for depression, this was increased over time to 20mg and then eventually 40mg. When I stopped taking them I instantly started experiencing symptoms such as the complete destruction of my libido, the inability to achieve or maintain an erection under any circumstance and muted orgasm / complete loss of feeling, like a permanent anesthetic effect.

For the next couple of years I didn't connect the dots and thought of myself as asexual. Now upon doing research on SSRI's I almost certainly have PSSD and apparently a lot of asexuals have been on these antidepressants at some point and experience something similar. I want to hear from those who have and how you are coping.

Thank you very much.
Peace.
",asexuality
When did you first realize you're asexual?,"I'm starting to question myself. I don't ever enjoy sex and at first I thought it was just my partner but after multiple different partners and situations, I'm not so sure they are the problem. I think hearing some of your realization stories would help me out a little bit. ",asexuality
A year ago today I came out as asexual.,,asexuality
"Does anyone else not feel sexual attraction, but instead feel very strong sensual attraction?","I’ll see a person next to me and just want to hug them and touch them and cuddle. The thing is I’m probably aroace, so I never get this kind of closeness. I end up getting, basically, sensual crushes. There’s a girl in my class that I just feel this strong urge to get close like that. Weirdest part is I don’t even like that sort of intimacy. When people try to get close with me physically I get super uncomfortable. The idea of sounds really nice until I start to think about it. The fact that it’s another person and they are all over you. It just pushes me back. It’s like I want to feel close to someone just not anyone. So I’m stuck in this weird limbo. Anyone else?",asexuality
How to accept that i’m going to be alone all my life,"Well, I’m 33F aroace. Or may be demisexual I hope, cause I’ve never bored to get into relationships. 
Now it’s already three years I’m trying online dating and it doesn’t work with me really moreover it stress me so much, every time after dates with someone touchy-feely I feel scared and also like broken toy (failed as woman). Last one got me so bad I’m crying second day in a row. 
I can’t get into good terms with thought that I will always be alone. I want to have family, good partner, kids even. But it looks like there’s no hope for me. Or I have to fake it all my life, which is not fair to my partner and torture to me. I hear advice to get psychotherapist and fix myself a lot. Can’t afford it right now, unfortunately. 
Please help me out, I need either hope or calm down somehow.
P.s. sorry for typos/grammar.",asexuality
Ace nails for Panic at the Disco tonight!!!!,,asexuality
I have a question. (delete if not aloud),"so I find people attractive and can look at a girl (I'm lesbian) and can go wow she is hot. I even like boobs. but that's it. I dont like/want sex. not a fan of kissing or even masterbaiting.  all I want is a non physical relationship. 
(is this asexuality or something else)",asexuality
Am i too young or Ace,Hi i’m a 10 year old boy and i’m just starting puberty. About a handful of people in my grade are trying to figure out their sexuality or are part of the LGBTQ+ Community. And basically my whole life i pretended to have a crush but i have never ever had one. I think i pushed it a lot because when i said i think i’m ace to a few friends they were extremely confused. I think sex is weird but most people in my grade don’t. I also don’t really want to have sex at all. I know we are young but a lot of people want to start As soon as they turn 13 (i’m in fifth grade  we are 10 and 11) But i want to avoid that. I like hanging out with girls but countless people have asked me out and i said no but one time i said yes and that was the only girl i had a friendship with beforehand And she moved. So am i ace or not if you need more details just ask because i don’t feel as i’m too young but i also think i am.,asexuality
Hi everyone! I have a question for anyone who identifies or has some experience with Demi-Romanticism,"I'll try and some up everything concisely and neatly.

In the beginning, i sent her a message on a dating site and we hit it off dating for a month until she broke up with me saying she still wasnt sure if the feelings were there. I get that part, now comes the difficult part.

She has described herself to me as being Demiromantic and I fully see why. The only 3 men she has ever been in committed relationships with came from long term friendships, and the now 4 men that she has dated have all ended because she doesnt know if there are feeling there.

Her and i have been really good friends after our break up and genuinely act like a couple in quite a bit of ways. From video chatting just about every night since we dont live in the same city, seeing each other on the weekends and doing total date type stuff like dinner and concerts, even just laying in bed watching movies :). All of our friendship looks like a couples relationship, hell we both keep pictures of each other in our wallets.

I don't want to say I'm in for the long game but truth be told, I love this girl.

What I'm asking for is just advice on what to do? 

I want to allow her to bring up the topic if or when feelings develop.

I want her to know that I'm still interested in her without being this flirtatious friend because she believes right now she just wants to be friends.

I would really just like advice on how to show affection to someone that is Demi Romantic, because I really dont know how. 

I understand every person is different but if you have some ideas or advice I would love to know!!

Thanks!!",asexuality
Unsure of what comes next,"I’m almost certain I’m ace; the more I read about it online and on the sub it just seems more likely, but I don’t know how or whether to come out IRL. As a teen, it would make sense to tell my parents, but I’m just not sure how they’ll react or what they’ll say about it. Regarding my friends I have no idea what to do. This is the first time I’ve done anything like this whatsoever so I need a bit of guidance. Thanks!",asexuality
A Teen Questioning,"Hi, I'm a 17 year old female and I'm questioning my sexuality. I've never really dated anyone or anything. I've felt romantic attraction (like crushes) but I've never really wanted to have sex, it honestly freaks me out a little. I don't know if I'm ace or not. I don't really know what to call myself. For a relationship, I really want to have a partner who will be like my best friend with a little romance thrown in the mix. It would be nice to hear some opinions, it would be nice to know if anyone feels the same way. Thanks for reading :) ",asexuality
my ring came in today. i couldn't be happier.,,asexuality
I think im akoisexual. How do I function in life?,"I'm 20/F. So whenever im dating someone we'll be all flirty and tease each other and stuff. But then as soon as that person makes it clear through actions or words that they like me or love me, i immediately get disgusted or repulsed by them even though they did not do anything wrong at all. And it's happened like more than six times which is the number of people I've dated. I mean ya sure, you could say that i haven't met the one yet but six times is too many, u know. 

Recently i dated someone and I was still figuring out my feelings for him and so I see what a great guy i am and wanted to not have history repeat itself. So i told him not to tell me if he likes me. And to only tell me if he doesn't so that we could end things. But then like afterwards, that feeling of wanting to avoid and get myself as far away from someone, comes back again. So i tried to beat the system but it failed. 

So I came across this term akoisexual and it literally is me. 

The thing is, i do want a family in the future and have kids possibly but how would that be possible if in the first place, i get uncomfortable, repulsed and disgusted with someone as soon as they show that they like or love me? And no, I can't pretend not to feel this way.",asexuality
My 12 year old sister just told me she's 'aroace',"I don't know much about this, and I don't mean to offend anyone, but do you think she might be a bit too young to label herself as this? I know she has had crushes on boys before in primary school. She's in year 7 and is going to a girls school now. At 12 I didn't really have sexual urges either, and I think she is still developing. I think at 12 its still difficult to tell, and her not really interacting with boys has also affected this. Again, I do not intend to offend anyone. Her identifying as aroace is fine with me. ",asexuality
Seeking video/media suggestions for mental health &amp; ace identities!,"Hi everyone! I facilitate a group for university students who identify as members (or allies) of the asexual and/or aromantic communities. I am building out content for this year, and one topic I would like to focus on is mental health. I am hoping to center ace identities within this discussion. My question is: do any of you have any videos (or podcasts) that you recommend, that discuss mental health or self-care while also being intentional about applying it to the ace community specifically?

Thanks in advance!",asexuality
*Might* have just met my first IRL Ace?,"She doesn't really see it that way - which is totally fine - it's possible I'm not even correct.

In was talking to an older woman that I work with who is a Lesbian (she's in her late 40's) and we started getting really open and honest.

She was telling me about her former marriage to a man and how it didn't work out and how long it took her to figure her stuff out.

I told her I sort of understand and used this as an opportunity to come out (to which she reacted well to and asked the usual questions quite respectfully).

Anyway, she's talking more about herself and she says that even though she's lesbian the thought of men or male porn do just about the same for her as women but she learns way stronger towards women.

So I'm thinking maybe she's Bisexual and just identifies as lesbian...

But then she keeps talking and I was really getting some ace vibes: ""I like kissing and cuddling and everything else but when it comes to the sex something just doesn't connect. Just doesn't do it for me. I love giving pleasure to my partners but I could take it or leave it.""

I tried explaining the terms autochorisexual and placiosexual which she thought was interesting but ultimately she seemed dismissive as far as their relevance to herself.

Again, totally fine; she seems quite content with who she is. 

But in the back of my mind I keep thinking ""I just met - at the very least - a grey-ace irl.""",asexuality
Dealing with unwanted sex drive,"I'm 18 and I'm a biromantic ace. The idea or act of sex involving me disgusts me, including masturbation. Unfortunately, I am I have a really strong sex drive due to my age, which makes it difficult to know what to do. Every time I masturbate I'm disgusted by myself and get thrown in a bad mood for days, but if I don't my body still screams at me that I need to, I get sexual dreams that I despise and that make me feel awful when I wake up. I feel like I'm trapped with something alien to me, and as much as I try to control it or ignore it, it stays with me. I'm not sure what to do. Does anyone else feel like this and/or have any advice or encouragement? Thanks for reading this, I'm sorry if it was poorly written.",asexuality
If I made a group on groupme for lgbt people looking for friends would anyone be interested in joining,,asexuality
Married to a sexual - having to spend 3 months apart for work reasons. Feeling a weird relief.,"So, I'm asexual. I've known this about myself for a really long time. My wife knows as well, but she is not. I can deal with sex; it's fine. I don't want or need it, and it takes me quite a lot of energy and time to prepare myself mentally for it. It's something we fight about more than anything else, and I never know quite how to explain it to her.

Now we have to spend a while a long way apart, and I'm enjoying being apart because I can go to bed without feeling the pressure of possibly having to have sex that night. I feel like when we move back together, it's going to be a tough readjustment,

Is anyone else in a relationship with a sexual and has had to deal with these situations? How has it worked out?",asexuality
Pen Pals?,"Hello beautiful guys, gals, and individuals!

So lately I've been wanting to get to know some wonderful people that may not live close to me (to be specific, some online friends)

This seems weird and desperate to me, but I didn't know what else to do, so I figured I'd reach out in some communities I'm part of here.

My name is Gwen (I was named after Gwen Stacey from the Spider-Man comics, if you think that's pretty rad). I'm a 20 year old cis female. I identify as aromantic asexual.

I like to think I'm pretty cool. At least that's what my mom tells me. My friends tell me I'm pretty lame, but they say it out of love.

I always tell jokes, whether or not they're funny. So if you love jokes or memes (particularly of the moth variety, because for some strange reason I think those are the funniest things to ever grace my existence) hit me UP

My current favorite shows are Game of Thrones and BoJack Horseman. I also quote Disenchantment like there's no tomorrow, although I'm not entirely sure why I do that. I'm working my way slowly but surely through Maniac and Twin Peaks.

I love reading. Right now I'm trying to get through *The Hitchhiker's Guide to the Galaxy* between homework, classes, and required assigned reading.

I'm going to school in Indiana for Speech-Language Pathology. I'm minoring in Spanish (and I'm trying to declare a massage therapy minor but the school hasn't gotten back to me on that yet sooooo)

My favorite color is yellow (literally half my room is yellow. Not sure why. It just . . . happened).

I know this is basic but sometimes getting that basic stuff out in the open helps. I love talking.

I love being friends with guys (just because I don't have many guy friends and would love to meet some more) but obviously I'm not against being friends with girls. I hope that sentence doesn't make me sound like a jerk. I want to be friends with everyone!

Send me a message on here! I wouldn't mind texting or writing letters but obviously I'm not going to just put my number or address online because, you know, *stranger danger*.

I would love to have a Skype or facetime buddy!Anyway, I've taken up enough of your time. I know this was long and most likely boring, but thanks for reading this far if you have. I'm looking forward to hearing from you!",asexuality
Considering Non-Monogamy,"I'm asexual, leaning towards demi, and my partner is not. I'm not sex repulsed, I simply don't care for it, or feel any need to do it. I will have sex with him occasionally, but not enough to satisfy his drive. It has caused me to feel guilty for not satisfying him, as well as feeling a great pressure to give him sex all the time when I'd much rather not. This has in turn caused him to have sexual energy that he cannot express, and while I know that it's nobodies fault, I can't help but feel at fault. He's been incredibly supportive of me discovering my sexuality, so I want to return the favour.

We love each other very much, and we don't want to lose each other, so recently the topic of non-monogamy came up. Having someone that my partner can have sex with, taking the pressure off of me, and giving him a means to express his sexual desires. That isn't to say that I would never have sex with him again, it just wouldn't be as frequent, which sounds so relieving to me.

Essentially, I'm not looking for advice; I know I ultimately have to make the decision, and set my own boundaries. I was more looking for (success) stories from fellow asexuals who may be in a similar position to my own.

Tl;dr I'm asexual and my partner is very much the opposite. Wanting to hear some successful non-monogamy stories to consider. ",asexuality
Date set up for disaster...,"So I went to a party this weekend and then got very, very drunk. I eventually ended up making out with a dude, which is very much within my comfort zone. I then got asked out by this individual the next day, and found out that he is a very sexual individual (somewhat notorious for sleeping around). I, as you can imagine, am not that. I remember mentioning I was asexual during the party, but I feel like he might not have remembered or understood me.
I'll take any advice on where to go from here. Do I remind him prior to the date so he can rescind?",asexuality
Questions about sex repulsion,"Does anyone have any good resources for understanding sex repulsion and/or want to share their experiences with it?

My GF (who is grey-ace) mentioned that she was thinking she might be and I'm trying to better understand what that really means (I've already checked the AVEN wiki) so that I can avoid putting her in uncomfortable situations. 

Lately she's been beating herself up when we have sex because I'll give to her first and when it's her turn to reciprocate, she clams up, freaks out, and shuts down. I don't like it when this happens and neither does she. I know that she at least likes the idea of sex between us and it has worked in the past (more consistently when I had a penis, but occasionally since then), but it hasn't lately and we're confused. Help?",asexuality
Making sexual jokes as an asexual?,"I have a friend who doesn't believe that I'm ace, mostly due to the fact that I have a habit of making innuendos and sexual jokes with my friends. I find doing this to be amusing and so do the people around me. It makes everyone laugh, including the friend that questions my asexuality. What do you guys think about making innuendos despite being ace? Do you think it's okay?

EDIT: thank you all for your opinions and reassurance 💙😘 much appreciated",asexuality
looking for another Antisexual/Asexual into Anime/Games to skype/discord with,"looking for another antisexual or asexual person to talk about anime/games etc with

if that seems like it's not inclusive it's because its hard to have a friendship with someone when you are trying to jerk off to my favorite characters which has been a very reoccurring problem

I am tired of ""normal"" anime kids and their constant sexual BS and how they think its funny to make sex/rape jokes about female characters

or their constant obsession with porn/smut and trying to depict all female characters as nothing more than *** dumpsters

I am online alot (15 hours/day) and love to text back and forth about random stuff and maybe even voice chat if we get along well
",asexuality
I Need help.,"Hello. I am a 17 year old male. I've never had sex and I am definitely attracted to women, just not in the way everyone else seems to be. I am attracted to pretty girls that I like to be around. Sexual body parts(?) aren't attractive to me, and the idea of sex is almost... gross. I have absolutely 0 desire for it. My friends all suspect I'm gay because I never talk about women in that sort of way, but that's not the case. What does this mean? Am I asexual? Do I need to have sex before I can tell? I don't know what's going on. 

Forgive me for my ignorance, for I am new to the concept.",asexuality
My girlfriend is asexual and I am not,"I come here for advice.

I want to preface this post by saying I respect her boundaries. I would never want to do anything she would be uncomfortable with, I've never pushed for anything to happen.

But I'm worried that our fundamental sexual incompatibles will end up being a point of contention in our relationship. When she told me I told her it was fine, but as time goes on I become less and less sure...

I want to be okay with it so badly. She's honestly a fantastic person. She's not judgmental about anything, she's chill, she's really easy to talk to, we share a sense of humor and she's just a great person to be around. I love her so much. More than I've ever loved anybody. She's the most wonderful person I've ever met.

But it hurts me to think that if I end up marrying her that I will likely never have sex or anything close to it ever again. I don't want to resent her for it, and I don't want to make her do something she doesn't want to do but I feel like it'll be a problem. I want to talk to her about it but I can't see any compromise that doesn't leave one of us unhappy. I also feel guilty that I said I was fine with it, but I've been having second thoughts for a while now.

And before it's suggested, I don't want to go to a prostitute and I don't want a fwb or anything like that. I'm purely monogamous. I hardly even enjoy sex outside of relationships because it lacks that intense emotional connection that I crave so much. 

Does anybody have any ideas as to what to do about this? I desparetely don't want to break up with her...

This is all coupled with the fact that I only see her 1-2 times a month since she goes to school 2 1/2 hours away... 

--------------------

Update: We broke up...",asexuality
Can't stand being around some of my friends and hating it.,"Hey all,

I wanted to know if anyone has experienced something similar or if they could offer any advice. I've always had a very low libido due to early onset mental illness and taking a lot of hormone inhibiting medication during puberty. You could also say I'm pretty insecure about the whole thing, being a teenager, the time when everyone is obsessed with sex and I feel like the odd one out.

My best friend is VERY sexual. She constantly makes jokes and talks about it in a manner that I've told her makes me uncomfortable but she continues to do so. She'll randomly text the group chat overtly sexual memes even though no one expresses interest in them, talk about her boyfriend and sex life in detail and has recently brought up things like 'how do you know you're gay if you've never had sex', which pisses me off more than anything. I want to maintain a healthy relationship with her but at this point I'm just not sure we're compatible if the conversation keeps being drawn back to something I'm not comfortable with. Other friends outside my main group do a similar thing, not to the same extent but still weird for me.  

Any advice would be super appreciated!

Thanks X",asexuality
Pretty relatable if you ask me,,asexuality
On physical appearance (x-post /r/AsexualMen),,asexuality
Dating advice from other romantic aces?,"A couple days ago I had a second date with a guy I met online. He’s pretty good looking, and makes for good conversation, so I just figured I should keep seeing him. On the second date, he put his arm around me (shoulders, then later waist) and kissed me goodbye. I wanted to enjoy it, but instead I just felt so gross inside, and became really anxious. He didn’t do anything that crossed any of my boundaries, but I was just really uncomfortable with him touching me. I’ve identified as ace for years, but my last relationship (ended almost 5 years ago) was really abusive and it seems like all trust or romantic attraction to men has just been killed for me. Do you guys feel like it would be unwise to push myself for exposure therapy? Should I just accept that I’m not okay with being touched romantically and leave it be? I guess I’m just sad that it was so unpleasant. I don’t know if I should try to shake it off or give into the discomfort. 

A friend suggested that maybe I just don’t “like him like that”, another option that never crossed my mind. I haven’t felt romantically attracted to anyone in years, so I didn’t realize there was more to it than “oh, he’s good looking and friendly, I should try dating him”. Can anyone relate? Does she have a point? As of now, I struggle to see myself getting involved romantically with someone if I haven’t known them for a long time and developed a platonic trust in them..... 

Anyway, I just have a really hard time talking about this with my non ace friends. It’s really hard for me to tell if this is just me being naturally ace or an effect of the abuse I endured that I should try to overcome. I don’t want to be scared anymore. ",asexuality
Asexuality explained with turtles,,asexuality
For me sex is like going to Taco Bell," I think of sex as like going to Taco Bell. Taco Bell is just kinda OK for me. Most of it tastes the same, and it's definitely not a place I would consider for food. If I have a good friend that likes going to Taco Bell, I don't mind coming with them if I want to hang out most of the time. I'm willing to try new things, and sometimes things are kinda good. But, I never will actually crave Taco Bell.

&amp;#x200B;

Thank you for listening to my Ted Talk. ",asexuality
What’s your attraction like?,I always thought I was normal because I still had crushes on people. I just didn’t realize my crushes were different than anyone else. I’ve known I’ve wanted a big family since I was in 7th grade and whenever I fell for a girl it was because I could see living a life together and one day marrying her. My friends would talk about fantasies of sex and what not and my fantasy would be waking up with the woman I loved beside me. I was just curious how some of you guys think of crushes,asexuality
What could Sonic's sexual orientation be?,"I'm trying to write a blog about the Hedgehog's orientation for a tournament but even with the evidence I have, I struggle with an accurate conclusion. The results I came up with based on Sonic's distaste for being smothered or held down, interest in girls in one cartoon, interest in a childhood friend in another, lack of interest in romance in every game, and lack of libido in any media due to target audience, Sonic is asexual and either grayromantic, demiromantic, or he's a full aroace. What are your guys' thoughts?",asexuality
For the crafters among us: Ace fabric on clearance at Joann,,asexuality
Was changing some setting in a Chess app when it got too real,,asexuality
Having trouble accepting things.,"I put the ""am I ace?"" flair but I also talk about sex.

I think I'm having some trouble accepting i'm asexual because..I guess i never thought i felt any differently about sex or relationships than the average person?

I've had sex before but it's always been boring and just meh, like I always just wanted the cuddling that came after so I went through the motions. But I am a HUGE people pleaser so in the few relationships i've had I always made sure to make them as happy as I could. And I would be happy about making them happy. But any time they tried to reciprocate (i.e. oral) I'd just lay there uncomfortable and feeling no pleasure at all. Same goes for making out, I hate it. But my brain always told me that I just had a preference against these things.

I looked up ""sexy guys"" on google today to try to feel something sexual towards them. Nothing. I like how guys look physically, I can appreciate a good looking dude or gal but I didn't feel turned on or anything. But those are only pictures so i dunno if that says anything.

I've been thinking about all of this because I recently had sex for the first time in a while. Before, I was thinking about how I wanted to because it had been a while. Nothing really about the act or the guy tbh. But during it, the only thing I could think about was how I wanted it to be over already so we could cuddle. And it hit me that all I really wanted from sex wasn't the actual sex, but the after sex pillow talking.

My brain is running in circles. It goes from asexual, to nah those are just preferences, to asexual again, to thinking it doesn't even matter because its not like i'm any different than I was before thinking critically about all of this.

Theres a lot more I could say about all of this but I don't want to ramble on anymore because this is getting long. I really just wanted to talk about it, I feel really alone with it. Thanks for reading:)",asexuality
So i get boner but dont feel attracted is that asexuality ?,,asexuality
I think I am? But maybe not? Help?,"Don't know how to add another flair so TW: Sex and some pretty blunt descriptions of it. 


Female. 17. I've had sex multiple times due to peer pressure. It always hurts like hell and has awful repercussions and I honestly just hate engaging. 

I love a good cuddle, makeout sesh, and I masturbate often. Never penetration, since that hurts, just sort of awkward rubbing through my underwear and that feels good, but I wouldn't want someone else doing it because I feel a crushing guilt that I can't return the favor. Using my hands or mouth on someone else's genitals digusts me. 

That said, I do like a bit of foreplay that leads to nothing just for a bit of fun, people touching my boobs, cuddling naked, stuff like that. I have a boyfriend and I often lay on top of him, straddle clothed, etc while kissing (I've also made it apparent that I don't want to fuck and he's totally fine with it.) I have some pretty kinky ideas in my head and watch porn and all that but I don't want to actually do that with him, or anybody for that matter. I'm definitely panromantic and I've been identifying as asexual but I'm worried I'm wrong. Help? ",asexuality
Am I doomed to be alone forever if I'm not willing to have an open relationship?,"Because good lord, it sure seems that way. Allo's sexual needs are presented being so high that nothing but constant, super passionate sex will sustain them, which is obviously something Aces struggle to provide. Every successful ace-allo relationship I read about seems to be an open relationship, which terrifies me because the thought of an open relationship makes me incredibly uncomfortable on a psychological level. Please, someone tell me it's not this hopeless. ",asexuality
Are there any celebrities or otherwise well-known people who are asexual and have talked publicly about being asexual?,I was just thinking about it and realized that I couldn't think of anyone.,asexuality
How do you approach squishes without seeming interested in anything more than friendship?,"Okay. Maybe this will be a ramble, but I gotta know if anyone else has this experience or any advice.

I’ve identified as asexual for a few years now and recently am figuring out where I fall on the Aromantic spectrum (possibly demi). 

Anywho, I finally found out what squishes were and had an aha moment. Because I always get what I thought were intense crushes on people but deep down never wanted to date them. I literally just wanna become their friend. Maybe more than friend sometimes but never romantic   (Sometimes romantic /after/ becoming friends, but very rarely)

Back to the point, how do you approach squishes? In particular, there’s a cashier where I work that I’m currently squishing on, but I’m in a different department of the store. We always say hello and acknowledge each other in passing in a friendly way (Most of my squishes are formed just from good vibes from people?) I’d love to try and have more of a conversation with her or something but I don’t want to come across as flirty or romantically interested...which I fear is how approaching her would be seen especially being in different departments as there’s not much reason for me to do so

If this is who I am and how I experience feelings with others, I wanna be proactive now instead of being a confused person wallowing in self pity. 

All in all, when it’s said and done I probably won’t do anything and continue living life. Just wanted to see if any of you had some ideas or wanted to share your stories of just wanting to be friends with someone in a world that focuses so much on sex and romance.",asexuality
Closeted Asexual in a relationship,"I’ve been trying to build up the courage to post for awhile now so I’m just gonna word vomit before I chicken out. So I’ve been struggling with my sexuality for as long as I can remember. Growing up, I’ve always known I wanted kids and thought about that aspect of my future a lot but never thought about a spouse. In high school I just wasn’t really interested in dating and tried to convince myself I had crushes to fit in and had trouble judging the attractiveness of guys as I just wasn’t attracted to any of them. Eventually, though, I met my boyfriend of over two years whom I love more than anything in the world. Once I got to know him and started to like him, I began seeing him as attractive but I’m still not attracted to him in a physical way. I don’t mind having sex with him at all and enjoy the feelings of intimacy and connection but it doesn’t really feel like anything physically. The more I read about asexuality, the more things start to click and the more I simultaneously feel less like a freak and more like an outcast as I’m not so sure how friends, relatives, etc would respond if I were to come out to them and I know it would become major gossip on my cheer team (I’m a captain of my college cheer team and I don’t want to risk not being re-elected). The bug issue though is I don’t know how to come out to my boyfriend. I guess I’ve kind of lied about being turned on and wanting sex or at least misrepresented how I was feeling to him as what I’ve realized I’m really seeking out is the connection and closeness. I’m scared that he’ll feel unwanted or at least undesired as he has some body image issues. Plus he tends to have a low sex drive and I’m worried if he knows I’m not into sex physically, our sex life will disappear (I know it sounds weird that I don’t want that). I just don’t know how to proceed but I can’t keep feeling so alone and like I’m harboring a secret. I just want asexuality to be normalized and understood or at least more represented as being a spectrum rather than an all or nothing situation. Any advice for how/if to come out to my boyfriend and how to cope with feeling like an outsider would be much appreciated.",asexuality
Maybe friends aren’t important to normal people in relationships,"Sometimes I wonder why I’m even friends with people in relationships. I understand putting your partner first,  but when hanging out with your friend is there really a need to text then every minute? Maybe I just have crappy friends ",asexuality
Ok so a good freind got me this shirt and I wanted some opinions on it,,asexuality
The fear of somebody finding me sexually attractive is driving me insane,"I can hardly leave the house anymore, it's eating away at me, and I'm too paranoid to even open the blinds. I only leave the house to go to the stables, and I only walk the dogs at midnight. Other than that, I stay shut inside with the doors locked and the blinds closed and the lights off. I hate living in this dumb world. I hate humans, I want everyone to just die.",asexuality
Help? Also a little bit of ranting,"I’ve identified as Ace for a bit but I’ve always been kinda unsure about it. I’m still a teen, so I may just be a late bloomer, but I want to know. There’s probably a million of these floating around here, so I acknowledge that some people might ignore this.

So I have yet to experience sexual attraction. Even though I don’t even know what that is. I don’t know if I have, and just not identified it correctly. People my age are already having sex and doing all sorts of stuff but I’ve never really wanted to. Sex and making out just seems unpleasant to me, honestly:

Sometimes I just feel like I’m in a bubble. Like a little isolated bubble. I identify as non-binary as well, so it could be the whole disconnect with my body.

For a while, I hated touching people. Nothing inherently sexual, just having contact with other people (through clothes even) made me cringe. That passed after about a year, but I don’t know if that’s related?

I’ve just never had a desire to do anything sexual or “intimate”, in the traditional sense of the word. Any kind of touch for me is reserved for people I like or someone I know well.

I’ve tried googling this but I’ve never really gotten straight answers (haha) so I figured I’d ask on here.",asexuality
My mom keeps making jokes about me having a girlfriend.,"“What could be better than having a wife?”

“Silence and money”

She got mad at me after that. Not to mention I’m probably not extractive enough in the first place to have a girlfriend.",asexuality
"Guy trying to seduce me: ""I'm 7"" and thick""","Me: ""Good to know I guess??"" (•_•)",asexuality
What Should I Keep in Mind When Writing an Asexual Character,"Going into this post please know that I mean no offense. I am not asexual, but I wanted accurate advice for a character I'm writing. I'm a new writer, and my first book is a fantasy novel that has an asexual woman as a love interest to the female main character. What advice do you have for me? What representation do you want in literature? I've tried to do a little research before this, but I want it straight from the mouth. 

I've tried to make the asexual character well rounded with hobbies, goals, etc. I'd like to make it clear that the main character doesn't expect sex from the character or think they're the one to change them. I know that the romantic and sexual spectrum are different, and this particular character is not aro. I'm wondering where I should put them on the asexuality spectrum. Demi was my first instinct, but I don't want to make it seem like a cop out or like my main character had the magical vagina that could change someone's identity. If I were to make them demi how long do you think it would take for sexual interest to occur? Tell me what else you want me to keep in mind? Do you mind that someone who isn't ace is trying to write an ace character? I'd love as much advice as you'll give. ",asexuality
I was trying to look at candles when...,"This guy walked down the aisle and said, “oh look at you, you must be getting freaky tonight” SIR MAYBE I JUST LIKE CANDLES ",asexuality
How would you describe wanting to pursue a relationship without the sex?,"My best friend and I were talking and I was explaining how I’d still like to date or maybe marry someone one day and I had a hard time explaining the difference between a romantic and friend relationship because I feel like it’s more than that but can’t explain the feelings that go with that difference between the two. 

Anyone have good metaphors?",asexuality
Asexual episode,,asexuality
What does Asexuality mean to you?,"Hey friends! I have a blog about mental health and asexuality and for my latest post I am getting testimonies from fellow aces about what asexuality has meant to you. What is your most notable experience? It could be a musing, an experience, a slur or just the way that you would describe your sexuality? Anything you can think of just pop it in the comments! :)",asexuality
"One year ago today I discovered I was asexual! For this special 1 year anniversary I bought myself a present, a pride flag!",,asexuality
List of ace symbols,"I thought it might be a good idea to make a list of all the ace symbols and other parts of ace culture. It might be really confusing for new aces to understand things like garlic bread etc.
So I thought maybe we could collect everything in the comments and if possible explain why it became a part of our culture!

- The colors of the flag (obviously)
- Cake and garlic bread
- Ace of spades
- Dragons
- Aven triangle
- Black Ring http://wiki.asexuality.org/Black_ring
- Todd Chavez
- Athena and Artemis
- Robots and plants (anti symbols)",asexuality
You know you're ace when...,"... you see that condoms cost about 0,7€ a piece in your local supermarket, and having sex is not worth paying that much for.   


(and for americans, that is maybe 0,8 dollars)",asexuality
Looking for opinions,"Hello! I just created this reddit account and I am not even sure how this whole thing works, but I was wondering about your opinion.   


I am not even sure if I am asexual, but I understand that the term is quite wide, so I might fit under it. I am not interested in sex, yet I am still physically attracted to my long-term partner. I don't mind pleasuring him, but he wants to do the same for me and I just don't feel comfortable. I often try to 'escape' the more sexual touches or they tickle me or cause me uncomfortable goose bumps. The fact that penetrative sex is painful for me and the doc tells me 'it is in my head' is not very helpful either. I am still attracted to him, both emotionally and physically, I find him sexy and I masturbate, quite often unless I am under a lot of stress.   


My partner is very understanding, never pushed me into anything and I truly love him. I just feel horrible I cant give him all he wants. Otherwise we are happy together, so I hope this will sort itself somehow in the long term.   


Is there anyone else with similar experience? If so, how do you please your partner? Did you go to therapy? If you did, did they give you some useful exercises that helped? ",asexuality
me irl,,asexuality
Saw an ace flag at college.,Thank you person in around my housing area with an LGBT and Ace flag in their window. It made me smile. ,asexuality
Living in a sexualized world,"Hey guys, I'm a business student and I have a debate at school on Tuesday. The statement I have to defend with my group is why sexualized commercial should NOT be allowed. 

So, I thought, why shouldn't I look from our perspective as many of us have been confused for a long time in this sexualized world and I am unfortunately pretty sure that there are some people that got some more serious issues because of this.

That's why I want to ask you guys: How do you feel personally about commercials with sexualized male or female characters?",asexuality
aroace persona here really confused about feelings,"I'm so confused about my asexuslity rn, ive been identifying myself as an aroace for years but lately i have this need for intimacy and i don't know how to react to it it's driving me crazy",asexuality
how do i tell my friends I think I'm grey-ace?,"(19F) So my friends and I always talk about sex and that kind of stuff since we met (we were like 14) and when I was 17 I realized I didn't want to have sex I just enjoyed talking about it. 

After my best boy friend lost his virginity he's been teasing all three of us about when are we going to lose it. Both of them are eager to have sex, and I've been pretending I am too.

Last night we were talking about it and I was tipsy enough to confess sex is not as important for me as it is for them, but two of them were weirded out, because they don't know the concept of asexuality (also they assume everyone else is as horny as them all the time) and I don't blame them. Of course my best girl friend understood because she is familiar with it although she has said she doesn't understand it.

I debated on telling them last night, but first of all I'm not even sure I am grey sexual. I hope someone here can tell me their opinion about it.

 I've had a total of three casual partners.

1. I was emotionally attracted to him. I wanted to cuddle and kiss and hug, but all he wanted was sex, so we ended things because I wasn't sexually attracted to him. Like at all. We were a thing for a long time and I, not even once, thought of him in a sexual way. 

2 and 3. I was sexually attracted to them but not emotionally and I rejected sex because they were assholes. 

It's weird for me to find someone I'm sexually attracted to and I'm worried I'll ever find someone I'm both sexually and emotionally attracted to because I crave love but sex not that much, and I'm not sure my partner would understand.",asexuality
Leopard geckos. Pride gecks.,,asexuality
"Radio Silence: '17 YA Coming of Age tale around a char with a Night Vale-esque podcast. Demi, bi, and gay chars! I really enjoyed this one. Others read it?",,asexuality
"A bit early for ace week, but delicious none the less",,asexuality
I will never understand the mind of allos,,asexuality
"I'd want the towel too, but maybe not because of Christianity",,asexuality
"At this point I am really sure that I'm asexual. How do I cope with ""not being normal""?","For me it feels  natural and right to not want to have sexual relations, but idk, I wish I was normal",asexuality
"Aces who's SO is ace, how'd you meet your partner?","I'm thinking of making an AVEN account, it seems like it has more people than acebook or ACEapp ",asexuality
Having an asexual partner,"So this girl and I (also a female) have been casually dating for a bit. She just told me that she's asexual. I have absolutely no problem with anyone being asexual and I'm glad that she trusts me enough to tell me this, however I'm not asexual and personally have quite a high sex drive. I'm really into her and like her a lot but I just... don't know if that's a deal breaker for me? I truly don't mean to sound like an asshole for saying that, but I like having sex and I'm not sure how to go about dating someone who doesn't. Of course I respect her sexual preferences and would never pressure her into doing anything she doesn't want to do, I'm just so confused as to what I should do. 

I'm really sorry if this sounds shallow or offensive, I'm just very conflicted.",asexuality
Do we have a responsibility to come out?,"Assuming it is safe to do so, should asexuals always come out. Many people in the community think that it’s not that unimportant to come out, but doesn’t this just contribute to the ignorance? If we can, shouldn’t we increase our representation and come out.

Peoples minds about asexuality aren’t going to change by themselves and maybe by knowing an asexual person personally their minds will change.",asexuality
I’m not really sure what my sexuality is.,"I used to think I was heterosexual, then I thought I was bi/ pan, now I’m wondering how far along I am on the asexual spectrum.

I’ve had sex before, sexual and romantic attraction, but sometimes my sexual attraction is turned off. And I like when it is turned off.

I’m not sure if I like sex (when I like it) because of the intimacy, but sometimes I really don’t enjoy it too. Sex can become a huge expectation. 

I like pleasing people, but it seems that everyone is playing make believe, inventing their own personalities.
If we are all just inventing ourselves, why should we care about the preferences we and others have  when those preferences may as well be the preferences of a different character we decide to play?

I’m not sure how much is just social expectations and how much is my own desires.

I was Buddhist as a teen, and I think that Buddhism has really effected the way I think about desire, finding that space to observe your compulsions, finding that you weren’t into it so much. 

Just habitual behaviour that if you bring your attention to observing your supposed internal need for, the behaviour loses it’s appeal.

I don’t know how I feel really. I’m sort of used to being comfortable being uncomfortable. ",asexuality
Auto correct is ace,,asexuality
Asexual Visibility Week,Can anyone confirm that Visibility Week is October 21 - 27 this year?,asexuality
Setting priorities,,asexuality
How common is it for sexuality to change over time.,"I’m relatively confident in my asexuality today, but I’m not sure I was always this way. My memory is very very bad. I only realized I might be ace a week or two ago, and I honestly can’t even remember if I felt sexual attraction last year. I know that 3 or 4 years ago I was one horny mother fucker. My memory isn’t good enough to really know if I was ever sexually attracted to people back then, but I feel like I was. So I’m wondering if anyone here has experience with their sexuality changing. How common is it. Is it more common for adolescents or adults? Is it possible I was ace back then but didn’t realize it.? What do y’all think?",asexuality
My Asexual Story,"Around 7th-8th grade, this is when I first started to have crushes on others. I never really thought about it, but I didn't know why I liked the other. I guess it's normally around this age guys start to have ""THOSE"" thoughts, if you catch my drift (I dunno, I never experienced it myself.

But anyways, I didn't know why I liked the people I had crushes on. It most certainly not because ""Oh shit, she so hot!"" or whatever. I guess I just... liked them? I dunno. 

Also, In sex ed class, I didn't see the screen and thought ""Ha! Boobs!"" I just thought... ""Oh... it's just a human body... whatever"". I don't think nudity ever bothers me all that much honestly. I'm not saying I would just walk around nude all the time, I'm pretty self-conscious  about my body honestly. But like, when I accidentally walk in on someone when their changing or whatever, I just think ""Oh shit, my bad"" and just walk out. 

Skip a couple of years to 10th-12th grade. At this point, this is when I expected to experience sexual attraction. ...but I never did. I still sometimes have crushes on other girls, but I never felt THAT kind of attraction towards them. Sure, I thought they were pretty or cute, but I never think ""Oh shit, wanna put my dick in that"" or whatever. It was also around that time I thought I might have been gay or bi, but I didn't feel attraction to dudes either. 

Also, when my old school friends would sometimes (We were all fucking geeks) talk hot people or whatever, I just stand off to the side awkwardly, not knowing what to say. They would sometimes try to include me in the conversation by asking me which celebrity I thought is the hottest or sexiest or whatever. I would always respond with...

""...I-I don't know...""

I honestly sometimes get embarrassed about talking about those kinds of subjects such as sex and whatnot. Like to me, it just seems like a activity people like to do. And I'm just not into it. 

I didn't find out that I was Asexual until around the end of my last year of school. Before that, I never felt lost or sad or whatever about not knowing what my sexuality was. It wasn't until I was doing a school project about Sexuality and shit like that I found a page about people who are Asexual. When I read it, my first thought is...

""Wait... what I am has a name?"" So I read some stuff about Asexuality. I read the words ""Someone who lacks or has no sexual attraction towards either sex or gender"". And then I just thought ""Hey... that's like how I feel"". And then I just accepted I was Asexual from then on.

I didn't tell my friends and family about it, but when i finally did, they all had the same reaction. When I told my younger brother, the first person I 'Came out' to just said ""Ok"". When I told my friends, they were just like ""Alright, cool"". And when I finally told my Ma... she just accepted it. 

Honestly, not much has changed when I discovered I was Asexual. It's just that one day, I thought I was just different from everyone, to... well... pretty much the same anyways. I don't really just blurt out to anyone that I'm Asexual. If they specifically ask me, that's when I tell them.

And... I guess that is it for my asexual story I guess. Not much of a story really... just a little ""Hey, this happened"". I'm honestly quite fine the way I am. 

I have a awesome girlfriend (Long distance) who accepts me the way I am and so do my friends. I feel... happy.",asexuality
Just realizing I think I'm asexual after entering only my second relationship ever. The person I'm dating is extremely allosexual and I'm feeling nervous and overwhelmed to say the least.,"I apologize in advance for this semi-stream of consciousness you're about to read. I've never quite had an identity crisis like this before.

My whole life I've never really prioritized relationships. I had one brief relationship in high school, but we broke things off before it got sexual. I've dealt with a lot of loneliness, but relationships often seemed like more trouble than they were worth.

I had never even heard of asexuality until maybe 2 years ago, and, I'm sorry to say, I was quite dismissive of it at first. I didn't see anything wrong with it, but I didn't see it's relevance to me. Besides, I enjoyed masturbation every now and then, and I figured that automatically ""disqualified"" me. I didn't really start to take asexuality seriously until I saw Todd's character on Bojack Horseman and actually met an asexual person in college. Still thought it didn't have relevance to me, because masturbation.

That leads me to my current crisis. I've started dating someone for basically the second time ever. Things have been going well with cuddling, good conversations with no awkward silences, and just generally learning more about each other and building affection and trust. You know. Relationships. Well, we just got through the ""how much experience do you have and what do you like to do in the bedroom"" talk. A night of sleep and thinking about that conversation has lead me to my current situation. I realized that even though I love this person and trust them a great deal, the idea of sex with them makes me feel disinterested at best, and extremely anxious at worst. Currently trembling and definitely leaning more towards anxious at the moment.

It finally just struck me like a lightning bolt: ""Holy hell, I've always wanted a romantic relationship, but the idea of sex with a person who trusts and loves me still has zero appeal."" If we did do anything, I can honestly say it would only be out of a since of obligation on my part to try to make her happy. I just want to cuddle and hang out and help each other work through our emotional issues. That's all I've ever wanted from a relationship. Now I have no idea what to do. I don't want to reject her sexually and make her feel like she's unattractive or I don't like her, but having sex with her just holds zero appeal for me.

&amp;#x200B;

I guess I came here for advice, maybe? Or just solidarity? Maybe I just needed to vent, but felt like I couldn't talk with anyone I know IRL about this. Any support would be appreciated.

I have to go about my day now, but this has been utterly consuming my thoughts ever since I had this realization.",asexuality
Could my boyfriend be asexual?,"Hi, I am sorry in advance that I am not so educated or make some stupid points. I don’t want to offend anyone. 
So we have been dating for almost 3 years and I am very sexual while he is not. 

so most of the time sex is insinuated by me and he just goes along the way. also we are really open and not so jealous so we comment if we find other people attractive and mostly he doesn’t find other girls so attractive he says they are pretty but nothing else. also I have talked to him about asexuality or demi-sexuals and he says he is not so sure if thats that. but both of us are so uneducated so thats why I came here.  We talked about his previous relationship with girls and he always says he never had that much sexual attraction  for them.  He finds sex dirty, like he likes it during the time and after he is kind of disgusted by the thought off it. I see he is trying to hide it to not offend me. He always says he is attracted to me but it seems to me that that’s his love for me not so much a sexual attraction. It’s something he developed over the time. 

we are very much in love, we both lost our virginity together. even if he is asexual that wouldn’t change my love for him of course. I came in here just to clarify some things and not put pressure on him. I want him to be happy even if that means he can’t be with me. also sorry for my english not my maternal language ",asexuality
Rare sexual attraction,"For context: I'm female, 17 years old

I'm at the moment in my second relationship, but I don't really count the first one. Outside of these relationships I had a few crushes. After a conversation with a friend about crushes and attraction (he knows I'm not really into sex) I realized, that I never felt any sexual attraction to anyone, only romantic, except to my current boyfriend. I thought of myself as asexual before, but now I'm a bit confused. I still don't want to have sex with him because this sexual attraction is very rare and even if I agree to trying it, I get too afraid and nervous, so we'll stop. I'm just confused about myself.",asexuality
Asexuals needed," I know this might not be the best but I'm a young author writing a book. I decided to make my main character asexual. My brother, who is asexual, told me to get more opinions than just his. So i thought Reddit would be a great place to go.",asexuality
I'm just so lonely,"I wish I had a partner but being that I'm not very good at sex because I lack the raw passion of an allo person I feel I'll never be able to keep a man. I don't have many friends as well either. I'd ask for online friends but I doubt I'd even keep up with it because it's not like a friendship that can ""go somewhere"", like hang out for real. I just feel so lonely lately and I don't know how to deal with it. I tried ACEapp and there's no one in my area. 😑😔😞

Edit: anyone know how I can make some kind of ace keychain or something? Subtle enough to go unnoticed by allos but on the off chance I run into an ace person they might say something? I frequently wear a ring

EDIT AGAIN: why don't we have a chat thing? A few other subs have chat sections, I've never been on them though because i just come to Reddit to cope with my asexuality in light of my recent depressing realization",asexuality
how do you deal with internalized acephobia?,"For the past few years, I've been casually coming out as ace to my closest friends and part of my family. And one thing I've noticed is that the biggest backlash doesn't come from my friends, who are supportive if slightly nonplussed, but from *myself*. I get so defensive! I over-explain, and feel in general like I'm making a whole lot of noise about nothing. Sometimes I feel like I'm putting a show, exaggerating my asexuality so it's *really visible* to them. 

&amp;#x200B;

And here's the worst part. I don't know how to make visible something that, to me, is clearly a *void* of something. I watch those ""growing up ace"" videos on youtube, mentally judging the people when I feel they're not convincing enough, coming up with contra arguments that invalidate *their* experience. I obsessively follow ace organizations on twitter and try to fix their arguments in my mind to make sure they pass muster with the worst critic I can imagine, which is me. I'm always the voice in my head thinking asexuality is repression in disguise, that something must have happened to make me and others like this.

&amp;#x200B;

I know enough about self-hatred to understand that that has nothing to do with other people and everything to do with a distorted vision of myself. And I intellectually understand I'm full of bs and that some of my thoughts are plain ace and homophobic. But that doesn't stop them. I like to think of myself as tolerant and I want to be a better member of the queer community, but I don't think I'm mentally prepared to be supportive of someone else when I keep thinking of my asexuality as a defect. I don't know what to do.

&amp;#x200B;",asexuality
Helping a friend.,"Today I learnt that a friend I have recently made is asexual. I had a very positive conversation with them and learnt a lot about their views on sex and relationships. They also confided in me their frustrations with finding a partner. 

They aren’t on Reddit and don’t have any dating profiles. I wonder if there are any subreddits/apps/ dating websites that you could recommend that I could let my friend know about. 

My friend is going to therapy to accept their sexual identity and I would love help them in their endeavour to build a positive relationship. 

Thank you for reading. ",asexuality
How many people in your life actually accept and embrace your sexuality?,"In my case barely any, like it’s a good.....75% don’t really understand or want to ",asexuality
Asexuality and Pride,,asexuality
Born this way or developed over time?,"For the longest time I thought I was different or broken. I haven’t been interested in or enjoyed sex in about a decade (I’m only 33). I’ve tried therapy, I’ve tried to force interest. But it just isn’t there. I willingly have sex with my husband because I love him and understand it’s a natural desire he has. I just want to find people who feel this way too. I’m sick of feeling like I’m not “normal”. I even went through a period where I thought I was gay because I didn’t have much interest in men. But came to find out I didn’t have much interest in women either. I’ve gone through periods where I was envious of other people’s sex lives. I’m not broken, I’m not weird (okay maybe I’m a little weird), I’m not a prude, I’m just me. I can’t change who I am and I don’t want to. I’m accepting it and want to find other people who feel the same. ",asexuality
Hormone imbalance?,Hello I’m new here and lost. I used to have sexual feelings in like middle school and a little younger but then they faded and now I really have none. I am in college and I have no interest in sex. Help ehhhh,asexuality
I have some questions as a CIS man,"So I’m trying to understand asexuality but these questions I have keep me from accepting it. 

Asexual questions
What is your definition of love? 

Is physical/emotional intimacy tough for you?

Do you view romantic relationships practically? And if you do what are the most important 
qualities? 

do you use understand sexual feelings and if you don’t why don’t you view it as a disorder? 

Is sexuality on a spectrum? 
And if it is how is it different from people who view sexuality as repulsive? ",asexuality
I found a crystal on IG that has Big Ace Energy,,asexuality
Is it the lack of sexual attraction or the lack of sexual desire that determines asexuality?,"Or is it both, with the absence of one being enough to qualify as asexual? ",asexuality
Finding an Ace Home in the Pride Hubbub,"Hey graceful, aceful friends.

I wrote a blog post during Pride Month this year. And it was a little after I came out on Facebook as Ace and Straight. Just thought I would share it now cause lately:

I was wondering what do other Aces do around Pride?

I love all my friends of all spectrumy colors, but I am always less inclined to party at the Pride Parade in Chicago, at least. It's rowdy af. I like getting rowdy here and there, but it's a sexually charged energy I honestly don't feel safe in as an Ace. Just like any other bar crawl, or festival where people are drinking a lot.

(Just a side note: I love good mosh pits. Some kind of ""we're dancing"" ettiquette versus ""everyone miighhtt just group kiss each other"" vibe.)

[https://beccathamcomedy.wixsite.com/beccabetter/becca-better-blog/donut-holes-and-pride-parades](https://beccathamcomedy.wixsite.com/beccabetter/becca-better-blog/donut-holes-and-pride-parades)",asexuality
Ace activewear... Should I get it? ^_^,,asexuality
Does being Ace make you oblivious to flirting?,"While I’ve never experienced crushes myself, I feel like my whole entire life went by without anyone ever expressing interest in me... but that can’t be possible right? Especially because I’m a female...?

I’d say I’m around a 7, i have no bad habits or physical disabilities, i have normal hobbies and interests, have a “cool” job that would make some people envious, I have no problem with making friends and very comfortable with my social groups, so I wouldn’t say that I’m a social outcast, and been exposed to social situations a lot.  

I was getting really depressed thinking about how I dont even get a sign of interest... but is it possible that I’m just oblivious?

Because all the actions I do are out of kindness or genuinely just want to be friends, not get into anyones pants. I wonder if because of that I just see everyone else’s actions to me is that they just want to be friends. And me ignoring some cues means the other person feels like I’m not interested. 

I’ve had social interactions and afterwards another friend would go up to me and ask “oooh are you and ____ a thing now?”
It takes me aback because I literally would think that convo was just a normal friendly convo. 

I’ve obviously watched movies where flirting is involved... but the movies just make it seem more obvious lol. 

I wonder if it’s being part of an Ace, which I hope so... it’s either that or literally no on likes me, or I’m just socially inept. ",asexuality
Bought an ace pride pin at a comic con (and a chaotic good pin),,asexuality
how could someone non-sexually seduce you?,,asexuality
Finding an ace partner?,"Hi, does anyone have any tips on finding other ace partners?

I've never had a boyfriend or girlfriend before, but tbh i really want a relationship before i graduate college but i also don't know how to find people who are okay with me being very asexual.",asexuality
how do i know for sure?,"hi, i don’t want to post an essay or anything but i’ve been on fluoxetine for depression and anxiety for a few years, and one of the side effects is a low sex drive - except mine is nonexistent and i don’t really remember having one before. the idea of sex makes me uncomfortable and even though i’m attracted to guys and gals (and nbs), it’s always at face value and the attraction fades as soon as it’s reciprocated. how do i know if im ace or just having side effects? thanks ",asexuality
"Given that Aces sometimes have trouble satisfying their partners sexual needs, it is often suggested that we seek out poly relationships or open our existing relationships. How do we all feel about this?","I wanted to make a poll, but you either can't or I can't figure out how to do it. In either case, here are some sample options.

A. Sounds great!

B. I'm ok with my partner seeing other people, but have no plans to seek other partners myself. 

C. I'd prefer not to, but I understand that compromises like this are sometimes necessary. 

D. Outside sex yes, outside relationships no. No other boyfriends/girlfriends; that means casual sex only. 

E. Absolutely not!

For me personally, I put myself somewhere between options D or E. The thought of my girlfriend having sex with other men makes me a little bit uncomfortable but I think I could come to terms with it as long as strict rules were followed. However, her having other boyfriends is absolutely out of the question. I refuse to compete for my own girlfriends time and attention, especially since I stand to do poorly in that competition given that her other partners share a sexual connection with her that I do not. 

What do you all think?",asexuality
Annoying work incident - we've all had them!,"I just got transferred back to my old store at work after a year at another location and obviously there are a lot of new faces. We have a new shift supervisor (Matt) as well as a new cashier (Katie). 

Well, we were doing introductions and Matt walks away to get back to doing work but Katie hangs around for another minute. First three things she asks me upon meeting me: what's your name? How old are you? Are you single? 

Finding out I was single led to ""can I give you Matt's number? We're trying to get him a girlfriend."" 

And when I said (awkwardly) that I wasn't interested, she got weird about that answer! Like seriously? Aren't work relationships a big no-no? And I literally just met this guy 5 minutes ago. Chill out. 

I dunno, I should just get over myself and say I'm aro-ace in those situations but I hate having to explain my sexuality to people. And the day was already super emotional since my boss screwed me over in an unrelated incident earlier that day. ",asexuality
Need some clarification here.,"So I’m not going to sugar coat this or try and stall. I like to masturbate and watch porn. However, the thought of actually sticking my penis in something and having sex disgusts me. I don’t really know if this makes me Ace or not. Since I like porn, I like watching sex, I just don’t like the thought of me having sex. Am I Ace?",asexuality
Survey on Queer experience for music project!,"*(While I am aware of the varied opinions of the word Queer, I'm using it as an umbrella term for all sexual and gender minorities and other non-normative identities)*

**I have received approval from mods to post this.​**

&amp;#x200B;

Hello!

For my university degree project I am creating an album expressing: people's experience being Queer; Queer theory; and my Queer experience.

Everyone's experience is extremely unique yet I want to see what themes arise across a variety of people outside of the sexuality and gender norms.

I have created a survey (linked below) and it would be extremely helpful if you could spare some time to answer what you can! All questions are optional and you can answer as much as your comfortable with, however the more detail of thoughts and feelings the better!

&amp;#x200B;

I also feel its important to get an asexual perspective as it's often overlooked, I don't know much about the experience of discovering this and I'd love to be educated!

&amp;#x200B;

If you have any questions let me know!

Thank you!

Robert

# [Link to survey](https://robertcarr1.typeform.com/to/dsh0OV)",asexuality
Any advice or personal experiences with individuals in relationships with differing libidos?,"I've always been someone who has been pretty self-aware. I'm kind of a high-strung person, I keep my mind busy by not giving me any time to mentally unravel/relax, and as long as I've known I haven't had any true ""butterflies"" feeling -- sexually.

There have been times where I used to drink a bit and those nights I would ""open"" up. Before I continue, I want to state that I've only been with my S/O, and the desire has only been there with him. But even though those nights I'd been in an inebriated state, I needed that liquid courage to get me over that hill not wishing to engage. I no longer really drink, but I felt that was the only thing that could get me to loosen up. Now that it's not really apart of my life anymore (though it is his,) I feel like I'm being rude or almost cheating my S/O out of a ""normal"" relationship. We've gotten into fights over this in the past and it always makes me feel guilty because I know it's something I can't change.

I love my S/O incredibly much but I feel that it's unfair to him because I don't really have the ""desire"" the same way he does. We are an incredible match for each other but this has gotten in the way a bit now, I was wondering how other people handle it. Before anyone thinks of polyamory, we are completely monogamous and an open relationship would be out of the question. I find myself just going with the flow whenever he engages because if it were up to me, I'd just love to sleep next to him every night, but I know that doesn't exactly make for a healthy relationship for people who don't have the same mindset. ",asexuality
Made a soda tab bracelet for my bf using his favorite colors and neither of us realized it’s grey/ace colors,,asexuality
These thoughts have been keeping me up at night recently.,"Hi, I’ve just come to realise the fact that I’m probably an ace of some sorts. I’m female, 24 years old and up until now, I’ve never had a crush, let alone a relationship. The strongest I’ve felt is when I yearn the attention of someone in particular, but I don’t have any urges to feel physical contact with them. 

But I really do wish in the future I will find someone to be with and have a loving relationship because the thought my of being alone scares me. My parents aren’t gonna be around forever, and other family will have their own lives to care about. 

This world is full of people who just think about sex all the time, so I don’t believe there will be a good person for me. 

I know living alone is awesome; I’m alone right now. But honestly I consider myself quite dependant. I would like someone who would take care of me if I get sick, and having extra financial support would be great. 

But I think the above reasons are the only reasons why I want to be in a relationship... because I want to rely on someone to look after me financially and for my wellbeing. 

They’re such selfish thoughts...
Sorry I realised these thoughts must be pretty common, but I would like to let these frustrations and worries out of my system. ",asexuality
Asexual or mental health symptom or something else?,"I think I am somewhere on the ace spectrum. I have always thought sex was just weird. Like I can't help but think of animals in the wild when I see porn or something haha And I DO NOT like genitals. That I know is true. I get squicked out just thinking about it. 

&amp;#x200B;

However, I have been very sexually active at times. For one I masturbate all the time. Honestly have an issue with it that I think is related to PTSD. I was also heavily into the BDSM scene for a while but it was really the psychological aspect of it that got me going. But I would have sex and I sought it out even though I still thought it was weird and kind of gross. I can be having sex and all I can think about is how weird it is! I've also gone long periods of time without sex and that's totally fine by me. 

&amp;#x200B;

I have severe PTSD from childhood (unclear whether there was early sexual trauma but it seems likely) and I'm not sure if that's why I have these ace tendencies. Even if that's the case I don't think my icky feeling towards sex is going to go away.

&amp;#x200B;

Is there anyone else on here like this? Am I like a transient asexual or something? haha

&amp;#x200B;",asexuality
Question about aromantics?,"The thing is, I know I am asexual. There is no doubt about it. However, whether or not I experience romantic attraction is what confuses me. What I want in a relationship is someone I can be close with and experience intimacy, without that intimacy being sexual or inherently romantic. But I’d still want to call them my partner. And that’s the other thing: I don’t even necessarily want a romantic relationship. It’s just a hypothetical. Could I be aromantic? Can an aromantic still desire a relationship?",asexuality
need clarification of the ace definition,"For awhile I identified as strictly ace, but then found my current boyfriend. He is the only person i’ve actually been sexually attracted to and found sexually desirable, even though I’ve had several previous boyfriends.

So i was wondering, in the part of the ace definition that refers to “or very rarely experiences sexual attraction” does the “rarely” refer to the portion of time one feels attraction to their current partner or the number of people they have felt attracted to?

Basically, I feel sexually attracted to my current boyfriend all the time, but he is literally the only person i’ve felt attraction towards. Does that make me still ace or something like gray ace? I’ve considered demi, but my previous boyfriend and I were very emotionally attached via various traumas and understandings, but I didn’t want sex with him either.

Thanks!",asexuality
Sex-Positive Asexual Maybe? I'm confused.,"I used to identify as Ace. I didn't like sex and wasn't super interested in having it. I didn't have a libido at all, really, until I was in college and my sex drive was (and is) pretty low. I get lots of romantic attraction and yearnings.

The problem is I have a new partner and I really enjoy sex with him. It's a good time. My sex drive is still really low and he has to do a lot build up via text message and ect. To get me to the point of wanting sex but I *do* get there. I enjoy the exchange of nudes and such. I thought initially I had just misidentified when I was younger. 

Then I realized... I still don't  *want* to have sex. Like. I'll do it for him because it's nice to see him so happy but... like we were online and did all the same build up and foreplay and sexy talk and it just ended with him masturbating, I found myself just as happy. 

Someone said maybe I'm just Sex Positive. But it feels wrong because I like to engage in sex. Sometimes I'll even initiate it. I orgasm regularly. I think I'd be sad if he didn't want to have sex with me anymore. 

I'm really confused and it feels like I don't know who I am anymore. Did I mislabel myself? I feel like I'm just making shit up at this point and I feel so lost.",asexuality
An ace flag-colored eyeshadow palette from a brand called Ace Beaute,,asexuality
Just realized I’ve had this pillow for a few years,,asexuality
JUST FOUND OUT I AM NOT A FREAK! (ish. at least I’m not alone),,asexuality
question,"how many of you didn't know the song ""cake by the ocean"" was about beach sex until someone else told you?

i thought it was actually about eating cake on a beach until i saw a textpost where someone said, ""yeah it's pretty good for a song about beach sex""",asexuality
not sure if its been posted but he makes me so happy. (show bojack horsman),,asexuality
My social anxiety makes me unable to enjoy sex... Am I asexual?,"I do have a sex drive and I am physically attracted to women. For most of my life I thought I was basically an incel, or something similar. But then I finally lost my virginity at 29. The problem was I didn't enjoy it. I mean, I enjoyed it, but not as much as I enjoy jacking off. 

I have had sexual opportunities since then, but I wasn't really that interested. Why go through the trouble if it's not going to be something I can enjoy?

Also, I don't like touching people, especially strangers. It is difficult for me to give someone a hug or even a handshake. I do value romantic relationships, so I'm not aromantic. I actually enjoy kissing more than I enjoy sex. So am I asexual?",asexuality
How do you react to sex or romance in literature?,"I was reading The Stranger by Albert Camus and the parts about the relationship between the character and his lover felt natural to me. I didn't even thought about it, it didn't bother me. After that I started reading Survivor by Chuck Palahniuk and I thought about sex at some points. So it was not like The Stranger because I didn't feel like anything was out of place when I was reading The Stranger but it was not the same when I was reading Survivor or 1984.

  So I was curious if any of you have some examples of this or any other experience about sex and romance when it comes to literature.

  I've read the translations of these books if it makes any difference and I am not native in English so sorry about any mistakes. ",asexuality
Im conflicted,"I am attracted to people and I love to flirt. I love romantic things and kissing and hugs and cuddles when they don't lead to sex. I've mostly been with men, and the idea of penetration annoys me. I have a low libido, so when I do want to have sex it's few and far between. Men are pretty, women are pretty. But I just don't care about sex much. No matter who it's with I think. And IDK if I'm like...panromantic and asexual?? Or even how to put it into terms. I've always just thought sex was a part of the relationship you put up with as a woman because your partner is gonna wanna have sex every day... And if you don't they get mad. 

Like seriously, my boyfriend- I love him, but he gets grumpy if we don't have sex at least every other day. And it makes it a chore, no matter how ""fun"" it might potentially be. 

I'm just confused and unsure and kind of looking for a guide or something...",asexuality
I think I nay be a traitor...,"I think brownies are better than cake and that cake tastes like crap.

I need to know I'm not alone.

EDIT: I spelled ""may"" wrong in the title.",asexuality
Not sure what emotional response this means,"Hi,

I consider myself grey-a and today I had a great intellectual conversation with my squish today over text messages. And it got me so squishy feeling I think I was turned on. Not by their looks (cause I wasn't looking at them) but by their intellect and the discussion. I never look at them and go ""golly gee, their hot I would like to have sex with them now."" Or anyone else for that matter. I find my squish aesthetically pleasing to look at, but it doesn't get me aroused. 

Thoughts anyone? Does this mean that for me to want to have sex with them, they're going to have to read out their thesis chapters to me? ;)

In all seriousness, I'm new to all this and trying to understand myself.

Thanks!

 ",asexuality
Educate me: Why dragons?,"Hi everyone! I’ve been hanging around this subreddit for ~6 months now, and I’m very familiar with cake and black rings as symbols of asexuality. However, I’ve also noticed dragons being used to portray asexuality and I was wondering if anyone knew when and why they arose to this status. 

Sure, I could just use google, but I’d like to get a response from multiple people (and I’m lazy).

Thanks in advance!",asexuality
Questions,"so here's my situation - I'm 42yr old male, been married for 16 years.  I've never really been that into sex, either with my wife or masturbation... We do have a relatively intimate life, but it's not super sexual (even though I know she would like it to be), and I am super happy with our life and love my wife to bits.

But it's the not really wanting to have sex that bugs me, and it's not even just sex, I just don't feel sexual.

Ever since I was a pre-teen I love being nude, especially around other people but I don't get sexual satisfaction out of it...

I posted nude photos online hoping I would feel something but I don't .... 

My wife knows about my situation but I feel like I am cheating her out of something...

I've been with men and women before and nothing feels different or wrong or weird... I'm simply not overly interested.",asexuality
Ramble and questioning.,"Sorry if this is a common post here. I kinda have an inkling that im on the ace spectrum but i just wanted to see anyone else can relate. So far i can only see other people as close friends or family. The closest i can feel to attraction to another person is ""i want to be that person's friend"". Cuddling and the occasional kiss is enough for me and sex seems like a completely unrelated alien act/ritual that everyone seems to do naturally.  I dont understand what people mean by a sexually attractive person but i can appreciate when someone looks good (nice face, fit, makeup, fashion etc). Relationships are strange. I want to be affectionate with the people that are close to me. Not just one person. 

Thanks for reading",asexuality
Just wanted to say thanks,"Four years ago, I was studying etymology for SATs when a thought came to me: if there is hetero-, homo- and bi- sexual then technically there should be a-sexual as well. Due to lack of internet i was unable to confirm my doubts.  However,  I started joking with my friends that I am asexual. Eventually, I forgot about it until I started university.

I was hit by the realization that relationships are more about sex and less about friendship than I thought. I also realized that people dont find touching other people disgusting... they actually like it. I used to think that people just pretend to, due to the social pressure. This scared me because I knew that if I ever have to participate in any kind of sexual activity I would get traumatized. I didnt know what was wrong with me but I felt broken. 

It was around this time that I remembered that I had to search the word asexual. For some reason instead of ""googling"" it I searched it on reddit. And I was amazed to find two subreddits on this topic. 

It was here that my education started and I learnt that I am normal. All of you have helped me accept myself and realise that I do not have to train myself to lead a typical relationship. It is acceptable to be me. Thank you.",asexuality
Being ace is pretty metal.,,asexuality
New movie AsexuaLOVE,"Dear All,

Eva Lammelova made a movie about two asexual people from Czech Republic called AsexuaLOVE (2018).

**There is a trailer of movie:** [https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=v\_lg4ywzQEA&amp;feature=youtu.be](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=v_lg4ywzQEA&amp;feature=youtu.be)

**There is a movie with english subtitles, you can download it for about 4 euro:** [https://dafilms.com/film/10486-asexualove](https://dafilms.com/film/10486-asexualove)

We would also like to submit our movie to film festivals. If you know about some festival which could be interested in our movie, please let us know.

More about the movie:

**AsexuaLOVE / 40 ´/ Eva Lammelová/ Czech Republic/ 2018** 

Jana lived in social isolation. Ondřej suffered from depression. After discovering their sexual identity, they accepted themselves. They are like us, they just don't have sex. Two aromantic asexuals. Jana loves romantic stories, likes reading them and in the beginning of her career as a literary translator, romance novels were her daily bread. Ondřej hangs out with his friend Martina, who'd like to marry him. He lives with a gay couple and his cat, and sees it as an appropriate way of being himself. Some believe that sexual energy is within and everywhere around us. Few people realize there are those among us who don't feel sexual attraction. This film is a documentary portrait of two people, Jana and Ondřej, who belong to the asexual community. In the beginning of the movie, both protagonists and their (a)sexual identity is introduced. You'll find out about their process of self-identification and their journey towards coming-out, and examine the difficulties they experienced because of being different. Then you'll follow the protagonists to various places and people, revealing step by step the meaning of asexuality for Jana and Ondřej, and for the majority. The message is: Sexual identities are full of labels, but they don't need to be taken too dogmatically. Let's be tolerant and open towards all sexual identities. It will make everyone's life easier. AsexuaLOVE is the only Czech documentary focusing on this specific minority inside the LGBTQ community. It's probably also the only film about asexuality made in Europe. It was first shown in the Czech section of One World Festival 2018 (Prague), with great acclaim. One of the reasons people are interested in this topic is that our everyday life is full of sexual connotations. We live in a heteronormative society where sex is ever-present, viewed as an inherent part of being human, and that's why many people find the existence of asexuality surprising. The reason behind the making of this film has been to spread awareness about asexuality.",asexuality
Hopeless romantic ace?,"Idk if this is a place to ask for advice but I'm a biromantic ace (I strongly prefer women) and at this point I'm pretty much resigned to the fact that I'm never going to find love because of the fact that I dont sex. I am a massive sap and would love to find someone, as long as there isnt anything more than kissing. Has anyone found someone? What do you do?",asexuality
Anyone ever feel differently after adjusting medication,"For most of my adolescent and young adult life (I'm now 23) I've thought I was probably ace. I rarely felt sexual attraction and didn't have much of an interest in having sex. That entire time, however, I've been on a heavy cocktail of antidepressant and anti-anxiety meds whose side effects potentially include a change in sex drive. 

I've recently decreased the dosage in my meds and I gotta say, I've been feeling like a horny mess. For the first time ever, I'm feeling like I want to have sex with people and I'm feeling like that *a lot.* It's just kinda confusing because this whole time I've been thinking I was ace but now I'm wondering if it was just my meds killing any sex drive I might have. 

I'm definitely not trying to invalidate anyone's identity here or suggest you can ""make yourself"" not ace or whatever, I'm just speaking from my own experience and wondering if anyone has had a similar experiences.",asexuality
What it means to me to be Ace,"I have come out only recently even to myself and one of the most useful things in this journey has been people sharing their own stories on this sub. So, I want to share my definition of my asexuality in the hope that it will help someone else figure out their identity.

I am a gray asexual, sex positive person. For almost all my life I have felt broken. I didn't know why everyone else was able to form relationships with others and I couldn't. I knew the steps I had to make, how to be a girlfriend. I just never cared the way my friends did. They had so much emotion packed into their relationships. I never did. And that made me feel broken.

And this out of step feeling goes back to before my first period. In middle school, the girls all wanted to talk about who their favorite Backstreet Boy or NSYNC singer was. I could barely tell them apart. I liked the music, but when asked who my favorite was, it was the first time I had even thought to have one. I picked one who looked sweet and that was it. I made sure I remembered who I picked so I could say his name when asked in the future. That is also how I picked my first ""crush"" - he was nice, decently cute, and we were friends. He was my ""crush"" for 5 years since, as I put it then, no one better had come along. My school had thousands of students.

As for sex, sure, I am okay with it. I even enjoy it as my libido is functioning. But I don't really fantasize about a person. If I imagine sex, I imagine how I feel and what happens to me, not who I would be with. They are... Blurry.

And as for why partnered sex? Well, it is more amusing than my vibrator. There is someone else I don't control involved, so it can be fun. Literally, that is why. Allosexual people I have said this to sometimes get sad at that. 

And as for why sex at all? It's a massage. It feels nice. That's all.

But I am Gray. I have felt attraction to one or two of my partners. At least once, it was the only time I did stupid things for a man. I can be attracted to a man, but it's not usually strong and I can ignore it with barely a thought. I have to put effort into finding an attractive man in a room, to begin with. I never just notice. Someone has to point them out, usually.

So, here I am. I am a Grace, a Gray Ace. If anything I have said speaks to you, let me know. One of the best parts about this community is that people can pick the label that feels good to them. This one feels good to me.

I hope this helps someone. I hope everyone gets to put on their identity and wear it happily. I am still working on it myself, but learning what I am has helped me learn that I am not broken. 

None of us are.

",asexuality
just a friendly reminder.,"Hey beautiful people, 

&amp;#x200B;

I just wanted to say you are not broken and your feelings are valid. Whatever it is you are struggling with, it will be okay. 

&amp;#x200B;

Have a wonderful Sunday",asexuality
After a month of shipping it's finally here! My first Ace merch! Next up a flag,,asexuality
What helped you figure yourself out?,"Hey, I was just wondering what you did to help figure yourselves out and find where you are on the spectrum. I've been questioning myself for about 10 months now, and it seems like I haven't really gotten anywhere. I've identified as ace and gray ace in the past, though I never for very long and I always descended back into doubt. Normally in these posts I would post a whole bunch of context and ask what people think, though that doesn't seem to really help me at all. So I just want to ask, what help you figure out where you are? I want to know, but it just seems so hard...",asexuality
“I Thought You Were a Woman”,,asexuality
What am I and why is this suddenly important to me?,"Hi so to start this post of some apologies in advance. I'm sorry my story is quite long, I'm sorry if my English isn't that great and I'm sorry if I or my post don't belong on here. Let me know if something isn't quite clear

So I've never really paid attention to my sexual orientation, I've always told myself that I just love whoever I love and that was that (I'm a guy btw). I have been in some relationships before but they've never worked out. 
I do date quite a lot because I like meeting new people but these short relationships always deteriorate after I tell them I don't really feel like ""watching a movie"" in my dorm room, ever.
My latest date was actually a pretty great guy who didn't just scoff and fuck off when I told him I didn't want to fuck. We actually talked about sexuality. And our talk boils down to this: I don't feel attracted to him or anyone else for that matter in a sexual way I guess, I do feel attracted to people if they're really nice to me and just want to do stuff with me like going to concerts and such (to clarify I feel like I want to spend more and more time with that person).
He then told me I might be asexual.
I'd never heard of asexuality before that date and normally it wouldn't really mean anything to me, but now suddenly it does. Suddenly I feel like it's important to label my sexuality correctly and I don't know why. I mean what does it matter?, I still feel like naming it doesn't change anything. What does labeling your sexuality mean to you and why?
Beside that, am I even asexual? Because in some weird way I end up feeling attracted to some people eventually. I genrally don't enjoy sex although I've enjoyed it a few times, it means very little to me. I do masturbate but only because if I don't I ruin the sheets.
I hope you guys can help me

Again sorry for the long text",asexuality
Hello,wow i never knew that there was people like me who doesn't like it as well ,asexuality
"Confused, but looking for advice (also posted in demisexuality)","So this was a personal letter that gets my thoughts out, but I wanted to share it with this community to seek your advice.  Tl;dr is at the end.

Recently, I’ve been questioning my sexuality.  I don’t think I’m bisexual because I don’t feel a sexual attraction to men.  But on the other side, I don’t feel an immediate sexual attraction to a lot of women.  After reading online and on reddit about different sexualities, I’m trying to figure out if maybe I fall somewhere on the demisexual/asexual spectrum.

It’s been 5 years since the last time I was intimate with anyone.  At first, I thought it was because I had a traumatic sexual experience, my depression meds were stunting my libido, or I wasn’t emotionally ready.  But I’ve dated multiple people since then and whenever the topic of sex comes up, it doesn’t feel right or like something I necessarily want.  I tell myself that if I found the right person, I’d be sexually active with her.  But I’m not 100% sure if that’s the truth.  I really want kids and a family, so I feel like I definitely would need to be sexually actively for that.

I’ve been feeling conflicted lately because I sometimes feel like I need the validation of a relationship.  I do want to have a person who can be “my person” and +1, so I’m not aromantic.  I just feel like I’m tying it less to sex.  Recently, my friends decided to do something called “friend dates” where you are randomly assigned to someone else to go on a date.  I ended up going on a date with this guy who I really get along with.  I think he’s good looking with a great personality.  That date was hands down the best date I’ve been on in a long time.  I very much don’t want a sexual relationship with him, but it kinda made me want him to be “my person” or maybe he would just be my really good friend - I’m unsure. I’ve never seriously considered a guy before.  So maybe I’m biromantic.  I’m more confused than anything else.

I finally decided to talk to a friend about how I was feeling - at least the demisexual part, and it went really poorly.  She was trying to be supportive and help, but she was saying “I wasn’t trying hard enough”, “I need to start masturbating often to get over sexual hang ups”, “go on match.com or eharmony because they’re less about hook ups”, “demisexuality is a made up label and I just need to get out there again instead of labeling myself”, and stuff like that.  It felt really dismissive of how I felt so I don’t think I can talk to anyone about it anymore.

I’m getting really exhausted of pretending to have crushes on people, making comments about sexual topics, and talking to women in bars so that my friends think I’m just one of the guys.  I’m not sure who I can talk about these things with and I don’t know if I want to talk to anyone close to me until I understand myself a little bit better.

So, I wanted to know if there were any resources or chats I can go to to talk about what demisexuality/asexuality is like and what it means.  I don’t know any people with that sexuality, so I’m kind of in the dark.  I figured reddit might be a good place to start.  Thanks for reading!

Tl;dr: I think I might be demisexual/asexual but want to find a place where I can have discussions and learn more.",asexuality
Whats the term for me?,"So, I coming to believe that I am not sexually mainstream.  I started to think that maybe I'm asexual, but I don't think thats true.  I am male, and I am sexually attracted to women and occasionally men.  But I do not enjoy sex for sex.  I very much enjoy pleasing others sexually, but I honestly could care less about the act itself.  I could happily never have sex again, if I was with an asexual partner.  Further, I actually have a rather strong libido, I generally masturbate two or three times a day.  

So, I'm sorry posting here since I've come to understand I don't really belong here, but I really don't know where else to look.  For awhile in this road of self discovery I thought I was some form of asexual.  Can anyone tell me what a term for someone who:

&amp;#x200B;

\- Does feel sexual attraction

\- Has a strong libido

\- But does not like sex (intercourse, oral, anything) with others

&amp;#x200B;

Thanks

&amp;#x200B;",asexuality
Loving the representation at this store,,asexuality
I couldn’t help myself,,asexuality
Need help understanding my asexual girlfriend,"Hi guys, the other day my girlfriend told me she thinks she might be asexual, however from the way she explained it to me, it sounded like she was just saying what we already know (that she has a really low libido) so what's the difference between someone with a low libido and someone who is asexual? 
Thanks for any responses guys, much appreciated :)",asexuality
Are there any other reasons why someone wouldn’t want to have sex or masturbate?,I’m asexual (at least Im pretty sure) I don’t like the idea of having sex nor do I like masturbation. I was wondering if this could be caused by something else besides asexuality.,asexuality
My pride flag arrived a day early!,,asexuality
Poster I walked by in Copenhagen today.,,asexuality
Asexual Characters in Young Adult Books,"&amp;#x200B;

https://i.redd.it/e958n0qekhp11.png

Hey guys, I wanted to share my newest blog post with you guys because it is all about books coming out with ace characters. Let me know what your favorite ace books are! 💜🖤

[https://jellyfable.weebly.com/book-blog/upcoming-books-with-asexual-characters](https://jellyfable.weebly.com/book-blog/upcoming-books-with-asexual-characters)",asexuality
What would you say are the differences between romantic and platonic relationships? (x-post to /r/aromantic),"I know that AVEN and a lot of forums have different definitions, but I just wanted to ask you what your thoughts regarding the differences between the two.",asexuality
"I'm all for being proud of who you are, but I personally hate being asexual. I want to be a sexual person.","It's so, so hard. I want my partner to be happy, and I want to be happy too. As I get older, I see that sex is a weird mating thing that just weirds me out, but it is a necessary part of most relationships. It's just boring and uncomfortable. 

I'm at the point where I want drugs to fix this. I don't even know what kind of doctor to go to for this? A primary care doctor? 

Has anyone here successfully taken drugs for libido?",asexuality
What is love?,"Baby don’t hurt me. No, but for real what’s love. The way people describe it is this insanely strong obsession and desire for closeness. That’s gotta be an exaggeration, right? I would think it’s an exaggeration, but I never hear it described otherwise so maybe I’m wrong. Help a confused aro out, would yah?",asexuality
Can I be asexual if I have a fetish ?,I'm a guy and i have a pretty niche fetish(which i will not disclose lol) which pretty much only involves aesthetics and not anything sexual. I still think I qualify as asexual because other than that I have no sexual attraction to girls or boys. What do you guys think ?,asexuality
If I made a group for ace people on groupme would anyone be interested in joining,,asexuality
Am I asexual or is it something else?,"I am a nearly 31 male and never had any relationship whatsoever. Most of my life I have been in either all male schools, male dominated engineering degrees and workplaces. For most of my life I used to be really anxious about having zero relationship experience at my growing age and some days I still do. 

Nevertheless, I just can’t be bothered. Dating websites are an absolute chore for me (almost no replies, the few people who do don’t want to carry a conversation and I can’t seem to get good pictures) and the thought of going to activities that I am not interested in (have you tried salsa dancing?) abhors me. I do find girls beautiful and like looking at them but i don’t think I have ever fantasized about them sexually.  I feel like my only motivation to get a relationship is just to say I got one.

On the other hand, I watch and jerk off to porn almost daily but even lately that has started to bore me. I have also been diagnosed with dysthymia and have taken SSRIs for the first time this year but stopped taking them. Even months after I did so, my libido seems to have dropped drastically. These three factors (too much porn, depression, SSRIs) muddle the waters for me as to whether I am ace or if its externally induced.

Thoughts?",asexuality
Questions,"Recently I’ve started self analyzing my sexuality and I’m not sure how to describe what I feel but am wondering if it’s asexual or something else.

In short I can’t say I’m asexual on the basis that I do have sexual motivation but what brings me to question is that it’s entirely voyeurism/exhibitionism. I have 0 desire to have actual sex. Not sure if this is just a fetish or what. Again I’m only just now analyzing at 20.",asexuality
I need help with understanding my allosexual boyfriend.,"Throwaway because my boyfriend knows my reddit. 

Sorry for any grammar mistakes or formatting errors, currently crying while I type this, lol.

I'll be straight up and say that I don't know if this is just ME or something other asexuals have problems with, but I felt like this was a good place to try and get some advice.

Let me start off with a bit of background. I consider myself on the asexual spectrum, I most closely fit with demisexuality. I have had split second moments where I've been sexually attracted to people I don't know but it's so rare that I don't count it, and when I do, I feel disgusting for it. No idea why. I'm very sexually attracted to my boyfriend though and I love him very much. We don't have any problems, this is primarily a problem with me. 

Now, when I watch porn, I'm not sexually attracted to the people in it. I'm imagining that those people are my bf and I having sex, that my bf is doing those things to me. But, when my boyfriend watches porn, he's like everyone else and is sexually attracted to the people in the video and (I'm assuming) imagines he's doing those things to them. I mostly ignored this because what he does/watches was never brought up, until now. 

We are very open with one another and he mentioned how he was trying to look up one porn star's name but he forgot who she was, he gave up, then went back to the porn website and then she was everywhere (thanks google analytics lol). When I heard that I started crying. I know it's a fantasy. I know he's choosing me at the end of the day. I don't know why it bothers me to think that he's thinking of doing those things with someone else but it really does. It makes me think I'm not good enough... it makes me want to throw up. Maybe because I only ever think of him, maybe in my head it's not fair. It must be insecurity. I hate sometimes that I'm demisexual because I wish I could understand this. I KNOW if I wasn't, I'd understand. Please don't get me wrong however, I'm not saying other asexuals can't understand this or anything.

I'm not mad at him, it's not his fault. I'm pretty sure this is normal for people. I told him that I appreciate that he's open with me but that I don't want to know about this stuff. He started saying it was his fault and that he should have known. I told him there's no way he could have known, I didn't tell him beforehand, and I should have. I didn't say anything about my feelings about it because anything I'd say would just make him feel guilty and I don't want to do that to him. There's no way I'm going to ask him to stop watching porn or anything like that, I don't feel like that's healthy, especially since we are in a LDR. Perhaps this bothers me a little more than it should because I could always send him nudes or go on webcam with him and mutually masturbate. We used to do that a lot but it's lessened recently. I just... really wish I didn't hear this.

Is this just my insecurities? I feel like a lot of it is, but I also feel that being demi has something to do with the roadblock in understanding, since I've never felt sexual attraction like he does. How do I get over this and understand him? Does anyone else feel like this?

I'm sorry if this wasn't the right place to vent or ask this. Thank you for reading.

&amp;#x200B;",asexuality
True facts,,asexuality
Ok so I need some help with my situation,"Ok so this is going to be a bit of a long one.

I’m not too far away from graduating, and in all this time i have not told my parents than i am asexual.

I have tried to drop hints, i’ve tried to be very obvious in the fact that i don’t want to have sex or have kids, and i’ve even gone as far as to say “i’m not gay” when they ask but purposefully not mention being strait to see if they would ask and make it ever so slightly easier to come out about it.

And I am very aware that i’m under no real obligation to come out, however, i do feel the need to do it to avoid suddenly dumping years worth of secrecy to my parent.

So the reason i feel the need to come out is because I and someone i’ve known and grown close to for years now, plan on living together eventually. And knowing my parents expectations of having kids and them not knowing i’m ace is going to lead to quite a huge amount of misunderstanding, which i really want to avoid.

And to avoid this misunderstanding i need to come out, preferably in 3-4 months max.

So my question is... how?
In the years of conversation i have not even felt any conversations be even close to diverting it to a ‘coming out’ and i feel that just bluntly stating it out of the blue would just cause a huge amount of confusion.

Thanks in advance, and thanks for reading this far.",asexuality
'Dating' app/website needed?,"After reading the comments on the video posted earlier on this subreddit (https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=dnuOEbLio5A) I realised that I'd never heard of a website or app specifically for asexuals.

I did a bit of googling and found a site called Asexualitics, which says it has 38980 members, which seems actually quite a lot.

My question is: have you heard of it/do you think there should be another app/website for asexuals to meet like-minded people? ",asexuality
How did you find your queer platonic partner?,"i wonder where do you find people who want to form a queer platonic relationship. like, really. i only know two asexual persons in real life and i had a huge squish on one of them but they kind of hinted they weren't interested at all. i can't imagine myself hanging with a good friend and randomly asking ""oh hey do you want to be my life partner but, you know, not in a romantic let alone sexual way???"". just no. 
also i'm not into... internet in general so finding qpr online is not an option for me. ",asexuality
I Don't Want Sex: Asexual &amp; Looking For Love | Sex Map Of Britain,,asexuality
On personal privacy (x-post /r/AsexualMen),,asexuality
Advice on trying sex?,"I’m somewhere on the ace spectrum but I’ve decided I’d really like to give it a shot (virgin here). I figure that it’s an experience I’d like to try, like playing slots at the local casino or going sailing. Has anyone made a sex plan and successfully executed it? The troublesome part seems to be finding a good partner. I’m not dating anyone now so I’ll have to recruit.

“Try Sex” is always at the bottom of my to-do list (realizing THAT is what helped me figure out the ace thing) so I’ve gotta get motivated or I’ll just forget.
",asexuality
I just had to buy this when I saw it,,asexuality
Finally joined the club!,,asexuality
Nintendo's New 2DS XL is looking ace as hell... I love accidental representation!,,asexuality
"Is it just me, or am I actually wrong about all of this?","Firstly, I'm sorry if this post seems inappropriate.

I made a post asking about the asexual spectrum, and still considered myself asexual hitherto, but recently (or for a while, I don't know) I've been curious about some aspects of sex (like touching), and do have a bit of a desire to experiment those aspects, if under certain circumstances. Some say this is being open-minded, I thought this was the time to say that I'm grey-asexual because of it, even though people still don't attract me sexually. I don't desire to have sex with people, and I still don't desire actual sex. I simply desire to explore and experiment around some aspects of sex.

The problem though is that I feel entirely wrong (and discouraged) about being in the asexual spectrum overall, whether truly asexual or grey or whatever. I would come out as grey-asexual or talk about my experiences regarding my asexuality, and it seems a lot of sexual people would find little things I say and use them as an excuse to claim that it's something sexuals do, too, and therefore say I'm actually sexual (or they at least imply so). A lot of black and white answers.

Nothing against sexuals. I'm not flaming you or anything. I'm just frustrated at experiencing the clouded horizon of semantic hairsplitting when it comes to spectrums of asexuality.",asexuality
Where can I get an ace ring?,"I want to wear one, it will really make me proud to call myself asexual. If anyone could send me a link or give me any suggestions I would be very grateful.",asexuality
Ace characters in fiction?,"Sorry this question probably gets asked a lot, but I was just curious about any ace characters.  Besides Todd Chavez and Sherlock Holmes, that is.

I was thinking Silent Bob seems he might be.  I was also thinking the Dragonborn, but that seems like “cheating” because the Dragonborn can be anything really.

",asexuality
Saorsie Ronan sounds just like us,"Sorry if it was here already and if the title a bit cheesy.
I’ve just watched a couple of her interviews and I think she:
1) very respectable and polite
2) may be asexual or demisexual

But I like to think about 2). 
My answers would be the same :D

https://youtu.be/QVoleJYgdM8",asexuality
Am I alone here?,"Does anyone else feel repulsed by romantic relationships? I mean like the whole idea of being in a relationship with someone makes me cringe. And not only that, but I just think relationships are nothing but drama, and almost always end in heartbreak. I just don’t see the point anymore. 

For the record, I have been through 3 abusive relationships. I was always ace, but my experiences have made me identify as aro and sex repulsed. I understand that my attitude could solely be due to my negative experience. But I’m wondering if others feel the same?

I never seem to find groups that portray being single as a positive thing, or groups where people express that they’re happy being single. I just feel kind of alone because everyone I know is either in a relationship or wants to be in one, and doesn’t understand why I hate relationships. When my friends tell me about their relationship problems I get kind of annoyed. I’m supportive of them, but at the same time I wonder why they don’t just break up with the person and just enjoy being single and having freedom.

Does anyone understand this or feel the same way?",asexuality
Do you think I'm ace?,"Hi, I've been thinking recently that I might be asexual. I came out as bi a few years ago but I'm not sure if that was right. I'm a 21 year old female and I've never felt any sort of sexual attraction for anything. I've read a lot of M-rated fan fiction, watched porn, made out with someone, tried sending nudes and dirty talk to people, but I felt absolutely nothing doing any of it. The making out was especially strange - I nearly started laughing during it because it just felt so weird having a slimy tongue in my mouth. I've also tried to masturbate and felt nothing at all - it also just felt completely pointless and touching that part of my body felt no different than touching my elbow or something. 

Although I've had plenty of crushes, my fantasies about them have involved cuddling and a bit of kissing sometimes but nothing more. The only thing is that I haven't ever actually been in a relationship (Partially because I used to have a really bad lisp up until I was 18 and no one my age talked to me so I was attracted to teachers seeing as they were the only ones who actually were nice to me. That may have contributed to my lack of libido.) and the one time I think I might have experienced arousal is when I was cuddling with a guy I liked and the cuddling was getting pretty intimate. But other than that one occurrence, I've never experienced any kind of arousal at all. I don't even know if that was arousal or if I'm just making it up. I don't want to be asexual though and I want kids and a relationship. Any ideas?",asexuality
Demisexual question,"Hey guys! I’ve just started exploring my sexual identity and I have some questions that I don’t understand
So I recently kinda discovered the term demisexual and I thought it was amazing! I didn’t really know about asexuality but once I found out what it was I felt really happy 😁
Anyway the problem is Im not entirely sure if I’m demisexual or if I’m something else within the asexual community. I’m in a relationship and when we first met I didn’t feel and physical attraction at all, but as we got to know each other I really came to love them and after two years I wanted to try to have sex. I love them but I can’t be satisfied when we do have sex. There are times where I want to have sex and will initiate it and then there will be weeks where I don’t have anything to do with sex and stuff but either way I just can’t get off. My partner is really understanding and never makes me do anything if I don’t want to but I just don’t understand why sometimes I want it and sometimes I don’t. 
Is it normal for a demisexual to want to have sex every now and again? Also is it normal that I can’t be satisfied from having sex? 
I’m sorry if I said anything weird I really want to learn about who I am and I’m just a little confused. Thank you for taking the time to read this ❤️",asexuality
Question from a cable TV political pundit....,"GLAAD media training basically teaches us to be inclusive and sensitive and use LGBTQ officially but there are recent variables of LGBTQIA, LGBTQIAA, LGBTQ+, and LGBTQIAA+ if you really want to play it safe. I’ve been saying LGBT+ on air but I don’t want to minimize your existence and as an openly gay man myself I want my ace friends included, so I’m asking you in general, for those of us in the media which variant do you prefer - is LGBT+ inclusive enough or should I be saying LGBTQIA+? 

Thanks for weighing-in. 🖤💟",asexuality
Don’t know what I am,"Hi, 18 and from the UK. 

So I’ll just get straight to the point, I came out as bisexual about 3 years ago, but I’m unsure if that was the right thing to do. 

In every relationship I’ve been in I just find it as a fling or as a rebound, I mean, is it me in every relationship? Is it me who can’t make it work?

Every relationship I just find it to be not romantic at all, I’ll kiss and do stuff, that’s about it. I don’t find myself sexually attracted to them, I mean I’m in a relationship right now but come to the realisation that I’m the rebound when she’s trying to make someone jealous. 

I got diagnosed with severe depression a few weeks ago and that’s not made life any better, I’ve heard of something called “a-romantic”? I don’t know if that’s a thing or what. 

It’s just in every relationship I find it to be pointless, I’m not interested in sex at all, I mean I lost my virginity to a guy when we weren’t even in a relationship, just as a fling, it’s just that, I don’t know, I’m really confused, went to the internet and now I’m here, can anyone help me at all please? 

I’m so confused :(",asexuality
My ace flag came in! Thought y'all might appreciate this,,asexuality
Is anybody here polyamorous?,I asked the reverse of this on r/polyamory recently and thought it made sense to ask here to. I'm wondering if anyone here is in a relationship with more than one person so you can cuddle and spend time with them but their sexual needs are met ,asexuality
I don't know if I'm asexual (30 Y.O Male),"I've recently begun to suspect that I might be asexual. I've had relationships before (though not very many), and I definitely feel like I've been in love, but when it comes to sex I've always felt like I'm missing something. It makes me anxious and confused. Even guilty. Like I should be enjoying it, but instead I just feel like I'm going through the motions. The thing is, I don't have a complete lack of libido. I use porn regularly, so I must have some form of sexual desire.

My parents and friends don't say anything to me about it, but I can tell they think it's weird that I've been single for so long. I've had trouble maintaining connections with people for as long as I can remember, but I don't know if that's a result of asexuality, or just because there's something else wrong with me. I feel entirely alone and disconnected, despite the fact I have friends, a loving family and a job that I adore.",asexuality
What's the proper term to call a person who is not asexual?,"Would that be a 'sexual' person? Grammatically, this sounds the most correct (rather than using the double negative of 'nonasexual') but I'm wondering if it's in any way problematic or offensive, or if there's a different term I should use instead of having to use many words to contrast the two.

Thanks!",asexuality
Seeing an Asexual,"I’ve only been talking to this guy for a while now and he’s told me he’s asexual. To me and knowing you know what it means to be gay/be in love/be romantically attracted to someone it’s something so new and something that just pushed me back and to me an asexual sounds like they just have no sexual/romantic feelings towards anyone but this guy wants to get to know me and is interested in me but to me I just don’t feel that at all like idk why,  to me sounds like he’s so disinterested and just doesn’t give shits about love, I really don’t mean to offend anyone hear and god I hope not Im just seeking help on really what a good understanding is to be an asexual is because I really want to grow and learn about this person.",asexuality
I (27F) had a chat with my heterosexual partner (30M),"And it went really bloody well! Honestly I'm on here to share good vibes because I feel relieved and elated.
Over the last year or so I've been trying to find my compromise to an ace/sexual coupling and what I'm comfortable with and what I just can't do. Well, it got the point where I'm pretty much sex repulsed and I was so worried about discussing it with him because of his feelings on it but the other night it came up naturally and I told him how I really felt and, you know what, he handled it really well and then took a few days to mull it over. I went round and we spoke some more and he'd rather be with me than without me and said if I dont want to do sex or anything of the sort then we shan't. And that's that! 

I'm such a lucky lady! 

Just wanted to share a positive moment for other sexual/ace couples in case you're worried about opening up- it can work out :) I didn't believe it either! Yay! ",asexuality
Is “coming out” important?,"So I’ve been really torn lately. I’ve identified as asexual for a while now, but as of lately I’ve been getting more involved in the community and have been more proud. But I still haven’t “come out”, I’ve never posted on any public social medias and haven’t told my friends or parents, save for one very close friend. I’ve always seen sexuality as a very personal thing and I think that it’s none of anyone’s business but mine and my partner, which is why I’ve never told my parents. I’m heteromantic and plan on being in a relationship with a woman, so the way I see it they don’t have anything to worry about. If anyone asks about my sexuality I’ll tell them the truth, I’m just not gonna go shouting off of rooftops. I was wondering if any of you lovely asexuals think that it’s important to come out, my family are very conservative but still kind of accepting, but I don’t really think that they’ll understand and I don’t want them getting involved in my romantic life.",asexuality
Am I the only one feeling this?,"So I recently discovered I was ace. I feel pretty fine with it and I'm comfortable, but I just have this feeling of ""why me?"" It kind of feels like I shouldn't be asexual but I just am.",asexuality
Accepting Mod Applications!,"With the growth of the subreddit (over 25,000 now!), we've noticed that we could use another mod to help us on the other side of the world.

If you're not in North or South America and you'd like to be a mod, leave a comment explaining why! Please include any mod skills/experience, how much you frequent the sub, and why you want to be a mod on the sub.",asexuality
Boyfriend is ace... but initated sex with me when we first started dating?,"I've been dating my boyfriend for 3 months and I like him more and more every moment I spend with him. But something has been baffling me over the last 2 months.

When he first asked me out we went on some pretty great dates. On the 3rd date we were really starting to get romantic feelings for each other, we made out, I touched him a lot, and we banged (lol). After that 3rd date we were crushing damn hard on each other. We would send some sexy texts to each other and he would initate sex, and say he wanted to have sex with me. (This is important.) 

After that first month though, it seemed like his sex ""drive"" just dropped off the face of the earth. We still kissed and snuggled, but he completely stop initating. I got really self concious and thought something was wrong with me. Eventually I asked him about it and he admitted to me that he believes he's ace. 

It was a huge weight off my shoulders to hear this! Although I'm personally not ace, I totally understand his feelings and where he's coming from. (I actually used to identify as ace before I did some soul searching and realized I was heavily repressing my sexuality. But that's a whole other story. )

So my question is... if he's ace, then why did he enthusiastically initate sex with me in the beginning? Was he maybe pretending? Or maybe just trying to please me? His last relationship was over a year ago, so maybe it was more of a physical release for him?

I'm wondering about the experience of other aces on this. When you start dating someone you really like, but they're sexual, do you usually ""put out"" a lot in the beginning? 

Of course I could just ask him directly about it... but it just kinda feels awkward to ask now. And I'm curious about all of your experiences! 
",asexuality
TW- abuse. Wondering whether I'm ace.,"I was abused when I was younger, which has led me to having some fucked up views about sex and relationships. Most of that has changed now. 

I'm not sure whether I'm asexual, or it's just a result of the abuse. I'm also not sure whether I can say I am, because I have sex and I masturbate. 

I have felt sexual attraction in the past, but I can only remember a handful (or less) times. I don't get sexual pleasure from sex. I orgasm from masturbation but it's more filling the physical/biological needs than something I really want to do. I've gone months without sex or masturbating at times without really noticing I had. 

Am I asexual? Is it possible it's temporary?",asexuality
Can Odo be an aro/ace icon?,,asexuality
Boyfriend told me he thinks he is asexual. I want to be supportive of him but I have questions,"So yesterday my boyfriend told me he might be asexual. We are both in our mid twenties, live together and have been together for two years. I know he has had a really low sex drive for pretty much our entire relationship but we'd been working around it. I want to besupportive of him but now Im having some hang ups. 1. How do I be supportive of him while he comes to terms with this? 2. Someone else I talked to about this suggested this was possibly a ""soft breakup"" in an attempt to push me away so Im the one that initiates the breakup. Realistically how worried should I be about this?  3. Moving forward, how does sex work between us? Like, do we open up the relationship so I can still get laid? Do we have a set sex schedule that works for him? Do I just accept that Im not going to get laid anymore? How do we work this out so we are both happy? 4. What are some good resources for me to learn more about asexuality so I can support him better? Is there any good must watch videos on youtube? 5. Asexuals that have been on the opposite end of this situation, how did it work out for you? What did you guys do so you both were happy?",asexuality
So I don't fully understand my sexuality,"I'm attracted to everyone, but not sexually. I know I'm romantic, I like cuddles and what have you. I get emotionally or intelligently attracted to ppl, regardless of sexual orientation or gender. I don't like sex, but I don't really hate it either. I currently identify as Demi, but I kinda feel like I'm more ace. I've been with the same hetero partner for two years and they loves me, sex or no sex. But not understanding what all of means bothers me. It's like I'm ace but also low-key pan. Is that a thing? I could use some input and this is a pretty good community. Can anyone help?",asexuality
Have you guys ever wanted to feel what it's like to have sex like a 'normal' person?,"Have you guys ever wanted to feel what it's like to have sex like a 'normal' person? I'm an asexual and I could never really understand the hype around it. The lenghts other people were willing to go just to have that experience. I thought that it must be pretty awesome, yet not something I could ever feel. ",asexuality
Used and confused - not sure if I'm ace but not enjoying sex,"So I have never done this ever because I never really thought that I would get any replies but I think maybe it would help so here goes...

Oh BTW NSFW in some ways I think? And also I say some things that may sound offensive but I do not mean any offense whatsoever I am just very confused and scared. Nothing is abnormal or weird or wrong, it just feels wrong for ME because I always thought I would enjoy it. I know, I'm disgusting wanting to enjoy sex after being molested for three years but maybe that's why I want to? Maybe I'm sick? (sorry I know this is really self pitying but I'm just at rock bottom again so bear with? ♥️)

So I don't want to get into it too much because its late and I'm tired and I hate sounding like a sob story.. When I was little I always thought I would be idk really good in bed or really sexual? Strange I know but I always just kinda had that feeling and it got worse after my uncle started molesting me. That was when I was 8.. It wasn't a traumatic experience just a very misunderstood one. It didn't bother me till I was older (back then I thought I was just really grown up because he would tell me its what the big kids did.. he's sick i know) after that I didn't understand sexuality and I would often do things with people.. Not understanding it. The thing is, I just did it to please them. I was taught that I should pleasure them and they should be having fun so even as a child who didn't want to do it I would because I thought that is what I was meant to do. It wasn't until later I realised what my uncle had done and how much it affected me. I started to hate myself and disrespect and let everyone who wanted to touch me. I didn't care about myself and fooled around (although never to the point of sex not because I was afraid but because I was crippling insecure-a good thing in this case) but the thing is I never enjoyed it. I would tell myself I am nothing more than a piece of meat for their entertainment but I thought I was meant to enjoy it.. I enjoy the idea of it but I don't enjoy it. Nothing I do. Not kissing or sex or any foreplay... Nothing feels good. And I hate it. I was always considered the hot one or the sexual one. I was the school slut and bullied constantly for it. It was awful but it was my image and horrible that everyone would look at me and be like yes I want that only to later realise I was terrible. I was worse than the worst because at least the worst enjoy it. I hate that I don't enjoy it, how am I supposed to be the hot sexy one if I don't even enjoy it?!? Everyone raves on about how great an orgasm is but I have never had one because everything just hurts and makes me cry and roll over and go to sleep. I know I sound superficial.. I don't want to be the sexy one or anything but i don't want to be the useless one either.. After all if I can't even have sex why would anyone want me? Why was I born with such a thirsty mind if my body won't listen.. And why if I am so thirsty do I crave affection and love over sex anyway? Its all so confusing.. I'm not so superficial in real life but I just really want to enjoy it the way other people do. I don't want it to be something to dread and fear and hate.. Isn't it meant to be beautiful??? By the way I know what I have isn't asexuality but I didn't know where else to post it.... Sorry if this is stupid or makes no sense but yeah.

Tl;dr- I was taken advantage of sexually my whole life to the point where I can no longer feel any pleasure in sex but everyone expects me to be good at sex, but all it does is hurt - - help???",asexuality
What would you call me? (Very slight TMI),"What would you call someone who can and does get aroused fairly frequently, but limits the way to get that out of their system to porn? I can definitely look at a person, think ""yeah that is indeed attractive to me in a sexual way"", and if I'm in the right mood my body responds as a body does. But I have as far as I can remember never felt that I need or want to have sex with anyone I've met in person. I'm a virgin at 24 years old and changing that is not something I'm interested in putting any mental or physical energy into. I am unhappy with a lot of things in my life, but that is not one of them. It'll be weeks or months between the times I even think about it. In a hypothetical situation where someone else approaches me for sex, I'd probably give it a spin, but moreso in the same way I'd say yes to trying bungee jumping than any deeper desire to get laid.",asexuality
Help with my ace roommate? (NSFW please don't read if you're not okay with that),"I feel kind of dumb asking this, but I'm a gay trans guy in a sexual relationship and I don't know how to make sure my roommate isn't uncomfortable with me.

I come home with lots of hickeys and bites up and down my neck and she knows what I'm up to because I see her notice them when we talk, and I don't want to make her feel weird or anything. We've been really good friends for about a decade now (I'm 18, she's 19) and recently drifted apart a bit but we're still good friends.

Can any of you guys help me out? Are you okay with seeing that kind of thing? Should I cover up the marks when she's around to make sure she doesn't feel weird? It's a kinky relationship too so that might make things worse.

I really don't know what her limits are on this kind of thing but I don't know how to ask. Both of us were raised in very emotionally closed-off households so I'm worried that if I ask her she'll say it's fine when it's not.

Sorry if any of this comes across as ignorant, but I really need advice for making sure she feels comfortable with my sex life. Thanks for any help.

\-Nate",asexuality
"I don't know if I have a romantic orientation and, honestly, I don't care.","I've been identifying as asexual aromantic for a while. I'm 100% percent sure of the former and that's one of the defining characteristics of my identity, but I gave up on trying to label the latter.

*Theoretically*, if I imagine myself with a partner, they could be of any gender, and I can think of at least one crush which felt genuine, so maybe I am capable of falling in love. But actually being on a relationship fills me with dread and anxiety; first, for having zero desire to be physically intimate with someone; second, there is so much stuff in my life that I first need to sort out, and the last thing I want is to share that with someone else.

Am I heteroromantic? Biromantic? Aromantic? Whatever. Right now I'm just apathetic towards relationships, and there's nothing wrong with that. Asexual is more than enough to describe me, and I'll think about the rest when I want to.",asexuality
What does it mean to think that the risks of sex are not worth the rewards?,"To me, engaging in sexual intercourse is not worth it because of the potential to contract an STD or have an unwanted child. 10 seconds of pleasure and a cuddle buddy does not seem worth (a potential lifetime of) torment. I still feel like I want to have sex and I'm sexually attracted to people but I'd have to be absolutely certain that I could trust the other person before I'd be ready to have sex with them. To this degree I feel like I may be demisexual. Can anybody offer any insight?",asexuality
Confused and used (it's my username for a reason haha),Sorry ignore this I don't know how to delete - VERY new haha,asexuality
I’m a bit confused,"So I’m questioning if I’m asexual or not and I’m torn. Lots of different sources say different things. Like I have romantic attraction towards a person(my girlfriend)  but I’ve never had the desire to have any sexual relations with anyone, including her. The topic of sex doesn’t freak me out but I’d rather not talk about it. And I don’t mind romantic contact like hand holding or putting my arm around my girlfriend or other stuff like that, unless it gets sexual, which it never has. What do you guys think, I need a second opinion ",asexuality
When did you guys know you were ace?,"I think I might be ace. I’ve thought about it once or twice one or two years ago but decided against it, and just stuck with straight and sexual. Then, I duped myself into thinking I liked a guy (in all senses of the term) and realized once he asked me out that that was absolutely not for me and that I didn’t like him and never did in the first place, decided i was aromantic, and did the same with a girl two years later. 

Now, I had a whole moment and “epiphany”, I guess you could say. I think I might be aro/ace but I feel stupid for thinking that I guess. I think I might have been too scared to term myself that cause I thought at the time that that means there’s no chance of me being in any kind of relationship and no one would love me for it, even though I realized that’s not that case and I don’t even WANT a relationship anyways. 

Anyways, I was just wondering maybe I’m too young? Maybe I’m over exaggerating? I was just wondering when you guys knew and I’m so sorry for the whole rant and if anything I said sounded stupid or offensive. ",asexuality
Can anyone else relate?,"Hi all! ❤️

So basically my sexuality is super weird (probably like everybody’s to be honest). I identify as just asexual, but I really don’t feel romantic attraction at all either. But it’s weird because the act of cuddling, or holding hands, maybe even kissing (just like the “cutesy stuff” as I heard someone say once) sounds very desirable to me. That said, When I think about ACTUALLY doing that with someone, I just can’t see anyone that way. My relationships in my life (outside of family) consist of “friends” and “not friends,” I can never imagine doing something physical like that with someone. But I want to, and I want to have an SO, but I don’t feel attraction towards anybody!!! It’s so frustrating to me. So my question is can anyone relate?

Also, completely unrelated, but I was looking for ace rings online, but my middle finger is literally bigger than a 16, which is the biggest size they sell. Anybody got any good sites for fat trans lady fingers? lol

Also I’m a trans female, 19 years old.",asexuality
Big mood,,asexuality
Masturbation in the asexual community?,"I'm new to this and I'm beginning to feel like I may be asexual, but my body still has physical response to attractive people but I have no drive to actually have sex with someone and masturbate to control these urges. Is there anyone else that feels like this? Does me masturbating make me not asexual?",asexuality
"Ace isn't something to be ""fixed""","In perusing other subs, I see a lot of the shade thrown at people who have lately come to terms with some gradient of being asexual.  I see a lot of people giving them advice like ""if you work really hard, you can fix your sexuality.""  It reminds me of how people perceived gay folks early on.  Like, just try harder to be straight, or desire sex, and you'll suddenly be normal like us!  Grrrr...",asexuality
Can trauma cause me to be Ace?,"I deeply apologize if i'm not asking the right question on the right subreddit. 

But this is a question that has been plaguing me for years. I come from a household with a lot of physical and mental abuse. I got beaten up from my father and humiliated by my mother. As I got older I noticed I didn't really feel any attraction towards anyone, male or female, but I often had to fake interest so I didn't feel more of an outcast. I heard about being Asexual and it felt a lot like me, nothing sexual really interested and I had zero sexual attraction. I didn't want people to be near me or get close to me in any way and I really did not have any sexual interest towards any individual or that ""hunger"". I assumed I was just an extreme ace that didn't want to be in a relationship/touched/zero contact/no attraction and I moved on.

But fast forward, to a few years ago, I fell for a girl. I liked her very much so. I liked her for the person she was, the bonus is that she was indeed physically attractive but I ignored that when I first met her. However she was the first person that I masturbated while thinking of someone. I kinda jerked off here and there but there was nobody in mind really, but she literally changed that and it scared me. Was I just....no longer ace? Was I ever ace? Was it trauma cause by my parentals that made me steer away from people for fear that they would hurt me just as they had when I was younger?

I spoke to a friend last night, and they're ace as well and we talked about my case for a bit, and we both came to the conclusion that I'm probably just really traumatized and I have difficulty letting people get close to me emotionally and physically and I'm ace out of a pure defense mechanism. However, that's what got me thinking, that girl that I jerked off to made me realize that I may not be ace and I'm not sure how to feel about that. The uncertainty makes me anxious.

I'm not sure what to think of myself anymore. I thought I came to the conclusion that I was ace because I had no sexual drive nor attraction to anyone. I considered that I could be demi/grey but I'm not sure. I don't know anymore haha. But some stuff still stand, I am not attracted to ""good looking people"", I certainly don't want to get in people's pants, I do get aroused and shit and if often puts me in a bad mood because it just, like I can't resolve it (sure I can jerk off but it's only a short term fix nowadays). And it's happening a little more frequent now and it's irritating me but I don't want someone to deal with the matter either. I have extreme trust issues and intimacy=trust. Anyways I feel like I'm rambling now. 

I'll just try not to think about it too much or I'll get a panic attack -_-",asexuality
My ace socks arrived today just in time for Pride! 💜,,asexuality
Is there a name for this pattern?,"I bet it applies to other ‘persuasions’ too, not just ace, but here goes:

The pain and isolation of being what I am among people who don’t even think I exist as what I am, or that its even possible. 

It hurts so much, that a joylessness, pain, forces me to seek pleasure to numb that. And the most socially acceptable pleasures are companionship and sex. 

To take it out of ace contexts, people in the early gay-movements said they were so marginalised that the choice was either suicide, extreme isolation, or they could find joy in female company and contact.. 

Ill try one more time to put it another way:

So much joyless isolation can push people to act as if they were untrue to their orientation, but really it’s extreme deprivation.

People criticise me for doing sexual-seeming actions, criticise my lesbian friends who’ve had boyfriends, and others too.. they all seem to go into status-quo forms of companionship to avoid suicide. 

Anyway, I really want to know if there’s a term for this or philosophy for this?

“Anhedonia-induced inauthenticity”?

Really confused and wondering.  Thanks for reading. ",asexuality
Not Sure About My Asexuality,"I identify as asexual, though if we want to get technical, I’m either a gray-ace or an aegosexual. Would aegosexul still technically be asexual?

I do have fetishes and kinks, but for they are just fantasy for me. I do look at some porn, albeit soft-core and is primarily just fictional characters and anime rather than real people. Even then, images depicting sexual acts still gross me out, and I just want to see a naked body.

I have never had sex and have no interest in seeking it out. If offered, I’d probably turn it down although I’m not sure.

Do I sound asexual?

",asexuality
Sexuality change with transition? [Ace questioning],"\[Don't know if this NSFW or not but tagged it anyway\] So I've been medically transitioning for about 10 months now (18MtX) and I've noticed a large change in the way I am towards sexual desire, before I transitioned I was relatively high in libido and my sex drive was whack but after a month on hormones that all switched, I understand that sex drive and libido lower and eventually regulate their self as your body gets used to the new hormones introduced. Anyways ever since then I've genuinely felt completely uninterested and overall uncomfortable with all forms of sexual attraction/situations. It's not a disinterest or disgust I just am no longer feeling sexual? ^(Totally down for gay cuddles tho) just nothing past that. I don't know if any of this qualifies for asexuality or not but let me know what you think.",asexuality
Anyone else feel this way too?,Trying to explain that you aren't sexual is like trying to explain how to speak English to someone who doesn't speak English in English. ,asexuality
Feeling Hopeless,"I’ve been feeling really down about my asexuality. I have never been interested in sex, have no libido, and experience absolutely no sensations “down there.” Yet, emotionally I desperately wish I could enjoy sex for the intimacy and closeness. I at least wish desperately that I could pretend to like it so that I could have a normal relationship, but it’s extremely painful and unpleasant. Not to mention kind of gross. My previous relationship of 3 years failed, and at first I was excited about this freedom. But after a couple of months I’m starting to realize that I just can’t go out and sleep with people like want, and add to that extreme social anxiety, I can’t even make friends. I feel extremely defective. I feel unfixable. I feel totally worthless. I don’t know why I’m so obsessed with the fact that I can’t have sex. I wish I could just accept that it is not a part of my life and that is just the way I am, but I just hate myself so bad. I’m pretty much trapped in this cycle of self pity and I have no clue how to get out. Have any of you guys ever felt this way, and if so, how did you cope? ",asexuality
Why is it Ace instead of Ase?,,asexuality
"Based on these factors, I’m not sure if I’m ace or not...","**Some talk of sex and sexual assault included**

This is a little bit of a long one, TL;DR at bottom. 

I have several friends who call themselves “pure blooded aces”. They have no interest in dating, have never had sex, don’t masturbate. Every ace in my life doesn’t want to date or orgasm, which is a big factor as to why I’m confused. 

I, on the other hand, am interested in dating, though I had no interest until my late teens. I love cuddling, kissing, and deep bonding with all genders. I look at people and find them pleasing to the eye. I do enjoy orgasming though, and at times I like to bring myself to climax. 

But I’m not interested in sex. Negative interest is in porn. I look at people and think “Huh, I’d love to kiss them/get to know them.” But not have sex with them.

I have had sex many times, with several partners, because it made my previous SOs happy and because I do sometimes enjoy someone else bringing me to climax. Some people that I have shared this with have said, “Wow, that’s messed up.” Personally, I don’t see it that way. I don’t really enjoy cooking either, but I do so to see how happy it makes my romantic partners. 

Another factor is, I was sexually assaulted in the past. When I went to a support group for survivors and mentioned my apparent lack of sexual attraction, a few of the survivors told me that because of that, I’d never really know my sexuality. That I’d never know if these thoughts were just scars, or if it was who I am.

**TL;DR: I am a survivor of sexual assault that doesn’t experience sexual attraction. I don’t know if I’m ace because I am not sexually attracted to people, but I do find people pleasing to look at, want to date, and like the occasional orgasm. Any insight would be appreciated.** ",asexuality
Y'all I deadass just think about memes during sex,"Well, I like meme the situation. I kinda have a low sex drive and I guess sex feels good sometimes but usually I'm just bored since I'm not really lusting after anything. I just make memes in my head about the situation.

For an example I read a meme that Horsehead (he worked w/ Lil Peep if y'all don't really know who he is) tweeted ""saying 'what's the move’ before changing sex positions” and then I had sex with a dude the same day, and I just couldn't stop thinking ""what's the move"" every time he switched things up.

This is also why I'm very quiet during sex because I don't want to ruin someone's mood by saying something stupid.

Anyone else do this?",asexuality
"Not sure if these are welcome here, but I think demi isn't accurate for me?","Alright so again, not sure if these are allowed, if not I'm deeply sorry. I just really need to get things out in the open.      

So most of my life I never really looked into my sexuality. I liked whoever I liked, and  that was that. I never felt the need to explore beyond that. When people asked, I said pansexual because again, I didn't have anyone I didn't like kind of thing. That later evolved into demisexual, and more so now I'm thinking ace/grey might be where I stand at this point. I've gone through the wiki/lexion and so many things make sense.    

I figured before that because I watched porn and did enjoy my time alone, that I couldn't be ace(no offense to anyone, this was just me being completely uneducated on things!). However seeing that autochorisexual is a thing, I very much believe that explains that part for me. I have no desire to do these things with other people, but I do enjoy it alone.     

I've attempted sex three times in my life, none of them gone well. I was disinterested. I didn't feel like it. I was a little bit off about the idea to begin with, but my partners wanted and I was never able to actually get to intercourse. I don't mind pleasuring them, but I just don't really... want anything back kind of thing I guess.    

I definitely am (pan?)romantic(sorry still fuzzy on a lot of things), and I want to be intimate in ways like holding hands/cuddling/sleeping together etc... I just don't want to go past that I guess...     

I'm posting this because I'm pretty sure at this point that I am somewhere more closer to ace than I am demi at this point. The biggest thing with demi that feels off is even if I did find someone, grow attracted and fall in love... I don't believe I would feel any better about going beyond the intimacy I listed above.   

What do people here think? Does this sound at all relatable? Is it okay to find comfort with asexuality with what I've listed? Does this sound fake or anything big standing out that screams I'm really demi after all?      

I know you can't say y/n if my feelings are right or not, I guess in that case it's similar to gender questioning. I've gone through that whole deal already so now I'm just trying to figure this part of my life out I guess...   

Thanks~   ",asexuality
Do you feel the need to confess?,"I keep thinking about if I want to tell a friend that I'm ace, but every time I get close to bringing it up, I just think that there's really no point, it's my life not theirs, it doesn't affect them... 
Wondering if any of you felt that?",asexuality
I am not sure,"I am not sure if I am asexual as I have never had sex. Now you could say: ""But you know that you are not a necrophile even if you never tried it""
But for sex the intimacy is something which I like. The problem for me is mostly establishing any intimacy even though I like it and that effectively makes me an asexual. I just don't know if this state is permanent or will get ""better"" when I see a therapist. (Even hugs with whatever person feel awkward.)",asexuality
Vent; I lost my significant other and now I don’t want another,"My significant other was lost in a tragic accident a few months ago. He was sexual, but I had known him for years before we evolved into anything and he knew I was asexual. The fact that he still pursued something with me will always mean a lot to me. 

But now I’m not sure I want to pursue another relationship. Going through the insecurity about not going to be enough in the long term was difficult enough and I hate the idea of coming out to anyone who might have an interest in me. I hate the idea of facing the stigma of “I’m broken” and such. I don’t know, it’s too much effort now. 

While I wouldn’t mind a life partner, I really hope I don’t have to decide between rejecting someone who can potentially make me happy or remaining alone because they rejected me instead. ",asexuality
New and want to vent,"Really emphasisng that I'm new to this but it feels good to have a community to talk to in either case. I'm male and always tick the heterosexual box on forums. 

I don't feel the need to have sex with anyone. At all. The limit of my sexual feelings is ""they're good looking."" I don't feel the need to share these feelings. In fact, the idea of sex is pretty repulsive to me. Whenever I've been attached to another person it's always been because I want someone to be close to. A companion, if you will, even if it does sound quite cheesy. 

That leads me into my second point. I don't feel sexual urges, but desire emotional intimacy. Strange, huh? I can't really wrap my head around it all. 

So, I'm just look for help about the terminology of this and to decide if I'm really asexual, or just slow at liking others. It's something I've struggled with since time imemorium, so any help is greatly appreiacted. 

Thank you. 

",asexuality
The older man helping me at fleet feet complimented my anklet and it made my day.,"I have a little pride anklet (rainbow bc biromantic and I like rainbows) and the man who helped me find new running shoes at my local fleet feet was lacing up some shoes and told me he liked it! Totally stupid to get so excited over nothing but I felt like he sorta knew I wasn’t straight and was trying to be accepting and I thought it was really sweet :) just goes to show that a tiny little compliment can mean a lot to someone. I just wanted to share. 

That’s all! I hope you’re all having a wonderful day!",asexuality
One of my coworkers makes a lot of sex jokes and it’s driving me crazy.,"She’s a healthy relationships educator for the LGBTQ community, so it’s a big part of her job; it just makes me so uncomfortable. I don’t want to say anything and seem sex negative, but it makes me want to avoid her. I really like being her friend, so this urge to avoid her bothers me.  I usually just sit through the discomfort. Most of all, I leave our interactions feeling sad for my own identity. She reminds me of all the things I’d like to enjoy, but don’t. 

No advice needed. Just wanted to vent. ",asexuality
Does anyone relate to this? To discover something is about sex and you didn't even know.,"Title might be unclear. Like, imagine you have been hearing a certain music for some time, you actually like it a lot, for its beat/rhythm and so. You have at some point Googled its lyrics, which you remember. One day, for the hell of it, you Google for the *meaning* of the lyrics, and the analyzes is pretty much saying ""this verse means he character is looking for sex, this other verse means he is already having sex, this here is how much he likes sex, this is about sex, this here is sex, sex, sex"" and you look like this: https://i.redd.it/1bfrhvh6vsl11.png because you legitimately did not add A and B that the song, which is NOT using the word ""sex"" or something like that AT ALL, is about sex anyway.

I often just find this funny, but sometimes I get strangely sad, like, come on, how often do I say something that people think is meant to be sexual? Because it probably ISN'T meant to be.",asexuality
People trying to set me up to date people,"Ok so I'm aro ace and my friend keeps trying to force me to go to homecoming with this one guy I barely even know just because we're both single and her bf knows him. I told her I'm aro but she said ""oh it can just be as friends"" but I don't even feel comfortable with that. People I'm mutually friends with have told me ""oh you'll probably change your mind"" or ""wow wtf is wrong with you"" and it honestly just makes me so emotionally exhausted. The friend that's trying to set me up is bi so I expected her, of all people, to accept me since she dealt with coming out too but she just doesn't. I already made her promise me not to set me up like that because she did it another time before this but she didn't care about that either. They don't realize how serious I am about it and how it affects me if they just decide to go against what I want to do. Has anyone else had this happen to them because from what I've experienced it's horrible.",asexuality
"I've always had really back luck when it comes to relationships, but realizing I'm Ace feels like the nail in the coffin in regards to ever finding and keeping a partner.","For reference, I'm male and I just turned 27 years old. That may not sound very old to many of you, but it definitely feels old to me for a couple of reasons: My last (and only) relationship happened back when I was 17/18, and I've always been fairly immature for my age (in terms of interests, life goals, life milestones, etc.), and both are really starting to catch up to me as I enter my late 20's. My last relationship was nearly a decade ago now, and it was fantastic and I didn't give it up willingly, at least not at the time. Since then, I've encountered nothing but abject failure when it comes to trying to date. I can't even get to the point where my asexuality is even a factor, so you can imagine why I'm so discouraged to even try at this point; even if I somehow manage do finally be in a relationship, being ace is almost guaranteed to ruin it so why even bother in the first place? Hell, even somehow finding an ace partner is no guarantee of success if they turn out to be aromantic when you're not. 

Honestly, I don't know why I even bothered writing this. I'm going to dismiss any reassurance that any of you offer because ""I did it so there's hope for you too!"" just makes me feel even more shitty. Did I want other people who feel the same way to chime in? I'm not sure. I know that they say that misery loves company but I've never really bought into that. In any case, I spent a fair amount of time writing this and I still feel like sharing it for reasons that I can't really articulate. ",asexuality
Is it me or has sex nowadays become just bragging rights?,"There are people who have legitimate reasons to have sex, one being  to start a family. But nowadays I feel like men and women want to have sex just for the hell of it without knowing the repercussions (i.e. getting pregnant).

Am I the only one who feels this?",asexuality
I am not sure if I am ace..,"Hey everyone, I have been thinking about this a ton lately. I have been browsing this sub a lot and trying to see if I identify. I do identify with some things, but seeing as asexuality is a spectrum, I definitely do not identify with EVERYTHING. 

I am really not sure how to organize this, so it will just be me rambling for a couple paragraphs. I hope that doesn't make it annoying to read through, I just really feel like I need to talk about this and I don't know if I can talk about it with my friends. I always feel uncomfortable discussing sexual things with them anyways.

So I have had sex. Many times. When I was younger I wanted to stay a virgin until I was married for religious reasons but that changed when I got my first girlfriend and she just went for it. I didn't know how to react, so I just went along with it, but it DID turn me on. I was able to orgasm like.. the first few times.. but never ever again. She was sad that I never did when we had sex because she felt like I wasn't attracted to her. I definitely was though, like I thought she was beautiful and like I like boobs I guess but like I just didn't ever enjoy sex. It was just.. boring to me I guess? Like halfway through it was just too much of a hassle to finish and I tried concentrating really REALLY hard to finish but I never could. I could finish during like.. oral sex but I had to concentrate pretty hard most of the time.

I had sex a second time in a one night stand when I was super drunk, but it was just.. kind of dull and not great I guess. I wasn't really into it that much but the thing is that I was turned on and that confuses me. Why do I get turned on like that if I don't enjoy it that much? Anyways now I am with my second girlfriend and we had sex for the first time and I was just hoping that I had bad experiences with the others but no dice. It just wasn't great or amazing as anyone has ever made it seem. 

The weird thing with me is that I CAN finish when I masturbate and watch porn.. but I never watch porn with actual sex. Just.. weird fetish shit i guess BAHAHA not that weird maybe but that's just my opinion. I never like videos that show actual sex though. The ads that show it always gross me out. 

I love kissing. And touching and feeling. I like being close with my partner and even lying naked with her.. boobs are fucking neat to me and I can even get turned on by all of the kissing and touching but. I just don't really enjoy full on sex. I have never really felt compelled to try sex with a man either, I don't think I would want to? But I could see myself kissing or holding another man like that, and I have dreams where I have and I was turned on by them. 

I don't know if like.. maybe I just ruined my sex drive with porn or something, creating unrealistic standards for sex or whatever? Or maybe I just have low hormones or something.. but those are just fears I have because I really don't want to disrespect anyone in the ace community by saying I'm ace and then it turns out that I just have some weird medical issue.

 Anyways I am sorry if this was way too much info, I have been struggling with this a lot lately and I just don't know what to think anymore. I am lost and am just trying to find some direction. If you guys made it this far, thank you so damn much for reading through this. I really appreciate you taking the time out of your day to listen to the ramblings of a stranger.",asexuality
So I’ve had a vivid dream about having sex for the first time,"Never been interested with sex, never had any sexual attraction with other people. And yet for the first time, at 25, I’ve had this weird dream of having an intercourse with a male friend I’m not even romantically, emotionally invested in. 

Just drives home the point that asexual people don’t have a low sex drive or there is physiologically wrong with us. We can still have wet dreams, we masturbate, some of us even enjoy the act, but at the end of the day, we don’t let this urge consume us. After that dream, I didn’t see that friend in a new light or something. I just went back to sleep. ",asexuality
Glad I’m not overly sexual.,"I suppose this isn’t exactly asexual... but I still think it fits with the idea of this sub. I’m in o way saying I’m not literally asexual, I definitely understand where it comes from. I can see my friends addicted to sex and going out of their way to get it turning it into more of a hassle than anything else, and it makes me appreciate being able to be patient in finding love",asexuality
"My partner is asexual, I am not. What am I supposed to do?","Hey everyone,

I need your help and I hope that you may share your experiences with your (ex-)partner and how you overcame the issue of having different sexual needs/drives.

Not too long ago I figured out that my girlfriend is asexual. She never told me directly that she is asexual, but the signs are somewhat clear and it wasn't too hard for me to make a conclusion. Actually, she said something like, she knows that she has no sexual drive, but she doesn't care in what category she belongs. I'm pretty sure she is very aware of what asexualtiy is, simply because she is very well informed about this topic.

We had a few arguments because of our incompatible sexual drives, but after a couple of compromises we came to a conclusion. We are having sex frequently (or something else that fullfils my sexual desire) and everything is fine for her, no complaints. It was fine for me as well, I mean, I had sex with the one I LOVE so much after all. There is just something that bothered me early on and it becomes a bigger bother the more I think about it. Why am I always the one engaging sex? Am I THAT unattractive? Is my penis small? Is she solely suffering from pain when we have sex? You probably get the point, **my self-esteem is going downhill**. I know that she won't engage sex, because she doesn't enjoy it in general. I know that I am attractive, there are still quite a few women who show interest in a relationship with me (sorry, but I can't phrase this without sounding cocky). My penis is not small, it's average and I am perfectly fine with its size. It still feels like I am an ugly and horrible lover who can't please the woman he loves. I am aware that she simply doesn't get enjoyment out of sex, but that thought always vanishes and I start feeling horrible, even depressed at times.

How am I supposed to deal with that one sided relationship in that regard? I don't want her to have sex with me, because she thinks it's her ""duty"". When we are having sex it feels weird when I am going all out, becoming exhausted (I am somewhat athletic) and she doesn't even bat an eye aside from feeling pain... It really kills my self-esteem. If we add a tad of ""never engaging sex"" my self-esteem completely vanishes. How can that not kill anyones self-esteem. I can't be an egoistical douche who thinks of her as a sex ""slave"" who uses her to get an orgasm. I want to please a woman! I sound like a complete dick, but the feeling that I can't please the one I love makes me wanna cheat on her and I hate me for even thinking about it. I am so sorry...

I could imagine it is a big deal for an asexual with no sexual drive to ever have sex. My girlfriend does have sex with me, and I appreciate that a LOT, but it simply doesn't feel right. I don't want to make my girlfriend feel uncomfortable because she is asexual. It is something perfectly normal (in my opinion) and I have no clue how to approach a discussion about our different sexual drives. I am certain she is very uncomfortable when it comes to sex, when I want to talk about it she is simply concluding without discussing ""everything is fine as it is"". I never get the chance to tell her how I feel about this, but I also don't want to force things and make her feel more uncomfortable.

I need advice and I need answers...

* How does sex feel for an asexual woman who never masturbated before (and never had an orgasm)? Is it simply painful when the man inserts his dick and then it feels funny and uncomfortable? I don't get it.
* Is it normal that certain sexual practices disgust an asexual woman? (even french kisses)
* How can my GF dream about having sex with me, but not wanting real sex? (she said she had multiple sex dreams with me before we became a couple)
* Is it normal for an asexual to have trouble to express love? My GF simply can't express her love very well. She cannot compliment me. She had trouble (like a mental block or something) telling me what is most attractive about me. She complimented me twice in our 6 month long relationship.
* Is it possible that kissing and hugging are more intimate than sex for asexual people?
* How do I approach the topic about having sex? I want to know how she REALLY feels about things, but she never really goes into detail and keeps things as vague as possible.

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

There is something that is really weird, though. We've had a time where she couldn't stop kissing me when we went to bed. She was the same AFTER intercourse as well. She also kisses me a lot when we have sex, but the time AFTER sex and the random evenings were really extraordinary. She couldn't let go of my lips, the difference between sex and kissing became really slim, simply because all that was left was one of us cumming. The best part of it was, she was the one WANTING to kiss me that much. Lately we don't have evenings like that anymore. I guess that might be because of the stress from our studies, but even if we find some time we usually end up talking in the bed and hugging each other really closely, not even remotely as much intimacy as before.

**tl;dr**:I am an asshole who wants a sustainable relationship with the one I love. I don't want to break up with my partner because of sex, but sex is simply a big part of a relationship. I'm simply a human who is a slave of his own sexual drive which I cannot control... I want to learn more about my partners asexuality and approach a conversation with her about it, but I need some information before I jump into a conversation with false assumtions and a truckload of frustration. I want to be with my partner forever so badly... I know how much she loves me (she literally cries when I have to leave for a few days) and I love her at least as much as well...

 

***Thanks for reading my wall of text! I hope it is somewhat readable, english is not my first language and I have trouble formatting texts on reddit.***

&amp;#x200B;",asexuality
Terribly lonely,I’m (pretty sure I’m a) asexual heteromantic and have no idea how to meet people. The only intimate relationships I’ve had have failed because my looks are my best quality so nobody wants to be in a relationship with me unless it’s for sex. How do I meet other people like me?,asexuality
Feel like I’m broken or something,"Realized I’m ace several months ago, and I’m uncomfortable with that. I can’t help feeling like I’m broken and missing out. And my significant other of almost 4 years is cool with it (he’s not ace) but I still feel like I’m letting him down. I just hate sex 99% of the time. It’s gross, uninteresting, and nerve-racking because of my disdain for it. 

I’m not looking for any cheer-me-ups, I just want to know if anyone else feels this way. ",asexuality
Aw yees.,,asexuality
coming out &amp; life story &amp; stuff,"i've been in a really sex-repulsed mood for about a year now, &amp; i'm pretty sure i'm ace

background story is that when i was in 6th grade i started questioning my sexuality &amp; in 7th i had discovered the term asexual, which at the time instantly clicked &amp; everything made sense. then in 8th &amp; 9th i started dating a lot of people. i thought that sex was supposed to be an important part of a relationship, so now that i think back on it i was forcing myself to be incredibly hypersexual in hopes of someone staying with me. in reality i've always been pretty neutral about sex. i don't mind if other people want it, but it's not something that i seek out mysef

also i'm worried that if i come out to my friends as ace they won't take me seriously &amp;/or make fun of me because of my actions in the past",asexuality
I do not know if it is ethical to identify myself as asexual now or how to open myself about it in future relationships. My confused history about it.,"Hello, first time posting a thread on reddit, sorry about my english and text format, I'm going back to studying the language.

 Im a 20yo male, extremely confused about my (a)sexuality. One of the reasons for this is the fact that im a cis white guy and to contextualize this to my country(Brazil) where lgbtphobia, racism and misogyny act together in a sort of veiled class normalcy(more recently not that veiled), I cant see myself as queer when considering my privileges.

First of all I think that I have problems with forcing myself to do things against my intern will, but with certain consentment with the extern pressure. From time to time I get myself in middle of a party thinking about ""what if I kiss someone right now, might I like that today?"" and its always lead to a awkward situation of regret of neither enjoying, and subsequently, nor explaining the situation for the other person, then there is a serious commitment with self-analysis perduring for days. Moreover, living in a college context of so much sexual permissivity and discover, I see myself confused and insatisfied nor enjoying any type of physical contact and sexual approximation nor quitting thoughts of sexual attraction as well as creating expectations about embarking on this.

Months ago, one girl asked me out, I wasnt aware about the flirting of this hang out request. I am socially awkward(social anxiety), and sometimes is hard to perceive subtle informations like this. But at least I really appreciated the friendly invitation but once we hit the place, one nice beach house, I saw how naive a person could be. There were some friends of this person, I didnt know them... and they were all formed couples.

The next five days we was there, I experienced a downhill mixed feelings, progressive lack of interest,   estrangement for not liking this type of company, thoughts about how uncomfortable it would by not going out with that person and so on. I was a bit depressed at the time by not doing well in college and losing interest in activities I previously enjoyed. I didnt said anything about it to anyone there, and thats a great fault.  The fact is that every time that person asked me to kiss me or just kissed me I felt something like: a puppy died somewhere in the world. However, a few times I liked it in a sensual way even being that discomfortable. Also I was drunk and high all these five days, what helped me to abstract the whole situation. We slept in the same bed, sharing the room with other four persons, during the nights, when every couple was hooking up in a strange way without much privacy, this person always asked me for sex. I attempted to the argument that i was so tired but after some insist work i was thinking ""what if I try, could like it?"".

I always think about it as depressing thoughts that puts me on a situation im missing something or that im wrong and unhealthy by disliking sexual contact. These five days I was wrong and desrespected myself abusing alcohol and weed and forcing me, one night leading me to have a disturbed allucination before sleeping. A recipe for disaster. And everything caused by the lack of communication motivated by the shame of realize that I dont have to act as everyone.

Neverthless, I just can say that I dislike sex or have no sexual attraction. I experienced it even in a limit situation. I dont know if i have sex issues, low level libido or I am in grey area(it would be awesome and hopefully!), I just think thats not ethical declaring myself ace right now. What I am?

Actually, there's a girl I am really interested, but dont know how to deal with this confusion. I would be so glad for being corresponded, but I feel so much fear of that kind of relationship I never had. Im afraid to disappoint or hurt my future significant other.

Finally, discovering r/asexuality is so important to me because I finally find interesting narratives that I can identify myself somewhat. Here I see open discussion spaces contributing to visibility of such a important group sadly disconsidered by others. The desconstructing idea of attraction is so damn precious, im a Social Science student(even now reproducing that much sense of normativity im my experience) and I think the decomposition of romantic, sexual and aesthetic attraction is extremely complex and humanizing.

My post is inspired in a case I read earlier today ""**Don't know if I'm ace, but the concept of sex is just weird to me. So I want to share my story.""** by u/DecentlyRead. And you guys, have any experienced similar? 

I would be glad reading about how people clarifie themselves about being asexual. Thx xoxo and sorry about this bootleg bible.

&amp;#x200B;",asexuality
I am so confused :(,"Pardon me, I'm new to this community and just wanted to get a few things off my chest. I've suspected for quite awhile that I might be asexual, but I'm more confused than anything.

Firstly, I am a male with **zero** interest in having sex with anyone. The thought of having sex with someone grosses me out. However, I do have a stupendously high libido when I'm alone and I masturbate quite a lot. I'm attracted to girls mostly, and sometimes guys, I just have no interest in having sex. I do watch a lot of different kinds of porn, but mostly just videos of girls masturbating or dancing and rarely people having sex. I feel kinda icky talking about this stuff. Doesn't come up much during dinner conversation. To further obfuscate things, I don't really enjoy being male and wish I'd been born female. I usually just identify as female on websites to feel more comfortable, but figured I'd be more straight-forward here on Reddit. Probably a separate issue entirely, but there it is lol

Thank you for listening &lt;3

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",asexuality
I’m a little confused about myself.,"Just to preface, I want to say that I'm not really in distress about this or even sad about this. I'm just a little confused as to where I am in my journey of finding myself and what I should do next. Anyway, I'm not really sure what to do now. In the past I've doubted myself quite a bit and asexuality was something that was quite often on my mind, but it just isn't that much anymore. The only instances where I consistently think about it is whenever I see something that makes me doubt myself, which is quite frequent (in fact maybe me doubting myself so often and seeing things and people that make me question again and again is a sign I'm not ace, but I digress). But besides that, it's not on my mind that much and it doesn't feel as pressing as it once did. I feel like I'm not caring quite as much anymore, even though I want to care. I want to be comfortable and completely confident in my own sexuality, though right now it just doesn't feel like I need to resolve that. It's like I'm feeling two different things, or want to feel one thing but actually feel another. Like sometimes I feel like I should be sad or worried about all this but I'm not, so I think I may be bringing those feelings on myself. I'm just confused now as to where I am or what to do. As for context I'll have links to previous posts on AVEN [here](https://www.asexuality.org/en/topic/176034-i-dont-know-what-i-need-or-what-to-do/) and [here](https://www.asexuality.org/en/topic/174766-my-journey-so-far/). 

I am sorry if this is a bit incoherent. I just feel I should get this out. ",asexuality
Asexual Dating Site?,"Does anyone know any legit sites for asexual dating that won't ask me for money and aren't OK Cupid. I really want to find a asexual only dating site, but I am having a hard time finding one that is active, legit and free. I might be asking for too much. Any ideas?",asexuality
Feeling like I’ll have to compromise to be in a relationship,"I’m a panromantic ace here, and I’ve only recently come to terms with the fact that I’m asexual. Never experienced sexual attraction, and I’ve never really been interested in porn because ew sex. :P

I’ve never really seriously dated anyone (probably due to the whole closeted ace thing) and now I’m struggling with feeling like I’ll have to compromise to be loveable. Like “no one would want to date me if I wouldn’t have sex with them, so I might as well suck it up.” 

I feel like this is probably a common feeling in romantic aces, but it’s a constant thought in my head. I’m not exactly sex repulsed, so sometime I feel like I’ll just end up sucking it up for my future partner. I literally can’t imagine being in a relationship where I wouldn’t have to compromise this aspect of me.

I guess this is just a rant, but I’d love to hear from my fellow romantic aces out there. Have you guys struggled with this? Have you been in relationships with allo people? How’d that work out for you guys? ",asexuality
sex,"Hi, I don't want to be a dick or anything, but me and my friend was having a discussion about sex among the asexual community. She thinks that ace people don't like sex, masturbating or anything that involves sex. I thought that ace people need to know the person to be attracted to a person or feel a sexual attraction.
I also thought that ace people do like to have sex and they do have sex, masturbate and so on.
I just want to understand :) it would really help me if anyone gave me an explanation about this.",asexuality
Asexuality and pornography,"So I think I’m asexual, for various reasons which aren’t relevant currently, but I still look at the porn I used to. Does being asexual preclude enjoying porn or is just sex? 

Also, this isn’t a source of anxiety for me, purely a matter of intellectual curiosity. I just want to use the right term and am not sure if I fit the bill. ",asexuality
Advice on Asexuality,"So I’ve never done anything sexual or kissed and I’ve been having doubts about my sexuality for a while but I’m not sure if I’m really asexual or just “young” as some of my friends say (17F).
I’m pretty sure I’ve never experienced sexual attraction and honestly still don’t understand it.
The concept of having sex also feels foreign to me, I have fantasies and do get turned on but actually doing anything sexual with someone is something that I’ve never had the courage to do or seem to want to do for that matter.
Now the question is will that change in the future and do I just need to find the right person? Or am I really asexual and trying to experience something just to see wouldn’t help anything anyway?

Any stories of your own experiences would be greatly appreciated :)",asexuality
I feel like I can't talk about my sexual identity to friends who know my boyfriend,"I've known I'm asexual for about 4 years, even though I'm still figuring out the details; but I know I'm somewhere on the spectrum. Few people are aware because I rarely ever felt the need to tell anyone, but I don't mind saying it, generally. The only problem is with friends who are also friends of my (allo) boyfriend.

Asexuality is hard enough to explain to clueless allos, let alone asexuality-but-you-still-have-sex-sometimes-depending-on-connection-and-many-other-things. And I feel like I can't tell them that I'm just plain asexual because they'd react like most unaware allos do - feel sorry for the guy. I know it's stupid and backwards, but I'd feel like I'b be depriving my boyfriend of his ""virility"" in the eyes of his friends - like come on, my poor friend can't even have sex with his own girlfriend?

I'm annoyed because there's been times where telling friends about my asexuality would have made situations easier, like for understanding my feelings, reactions, etc. Also, generally I like to think I'm now proud of who I am and have nothing to hide... Yet I feel like I find myself trying to be someone else, someone more ""normal"", just with those friends.

Thanks for reading, I really needed to vent a bit :/",asexuality
Ace_irl,,asexuality
Repping the flag in the labwork today!,,asexuality
"Finally, I can enjoy my nice, cold asexuality!",,asexuality
So we're still doing this shit I guess,,asexuality
Am I (19F) Aromantic?,"Hello Reddit! I'm in a period of heavy self-reflection, and have been wondering for a while if I would typically be deemed 'aromantic'. 

A few years ago (during highschool) , I came to the realization that I was pansexual, and accepted it quickly. Romantic attraction wasn't a large part of my life, as I had my first boyfriend at 16, and it didn't turn out to be much. In the end, we both realized we weren't fit for each other, and I didn't actually have feelings for him. (I've only had two actual boyfriends so far in my life, so not much in the experience department.)

College and peers put on a bit of pressure to involve yourself in dating and hookup culture, so of course I downloaded Tinder and swiped away. Over the year of dates that I've been on, I haven't found myself romantically attracted to any of the individuals that quickly became romantically attracted to me. It's become a bit of a problem, as I tend to form friendships instead of romantic relationships? By the time I figure out I'm not attracted to someone, that person has already become emotionally involved, and I always have the hardest time expressing my feelings to them (and letting them down).

I've never been one to have crushes, and don't form feelings easily. I much prefer close friendships/casual friendships that could involve cuddles and or sexual relations. Sex comes easy to me, romance doesn't. Romance has always been ""cringy"" to me overall, but there are some individual aspects that I like. I just can't imagine myself having a long term partner or being married. I'm good at dating, but I'm terrible at communicating my feelings and reciprocating feelings for the multiple people that have come and go. 

Now I wonder, is this me just not having found the right person to be romantic with, or is this me being an aromantic person? My friends have even started to wonder if I can form romantic attraction at all. 

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",asexuality
The guy I like is aromantic and heterosexual; I’m asexual but experience romantic attraction,"Hahaha what a fun life! I guess I’m just here to voice my slight disappointment, not at him, just in general",asexuality
BBC News video about asexual relationships,,asexuality
"Finally, a sub for me!","Long have us amoebas been denied our asexuality, our cell splitting, our one organism reproduction. Thank you people for finally letting us tell the human race what it’s like to be truly asexual. ",asexuality
I have another ignorant question,"Hi all,
Please excuse me if this is completely ignorant. I am *wondering* if I’m asexual/aromantic. 

Meanwhile, this question came up in my mind that I haven’t thought of before. Is asexual/aro technically in the LGBTQ community or is that like saying red is closer to white than it is to black, if you know what I mean? 
My analogy/question: 
if there is a signal and it could be going left or right, left being hetero- and right being queer, no signal just means no signal, right? It’s completely different from both heterosexuality and LGBTQ, because it’s something else entirely (or more accurately, the lack of something) ? 

Is that right? Is my question making sense? ",asexuality
Ned Flanders is definitely asexual.,,asexuality
Is demiromantic a thing?,"If not, I'm coining it now. I've always known I'm not aromantic, but I also generally don't miss being cuddled/holding hands/kissing/etc. I've always wanted to be married and have a partner in life but none of the canoodling stuff really appeals to me (but it doesn't repulse me either). That whole ""I just want someone to hold me"" is really not a thing I've felt.

But now there's this girl. I don't really want  to kiss her, but like, I don't not want to either. I definitely don't think I'd mind cuddling with her. Is this what demiromance feels like?",asexuality
Question if I am asexual or if it is something else,"Hey, I recently have come to terms with the fact that I am genderfluid. I am biologically female, but usually feel either non-binary or male. I have been thinking back and every time I am in a sexual situation I have turned away from it or fled because I felt so incredibly uncomfortable even if I had a crush or genuinely liked the person. Also I really don't like people touching me if I think that they are attracted to me at all. And I am very very very rarely turned on by the idea of having sex with someone (maybe once in my whole life? if that counts?). 

Now since I realized I'm genderfluid I'm partially sure I feel so uncomfortable because I can't imagine and feel disgusted by having sex as a female. But I don't feel quite as repulsed by sex if I was biologically male. But at the same time I can't really tell because I am not biologically male nor have ever been in such a situation. Would this be asexuality or something else?


Note: I generally find males attractive or those that identify as male.",asexuality
"Book with Asexual Supporting Character Free Again, Now Has Sequel!","https://www.amazon.com/dp/B078YC3WKN
https://www.amazon.com/dp/B07HL491Q5
The book and it's sequel linked here, both are free ^
The character Xia Yu is an aromantic, asexual trans girl, as stated early on in the first book.  In the second book she also has a small arc where she has to amicably turn down somebody with a crush on her, and later explains her orientation to another character as something she considers a benefit, because 'it gives her more love to share with her friends, because she gets to save the love she'd spend on a wife or husband for them, that's what she's meant for'.  She's kind of a disaster, but also a ray of sunshine whose orientation is an important part of her life, but far from her whole personality.",asexuality
"Don't know if I'm ace, but the concept of sex is just weird to me. So I want to share my story.","I know orgasm feels good. I masturbate. I find girls attractive. But I'm a virgin and I don't think that's gonna change. I've had a few opportunities to have sex but I didn't.

The first time I was cuddling with a girl and she wanted to take it to the next level (now that I think of it, why should be sex considered the ""next"" level by default?). I didn't even have a boner, I felt just right when we were cuddling. So we didn't have sex and that made things weird between the two of us.

The second time was with another girl, and she was more of a ""show, don't tell"" type, so when we were cuddling, she just grabbed my hand and put it inside her. Since I was attracted to her and wanted her to feel good, I obliged. I even had a boner. But. Putting my penis inside her? Well, that'd be pretty weird. It just didn't make sense to me. So I got her off (probably, what do I know?) and went to sleep without reaching orgasm, but not feeling sexually unsatisfied. Nor satisfied, it just wasn't an issue for me.

And still isn't. I masturbate (about once a week I guess) and watch porn. But even as I watch I'm like ""She's jumping up and down on his dick, what the hell? It seems almost grotesque."" or ""Look at him moving back and forth, doesn't that look really stupid?"" or ""These are some pretty weird sounds."" As if it was something weird and undignified, not the seemingly best thing ever that it is for many people. Even kissing seems and feels really weird to me. What's supposed to be pleasant about licking each other tongues?! Feels rather disgusting to me. I don't have problems with tongueless kisses though.

Many of my friends have comments like ""Man, I haven't had sex for two weeks. I can't take it anymore."" That's completely foreign to me. Or ""Damn, that girl's really attractive. I'd like to sleep with her."" Well, with the first part I could agree. Not so much with the second.

Sometimes I feel horny and the idea of sex, even though still really weird, sounds kind of appealing to me. But so far never so much that I'd actively pursue it.",asexuality
LBGT Friendly Server Welcomes You!,"LBGT Friendly Server Welcomes You!

(Mods, please feel free to remove if this does not conform to rules).

We offer:

· 1,000 members to chat with.

· LBGT Friendly Staff

· Peer support with guided peers

· A great group voice chat

Join today – we welcome you!

&amp;#x200B;

[https://discord.gg/6GNYsxD](https://discord.gg/6GNYsxD)",asexuality
"I know I’m asexual, but....","I’ve identified as (aro) ace for 4 years now, but I’ve only been out to my family for 4 months. Almost every time I talk about adopting and fostering kids, they never fail to mention that I’m going to eventually find a husband and have children with him. Even though I’ve told them it makes me upset, they keep saying it. It’s really starting to make me feel like I’m just faking being ace and that maybe I’m something else, which I know I’m not. Any tips for helping calm this anxiety?",asexuality
"Coworker would not stop hitting on me, so I came out to him. It went exactly as you would expect.",,asexuality
Not Sure If I'm Ace?,"I still feel sexual arousal and I still masturbate, but I've never wanted to have sex with anyone, but I do still find people attractive. What does this mean? Can anyone help?",asexuality
ended 10 week relationship with my gf,"*after she came out as asexual

This happened just over the weekend and I had to take work off today to try to think. We met where I work in the middle of July. I liked everything about her. We were on the same page politically, she's cute, and so on. We lived a little over an hour apart but seemed to be making it work, and we both wanted to move closer to each other at some point. She'd usually come to my apartment, staying for an evening, a full day and the next morning and we'd have sex between 2 and 4 times each visit. (I feel gross writing that, because just focusing on the sexual aspect of the relationship makes it seem like it's all I cared about. We made art together, we'd watch bad movies or just nap. It was great and I thought I loved her.)

Then she started becoming more irritated when I touched her, about two weeks ago. We didn't meet up at our normal time this Wednesday and she wanted to go home early when we hung out the next day. I tried to pretend I didn't care but I could tell something was up. I didn't message her on Friday beca
use I thought I had irritated her somehow and I wanted to give her space. Saturday I get off work and just collapse in bed. I sleep for a few hours and start crying. She comes out as asexual over text. She's very new to the idea -- less than a week, she said. I'm hurt that she didn't feel like she could share that in person (a simple ""Let's talk about this on Sunday"" would have worked). In the end, I guess I'm not okay with the idea of an asexual relationship. I have a few questions, to try to get some closure:

(1) Am I an asshole for not wanting to be in an allosexual-asexual relationship? There are more than a few articles which say ""yeah, you can make it work!"" And maybe you can, I don't know. But I want to be wanted. I don't want her to just put up with sex, and it was beginning to feel like that toward the end, before she came out. She wrote ""If you truly cared about me as a person you would accept who I am and work through this."" I feel like I'm being emotionally blackmailed for being uninterested in what I view to be an incompatible relationship.

(2) How would such a relationship work? Despite my parents' marriage, I still believe in monogamy. I want to find someone to share my life with, to grow together, and yeah, to split bills (it's 2018 lol). I just don't see it working for my situation. ""Sorry honey, I'm horny. You have to sleep on the couch. Becky's coming over tonight. "" -- I couldn't do that

(3) I've read articles that suggest working out a schedule for sex. Without trying to sound judgemental, isn't that pathetic? Every Wednesday at 10 pm, I get to use you as a fleshlight! Wow! I'm big on the idea of consent; this seems like a pretty sad negotiation
Anyway thanks for the advice :|",asexuality
I need some helpful tips,"Hello fellow humans &amp; aliens. 
I’ve been talking to a very nice guy lately and I really enjoy his company. He has shown me on multiple occasions that he likes me more than just friends and I really like him to. Problem is that (at least in the past and at the moment) I’m absolutely sex repulsed and as soon as kissing gets intense I start to feel really uncomfortable. I’m going to go on my first date with him in a couple of days and it’s the very first date I’m on since finding out about Asexuality a couple of years ago. I really don’t know when to tell him or if I should even tell him before I know wether or not he’s interested in something more like relationship Stuff.  I want to give him the chance to cut the ties if that’s something he’s not ok with before it might get serious and I don’t want him to feel pressured to live in celibacy. Have any of you experienced being in relationships? And how did you or your partner handle the situation?",asexuality
Not sure if I'm ace or not,"I've been on and off wondering if I'm asexual for a while.  I don't feel like I experience arousal or attraction on a regular basis.  I can appreciate if a celebrity or someone is attractive, but I don't feel a urge to have sex with them.  I don't even know them.  I am married and do enjoy sex though.  

I've noticed a lot of people posting on this sub will describe different situations.  Part of what confuses me is that in all these different situations, each poster will be told they are ace.  Perhaps I just need to learn more about the different degrees on the spectrum.

The other factor confusing me is that I've been trying to quit porn.  R/pornfree describes a situation called ""flatlining"" where people quitting porn experience periods where they feel little to no libido as their brains readjust from being aroused by images on a screen to real life.

I guess my question is how would I know if I''m ace or just ""flatlining""?  Or could it be a little of column A and a little of column B?
",asexuality
What do you mean you don’t enjoy sex?! How Asexuality is Misunderstood.,,asexuality
Reasons Dating as an Asexual Can Suck,,asexuality
"So I'm ace, but am I aro?","So I recently finally came to the conclusion that I'm asexual due to childhood trauma. I have zero interest in sex and I don't get aroused by other people at all. But I'm wondering if I'm aromantic as well. I've only ever had intense feelings for one girl back in middle school, and I was heartbroken when she didn't like me back. But I've never felt that way towards anyone else since, even though I've dated great people. And I'm now wondering if I just really liked her because she was my best friend and I really loved spending time with her. When she moved is when I started to feel intense, and I'm wondering if I was just missing her. I haven't felt like that about anyone else, though. I have adorable feelings for certain celebrities and fictional characters, but it doesn't feel romantic, just feelings of adoration. Am I aro?",asexuality
"Welp, my asexual girlfriend has realized that she's aromantic as well.","Needless to say, our relationship is over. We may have met only a week ago, but not only were we both ace, we had a ton of other things in common and had a really good rapport. It was going so well (at least from my side) that I was sure I had finally found something that works after nearly 9 years of being alone. I'm not even angry (she can't help that she's aromantic), but I'm still absolutely crushed right now. 

That's all. I don't know why I even bothered writing this post, but I figured I might as well post it since I went to the bother of writing it. I hope y'alls day is going better than mine.",asexuality
Wonderful time for cake,,asexuality
"My girlfriend and i have come to the conclusion that she is kind of asexual, in a grey area. I would be the opposite side of this spectrum. Need advice!!","My girlfriend and I have been together for two years now. Until very recently I did not understand asexuality or 'gray-asexuality' and didn't know much about it., at the start, we were very active with each other in a physical sense. Anything from sex to kisses and cuddling was generally just fine as often as we wanted. It wasn't constant and there was no PDA but there was consistency. Anyway, she did initiate some of it, but rarely, and seemingly randomly. Now, I never really had any complaints about any of this, but I initiated these things sometimes not out of a sense of personal longing but more out of my impression of what relationships revolve around and focus on. 

So, about 3-4 months ago now this stuff really died down as my gf (btw I'm 22 she's 19) became more busy with school and stuff, but even when we saw each other and were happy hanging out, she didn't want so much physicality. She quickly seemed to have disdain toward sexuality and even kissing or cuddling, and I took this very personally, thinking it reflected some inadequacy of mine. She told me it didn't, that she just didn't want those things much, and that it was fine....but I was sure she was just placating me. Around this time she told me, as well as some of our mutual friends, that she considered herself gray asexual, and that she wasn't sexually attracted to people. Still, I was perhaps blinded in my mindset that, well, if she was enjoying all this stuff before, she still would if not for some other issue. She's never been one for a lot of direct/clear communication, especially regarding the relationship and her sexuality. 

 

Basically, I found myself confused and hurt, trying to figure out what happened and why this changed. So I observed all these other relationships and thought about what people do, and I tried to suggest all sorts of stuff to her in the hopes of, well, spicing things up, so to speak. I pushed that idea for a while, thinking it was necessary, never recognizing what 'gray ace' meant and what kind of pit I threw myself into. Then I started ramping up all these ideas for romance/attention/praise, saying exaggerated things and buying her stuff and trying to be around her as much as possible, because I figured it would boost her self esteem and that, effectively, I was trying to be a stereotypical 'good, attentive boyfriend'. I wasn't getting positive responses but she wasn't really negative with me either, so I kept at it without realizing how I was affecting her, and that I was smothering and obsessive. I only had good intentions, and I thought I could do this stuff to make her happier, but I was wrong.



I really have no idea how to deal with this. I know it's not personal, but being with someone that's not sexually attracted to me is a hard realisation. I really love and respect her and want to make this work. How can I change my actions or mindset to better suit the two of us?
",asexuality
Acebook down?,"Anyone use Acebook? I've tried to login the past couple days, but Safari says ""This Connection is Not Private"" and it won't let me go further. Looks like the certificate has expired. ",asexuality
Is it weird that I don’t care if someone doesn’t believe I’m asexual?,"Frankly, the phrase “you just haven’t found the right person” just doesn’t bother me. When I told my parents that I thought I was ace, they didn’t really believe me. But I didn’t mind, cause all I really wanted to get across is “I’m not interested in sex.” They understood that. They just didn’t understand the concept of it being a constant thing. Other people (usually 30+) didn’t really grasp it either, but so long as they understood that I’m not on the market I was fine. Is that odd? ",asexuality
How do I know I’m not just depressed?,"I was finally getting comfortable with the tile of “asexual” but now I’m starting to think maybe I’m wrong. Asexual certainly describes how I feel now, but I’m also pretty depressed now. This wouldn’t be a problem if it wasn’t for the fact that around 4 years ago, when I was 13, I think I had sexual fantasies. I can’t remember that far back though. Back then I know for certain I fantasized about sex, but I can’t remember if I felt sexual attracted to anyone back then. The idea of sex with someone makes me super uncomfortable now, and a little nauseous sometimes tbh. But I don’t think I always felt this way. I was still definitely aro back then though. I just found this community, and I was starting to feel at home, but now I don’t know. Is it possible I wasn’t ace back then, but I am now? I don’t want to not be ace because I finally am starting to feel comfortable with the title. But what if I’m lying to myself‽  is it possible that I became asexual? How do I know I’m not just depressed and lying to myself?",asexuality
Vicious by VE Schwab,"Now, while I didn't particularly enjoy this novel, it has been confirmed by the author that the protagonist, Victor Vale, is asexual and that this will become canon in the sequel, Vengeful.

I'm not exactly sure how I feel about it, considering Victor is FIRMLY in the supervillain camp, quite literally in fact, and he definitely shows some signs of socio/psychopathy, but he is considered to be the PROtagonist of the story and, in my opinion, he sure as hell beats the antagonist.",asexuality
How do you deal with internalized acephobia,A lot of anti asexual rhetoric has been getting to me and making my self hate worse. Having a casually acephobic friend doesn't help ,asexuality
I'm new to the ace community and I have a few questions,"So I have always been a quiet kid and (until recently) I had attributed my lack of dating and sexual intimacy to that. But over the past couple months I have started looking into the asexual community and then a couple days ago I told a few friends for the first time.

I'm still not entirely sure where I fall on the spectrum but I know I'm there. And while it has been relieving to admit to myself that I am ace, it has also brought up a few worries that I was hoping this community could help me with.

What is dating like? I'm worried that telling people that I am not really into sex will stop people from even trying to get to know me, and as a quiet guy I'm already not meeting as many people as I'd like.

How can I meet other asexuals? I'm in Boston so I feel that being in a city thats over 50% college students would help (?) But I don't know where to start.

Thanks!",asexuality
Stumbled on an asexual personals site,"Hello!

A few days ago, I did a little coming out post and received a lot of sort from all you wonderful people, but one lamentation was the lack of an ace dating app, like what was invented in Bojack.

Well, while following new information sources on Twitter, the algorithm did something right and I discovered a site called www.meetaces.com

I'm not sure how great it is, but since there was a vocal desire for it, I figured I would post the info here and it might help.

Edit: link formatting.",asexuality
X-post on asexuality from r/wholesomememes,,asexuality
My friend is an ace didn’t think I’d meet another one,"I found out one of my friends is also asexual I had a bit of a feeling but kinda thought she was lesbian. It’s great that I know some one who is like me now . But at the same time I kinda feel awkward still we use to be rather close joking and sarcasm and stuff and now we kinda just don’t . I’m more into queer platonic relationship than romance and I kinda want a qpr with her, her being ace brings me some hope but like at the same time I feel having any sort of deep bond with her is probs not going to happen . She said she think she has romantic interest but is unsure and I panicked a bit and just said I’m Demi-romantic even tho I’m not really so yeah . But a friend of mine is ace which is really cool.",asexuality
I hate myself for being Ace. Does this feeling ever stop?,"The title says it all. I just don't know what to do. I didn't choose my sexuality. But just nothing is right. I feel Isolated by my sexuality, I don't even know what LGBT+ spaces would welcome me at this point. It's a struggle I have to keep bottled up. Those who have experienced this.. Does it stop?",asexuality
Question,Is it possible to like porn but still be Ace? I collect a lot of porn but have no interest in sex or masturbation.,asexuality
I came out to my parents yesterday!!,"I'm pretty awkward overall, and my parents are extremely chill and progressive people, so this is a pretty funny awkward story.

I was out to dinner with my parents last night and they told me about a big argument they got into with my aunt and uncle the day before (in case you're interested, my aunt was rude to a waiter and my dad totally called her out on it, so they got mad at my parents for ""embarrassing her""). These relatives also happen to be pretty socially conservative people, and a couple of months ago we got into an argument at a party about some LGBT issues. So last night, I said to my parents, ""Hey, wanna know how I could have made even more beef with this aunt and uncle?"" And I told them I'm ace biromantic, and I told them how tempted I was to come out to those relatives right then and there at that party just to be petty.

My parents were both really cool, I barely even had to explain anything to them about sexual vs romantic attraction, they said they loved me and everything, and it was overall a really great experience and I'm glad I did it!

AND NOW TODAY...

I posted something on Twitter about coming out to my parents... and I *completely* forgot that my grandma uses Twitter. Since she's never liked a single one of my tweets ever in the past. BUT SHE LIKED THIS ONE.

My grandma is also a really cool, accepting person, so I'm not at all worried or anything about her reacting badly. But dear god, this is not how I wanted this to go. I'm such an awkward person and this is an unexpected situation, and I think I'll go live in the woods now forever.",asexuality
Can sex be self harm for asexuals?,"I still have sex pretty regularly because I'm dating and I'm starting to wonder if this is my self harm popping up in some other way. it's manifested in so so many ways in the past, like drinking, cutting, completely giving up on life with the knowledge that I'm killing myself soon only to never go through with it and leaving my life in shattered pieces. Anyway, is it self harm to do something that feels so bad? I feel like I'm doing it because I don't want to die alone but I wonder if I'm doing it because it makes me feel bad.",asexuality
Acephobia Live with Stephen Colbert (See 2:07) The context and implied exclusion from the LGBTQIA+ community makes this particularly offensive.,,asexuality
Is there any way to NOT be ace/aro?,"I talked about this with my therapist earlier this week, that I want to want sex, I want to want a relationship but... I simply don't. It's not as if I have a busy life that can't handle the extra company.

&amp;#x200B;

I'm tired of being lonely, I'm tired of being the only friend without a plus one, tired of ""oh you just haven't met the right person yet"".

&amp;#x200B;

What do you do? Force yourself into things you aren't comfortable with? Nothing makes sense \*sigh\*",asexuality
Courtesy of /r/WatchPeopleDieInside (Swearing),,asexuality
Am I alone in this experience?,"For anyone who’s ever been in a sexual situation, do you find that your body gets turned on ( like getting wet and stuff ) but your brain is just kind of like... ‘meh, whatever’ and no matter how hard you try you just can’t get into it? ",asexuality
How to handle being hit on?,"Sometimes I'll be talking to someone (like, just met, or casual acquaintance), and we're having a nice conversation, and you know how you get the feeling that they're into you...? That makes me feel so uncomfortable. How do you handle that? 

Then I'm thinking uh oh, here it comes... and if they do make a move (even just asking out to coffee, but not as a just-friends thing), what do you do?

I find myself starting to avoid talking to guys because I dread this happening. I just want to be friends with people dangit",asexuality
Party City for (Halloween-y) Ace Swag!,,asexuality
More Todd talk! Clip from Bojack Horseman panel at Paleyfest. (Ace talk starts at around 7:20),,asexuality
Hooray! Ace Pride Todd Fan Art!,,asexuality
Asexualitic?,"Has anyone ever paid for the $19 annual Asexualitic subscription? Was it worth it? I’m not really planning on getting it, but I am curious on if people had any good/bad experiences. ",asexuality
"My friend made an asexual flag wallpaper in the style of the Apple Heritage design on iOS 11, I thought you guys would enjoy it!",,asexuality
Thats right.,,asexuality
When did you know?,"Starting to think I'm asexual (or something else, not great with understanding the terminology). 

Here's me - sorry it's kind of personal info: 

\- I have never had any desire to have sexual intercourse

\- I do not get turned on by looking at anyone, with or without clothes

\- I only had 3 slight crushes in middle &amp; high school, all lasting 1-2 weeks

\- If I find someone attractive, I want to look at them, and maybe kiss them, but mostly just admire them

\- The idea of a dick inside of me makes me shudder, or just dicks in general. Ugh the moment I realized I would probably have to give oral at some point in my life...

\- I masturbate 2-4 times per month, all right before my cycle starts. Otherwise, hardly ever get turned on. 

\- I want physical closeness, like hugging, cuddling, or squishing my face into someone's chest ahah

\- I have never had sex, or kissed anyone (20). Never hooked up with anyone. No one seems to be interested in me either, maybe I'm just oblivious, really ugly, or doing something wrong. 

\- I have never had a close relationship with a guy. Pretty much didn't even talk to guys until college.

I've always felt ashamed because I haven't had sex, and I have no desire (other than social pressure) to change that. Important to note: I didn't get my period for a few years because of low-weight, so during that time I had no libido. Also I have had very low self esteem and periods of mild depression for the past year. 

I can't tell if this is a phase, if I just haven't met the right person, or if this is just how I am. How can I figure this out?

When did you guys know that you were asexual? What made it click?",asexuality
Help figuring out romantic attraction,"Since April, i've known for sure that i am asexual. However, i've been pretty unsure of my romantic attraction. I've started to realize that all of the ""crushes"" I've thought i've had in the past have really just been me wanting to be close with these people and care about them, but not in a romantic way. I've also started to realize that although I find people attractive, I've never really desired to have a romantic relationship with someone. Although i've been in romantic relationships, i've always ended up breaking up with the person shortly after them starting after realizing that i enjoy being close to the person but not kissing and being romantic with them.

Based on this information, does this sound like I could be aromantic?",asexuality
Jean Ralphio from Parks and Rec repping asexual merch,,asexuality
I wish I was Ace,"I’m not entirely sure why, but I wish I was ace. 
I have a strong libido, though it’s never really directed at anything. 

I’m not sure why this is so stuck in my head. 
I used to identify as ace before coming out as trans and now I’m going through a whole “I want to bang everything” phase. I’m not even on testosterone yet.

I just wish I wouldn’t experience sexual attraction toward anyone because I don’t see the point? Like, I know it feels good, but???  And it takes so long to fall in love with someone anyways. 

I don’t want to deal with all the hassle of finding someone I might actually love and then having sex with them, because sex feels like a downgrade to me. If I’m dating someone for real, I wouldn’t want to have sex with them because I value them so much, they mean everything to me and I want to hold them up to a higher standard. I just want to keep them safe and cuddle and shit.

But then when I want to have sex with other people, I feel like it’s lack luster because I don’t have a connection to people I don’t know.  Plus then I’d have to explain why I don’t have a dick. Which is stupid. 

I don’t really know what I’m rambling about. I wish sex was just out of the equation. I wish I didn’t have a libido. I just wish I knew if I knew what love felt like because I’m confused. 
",asexuality
Chevron Amethyst: a very ace rock I needed to share.,,asexuality
Ace-book is down,"Kinda bummed about it 'cause I was having an interesting conversation with someone, and I don't have any other ways to contact them to continue it :(.

Hope this isn't permanent, and that it comes back up sooner than later.",asexuality
Questioning,"26m here. Long story short, escaped a sexually abusive upbringing to move far away, and find my way into grad school. (I don't intend to brag, it is pertinent to my situation.) I didn't really get in touch with masturbation until very recently, and exploring it has been unpleasant and sometimes triggering to me on a regular basis. I've been seeing a counselor about processing my issues, but I have always hit a roadblock when it comes to relationships and sex - for instance, I don't really feel comfortable with the amount of sexuality in movies/tv for starters, especially when they seem to be intrusions into the character's spaces without any contribution to the plot.

 I keep finding myself longing to feel physically safe near someone as opposed to being physically attracted to them from the get go. I may like sex, with the right person. Long shot, but I can't say for sure. Until that point, I dream about cuddling and being embraced more than I do about anything else, and it would be some time before I truly become okay with masturbation. Can I consider myself asexual? I feel at home with the idea of not having to address the question of sexuality immediately, and this community maybe a good place for me to learn from. I am heteroromantic, I was wondering if I could go to my college's LGBTQIA+ meetings, but I was apprehensive that I may just be a heterosexual with issues, and didnt want to intrude into that space without being sure. Thanks for reading, and letting me post this here.",asexuality
"I think im asexual, but i really really dont want to be, does this make sense?","Hey, as you've seen above, i feel like im asexual but i really dont want to be. I dont know why, ive been wondering if it was influenced by social pressure but i really dont think thats it. I want to have sex and enjoy it, but i dont enjoy it (even after experimenting around with girls and guys). Is this how asexuality works? Like is it something i have to accept? Or am i maybe going through something a bit different?",asexuality
Just the comment section on this shows the horrible misunderstandings/stereotypes around asexuality,,asexuality
"When going to the gallery crawl downtown, you gotta sport your ace gear",,asexuality
"Figured I’d jump on the bandwagon, so here are my ace shorts!",,asexuality
I still don't know what to do with this,,asexuality
Who needs Netflix and Chill when you can do this instead?,,asexuality
"When you found out you were asexual, was it satisfying to come to a conclusion or did you have to come to acceptance?",^ its up there. ,asexuality
Starting to doubt my asexuality,"I don't know if I'm ace or not, I'm confused. I don't feel sexual attraction towards real men, but then show me some random doodle with abs and I'll be all like OwO. Another problem is that I'm into a couple of fetishes which are inherently sexual, and occasionally I will get turned on from fetish art or stories. Wow, not only am I a gross human being I'm also not sure if I really am ace.",asexuality
Ace Pride for work today!,,asexuality
"I'm sure you're tired of hearing this, but..","I just finished BoJack Horseman. I had never really heard about the show before, but after seeing a post about Todd being ace, I was interested and gave it a shot. When he showed up to the meeting with other aces, something clicked with me. It was so nice to see someone represented so well. I feel like I haven't quite fit in with this community lately, because I'm in a sexual relationship but still identify as ace. When Emily created the ace dating app, she mentioned that some asexuals still have sex, and that actually made me cry a bit. It made me feel like my sexuality was still valid. It's just refreshing to see an uncommon sexuality represented. ",asexuality
This hits close to home,,asexuality
Got some pins for Pride,,asexuality
Grasping for relatable characters,"Me: this character has never expressed interest in sexual activity. I can at least pretend they are ace.

Character: *does a sex*

Me: I am not mad. I’m just disappointed ",asexuality
Should We F or Should We Not,"Sup.

I've goten my first real boyfriend a few months ago. He's a great person and a handsome young man, we share lots of interests, and we're both working hard on our way to a bright future.

Haven't popped the cherry though.

He's very experienced as far as I can tell, and very attentive. Always asks if I want to go further or try this and that. All round the best person to do the job.

**Thing is, I'm asexual.** Perhaps due to past childhood abuse. Making out etc is interesting bcs he's objectively a beautiful piece of human anatomy but that's about it. I only get sexual with him because I know he wants to get sexual and I feel bad for blueballing him every time we're together. I want him to believe I'm super into him to flatter his ego. 

But I'm not into shagging anyone, even less so since I'm always stressed and busy with work and studies. There's a one-day window when we're both free and I'm about to spend the night at his place. Sound like it might be the day.

&amp;#x200B;

So, people of Reddit, should I go down on him in an attempt of strengthening our relationship and making my dear happy, or should I keep postponing it until I'm really into it?",asexuality
Seeking advice concerning girlfriend's body issues,"Hey y'all, I'm not ace myself (I'm actually bi) but my girlfriend is. She's the type who's not just uninterested in sex, but fully repulsed by it. It's led to some funny moments, some miscommunication, and a few other things. Most relevantly: she has body image issues, and I'm not sure how to help.

More specifically: I want to compliment her and build her confidence and convince here that she does have a nice body, but I don't want it to come across as sexual. I already compliment her on things like her soft skin and smooth legs, but I'm worried about commenting more generally or on other specific parts of her.

I've tried complimenting her from medical and romantic perspectives (""You're physically fit, and I appreciate that"" and ""Holding you is nice because you're so soft and the perfect size""), but it doesn't seem to help her with her image issues.

So what else can I try? Is there some angle I'm missing? Should I say things that could come across as sexual but make sure she understands I don't mean it like that? Should I leave it be?",asexuality
This post regarding asexuality is getting a lot of attention. From r/all,,asexuality
Question about asexuality,"If a person is disgusted by sex, and avoids it, but that is due to a traumatic childhood of sexual abuse; does that still count as asexuality? Should someone that fits this criteria accept their sexuality, or seek therapy for the trauma? I'm referring to myself, and my gf thinks that with therapy my sexual desires will ""blossom"". Even if that is the case, I prefer an asexuality life, but maybe that's just the trauma talking. I'm obviously confused, and I was wondering if anyone might have an insight on this.",asexuality
What's the difference between r/asexuality and r/asexual?,"I'm not quite sure there's a difference. I recently posted the same thing in both (just to make sure I get the most answers possible, sorry for double posting), and I received a lot more responses on r/asexual, even though it has 15 thousand less redditors.

So my question is, why not mix both?",asexuality
My contribution to the 'Ace Flag coloured clothing' bandwagon (found in the Men's section of New Look UK a few months back),,asexuality
I still don't know if I'm aro but people think I am and so I don't have a way to find out,"Even if I came out to some friends I find it too troublesome to explain the whole ordeal about asexuality and it's honestly so mentally draining that I can't be bothered. 

So my go to line is ""I'm not a relationship kind of girl"" or ""I don't really understand physical stuff, sorry"" when the topics about intimacy or sex come out during conversation, and I find that these lines don't bring up further questions.

The problem is that I still haven't figured out if I'm also aromantic and I feel like my words give that vibe and may preclude me the possibility of having a relationship, but I'm also glad because this way people don't approach me? 

Tell me that I'm not the only one ahaha

Anyways, if you are aroace, how did you know?",asexuality
Asexual flag jumpers (kinda) in Primark! (UK),,asexuality
I feel like ace should be under lgbtq,,asexuality
The kind of relationship fights we have?,,asexuality
What causes people to be asexual?,"I know the verdict is still out, but what's your opinion?  Is it purely environmental? purely genetic? A combination perhaps? Does it result from sexual dysfunction?  Is it simply a conscious choice? If anyone has theories about why you are asexual, I'd love to hear them. 

I feel like my personal lack of sexual desire and fear of sex has grown out of a combination of sexual dysfunction and growing up in the presence of sexually inactive (asexual?) and emotionally isolated parents.",asexuality
So… are aces queer? Do you identify as queer?,"Yeah, I know “queer” doesn’t really have a definition besides excluding straight cisgender people (but some say queer only excludes straight people because cisgender would fall under gender identity, separate from queer, about sexuality). And queer has been a controversial term. Like, I’d never call someone else queer, except maybe if they identify themselves as such and don’t think of the word as negative.",asexuality
An ace outfit I put together,,asexuality
What Should I do?,"I'm an Asexual, but I do really long for an affectionate companion, like, a platonic love I suppose. Recently I've been spending a lot of time with a friend of mine who is also asexual. We have both been helping each other through a rough spot. We are both affectionate towards each other and cuddle a lot or she will rest on my shoulder. When I am with her she just makes me feel so genuinely wanted, and special for once in my life and I would very much like to tell her that. But I'm worried that she might take it the wrong way, and that I'll lose her if I tell her. I feel like she is exactly the person I need in my life, who I've been looking for, but I don't want to risk losing her forever. What do I do?

Edit: We are both sex repulsed, and as far as I know she is also interested in a companionship, though not necessarily one with me. ",asexuality
This Video Changed My Life,,asexuality
"Aromantic/Platonic/queerplatonic dating checklist (found on Tumblr, referred by a friend, thought it might be helpful to share)",,asexuality
At least they still love eachother.,,asexuality
I think many of us can relate,,asexuality
Am I asexual or just unfomfortable with sex?,"[M/20] Hello, I've already written like three posts about me questioning my sexual orientation but why not another one...

I've had sex with many people and it's absolutely disgusting, I could reach orgasm but I don't think it means anything. I also totally hate making out (I do like little kisses), it's gross, and I don't feel anything whatsoever when someone licks/sucks my neck or body, even my dick. I do like masturbating (ie on my own).

Maybe I still would like to be more normal and have sex (because all the people I've met/dated want that), and maybe the problem is that I've never felt comfortable enough to 'feel', I'm always rather shy and don't like having physical contact with anyone, at all.

Do you have any ideas? It's pretty rough to get into a relationship this way, idk. Thanks at least for reading. Also, sorry for the bad language, I don't really speak English so I wasn't sure how to express myself properly.",asexuality
I'm writing a story about asexuality and want your input,"Hello! I am writing a story for a magazine my friend is putting together about asexual people and how underrepresented they are and how they feel about being within the LGBTQ community (or not, I'm not really certain about how you all define yourselves. I am hoping to bring more awareness to this group). Anyway, if any one of you all reading this who defines as asexual would like to speak with me, please let me know below or fill out a contact form on my website: [https://nicklingerfelt.com/](https://nicklingerfelt.com/). Thanks!",asexuality
"Coming out to myself, I think. Ace and still into kink?","Hi there,

I'll be honest, I'm here because of Bojack. This season made me realize there's a lot more to asexuality than I thought. I've been reading the resources in the sidebar, and I guess the most helpful desciptors I have for myself so far are grey-A homoromantic lesbian?

I'm 33 and thought I had figured myself out by now. But, I'll be honest, I haven't had sex in...16 years, really, and it hasn't been hard at all. Aside from one or two times of getting drunk and fumbling around with my hands like an idiot while someone else went at me with their hands. I get stressed out from this overwhelming, pervasive attitude that I'm missing out on something that I'm supposed to have and is healthy. Hearing in Bojack that there are people who are asexual who are willing to engage in sex got me researching more to find my grey area.

Like, I'm still into kink...And I have personal fetishes that go far into the realm of unrealistic and fantastic and...reading personal stories, the wiki, and other things, well, it feels just fine to say that having those things is good enough for me. Like, if kink is involved, I feel I might be more open to sex with the right person.

But being able to just look at this label and find myself in all the sub-categories...I mean, I feel disappointed in myself for not figuring this out sooner, but I also feel better that this feels like an answer. That maybe I have been normal, and okay all along, and I just haven't been able to define my needs because I've thought they were wrong.

Like, now I feel like I don't have to think of things in terms of ""fixing"" myself. I have to think of things in terms of getting my needs met and those of whoever I might date...If I date. Though I feel having this new framework will really help.

So, uh...I guess this is just an off-my-chest sort of post. How are all you people doing?

*Minor update: I came out to my best friend, ex-girlfriend, and housemate (all the same person) today. Her response was that she was not surprised. She made a 50 Shades of Grey joke (because I'm Grey-A and the way I phrased shit.) I mainly told her because we're best friends and she'd be upset if I didn't let her know what was troubling me and on my mind! Other than that...yeah, this feels right.",asexuality
Is it possible to be asexual while in a committed relationship?,"I (F) have been in a relationship with the same person (M) for 5 years now. I can honestly say that I have never been sexually attracted to him, however I think he is very nice looking. I really enjoy our relationship not for the sexual part, but the “togetherness”. I really never look forward to sexual activities but I do understand that he has his needs. I love him for who he is as a person and not really for how he looks. On a side note, I’ve never found strangers to be “hot”, or any of that nonsense. I see people as people, nothing more or less. I do see people who sometimes I find cute, but in a “puppy” sort of way. Am I Ace?",asexuality
"A rant, or maybe advice seeking.","I do not experience any sexual attraction nor desire towards my current romantic partner (and if I’m being honest, no romantic desire either) but they are very traditional about how a relationship should be and are very passionate about their ideals.
Their idea of a relationship is the old fashioned lovey dovey mushy stuff during the day then sexual activity when alone at home. But honestly all of that is repulsive to me, I can never tell them that because I do love and care deeply for them and want them happy and fulfilled. 
They’ve made compromises for me and I for them but I don’t feel like I compromise enough. I cannot force myself to find them hot or sexy when I don’t.
They desperately want me to lust for them and show them desire and passion but I don’t think I can without it being obviously forced/fake. 

I hate this. On one hand I wish I was able to be their perfect idea of how a boyfriend should be but on the other hand I want to be selfish.",asexuality
Words to live by.,,asexuality
Just need a place to rant.,"Long-time lurker here, but I just felt the need to get these dumb feeling off of my chest.

So recently I was made aware by my group of friends that one of my acquaintances had a “huge crush” on me. So I decided to give her a chance, and truth be told the date was pretty kick ass! Things however began to get weird that night.

So I just pulled up to her house and we were saying our goodbyes and I noticed that she was stalling, you know trying to stay in the car for as long as she can, eventually she finally gets out and I walk her to her doorstep and I take off.

A couple of minutes later, A close friend messages me and asks how the date went, so we begin to chop the beef and she tells me that my date was “disappointed” because I didn’t make a move on her. I played this off with the whole “not on the first date” excuse, but in reality I honestly don’t feel comfortable with the whole “touchy-feely” and intimacy stuff. I mean I understand what intimacy is, but I don’t understand how it should feel. 

We had planned to meet up sometime next week, but now I just don’t know. I feel like I’m broken, I know that I should want to get “touchy-feely” with her, I mean it’s human nature, but at the same time I really don’t feel like doing so. It’s making me feel like less of an adult, because this is what adults do you know?  It also makes me dread meeting with her, because what if she thinks that I’m weird, and I ended up throwing out a good friendship and a potential relationship.
",asexuality
"""I'm different""","I was talking to a friend, well, i thought he was my friend, who was asking for nudes from me, and I didn't want to because for some reason that day I felt ashamed of sending them. I didn't feel ashamed of my body or anything, just about the thought he would think of the picture differently than I did. What do I mean by that, you might ask? Well, I send nudes because I felt cute in them, maybe I had just shaved my pussy and it was nice and smooth, or maybe my new buttplug tail was looking super cute. I tried to explain to him why I didn't want to send any that day, and slowly the conversation escalated to sexuality in general. I started to think back on why I was so casual about sexuality. I could easily watch porn with someone and laugh at the bad plot or draw porn for someone or literally masturbate in a call while we were just chatting about what ever. And not a single time I got aroused by any of that. Don't get me wrong, I do still get aroused, but never by other people, but rather the concepts and other things not related to other people. I always thought I was hypersexual because I was so casual about it, but who knew it was the exact opposite. I had never came in the hands of another, and I always faked it because I felt like there was something wrong with me. As the conversation kept going, I started to realize I'm not like the typical young adult you see in media. I never liked sex that much, I always wanted a relationship where I wouldn't need to have sex with the person to love them and I very rarely cared what a person looked like, I only cared about their personality. When I was pressured to send my first nude at the age of 14, I kept the habit up, thinking it was the only way to keep a guys interest. And often times that was the case. But today, this evening, I feel free for the first time. I always found sex as an obligation, something I had to do to keep a person I was with happy, but now I don't need that anymore. I can finally be myself without worrying about what other people might think. 

I went to talk to my mom about it (very understanding person, always there for me), she wasn't too convinced over it at first, but as I explained it without going in to nitty gritty details, even she looked up from brushing my hair and said: ""Huh. I guess you really are asexual. Also the ""friend"" I was talking to, well he got very mad over that fact and I had to block him because he was not being understanding at all. Block the haters y'all.

Thank you for listening me pour my heart out for you, I am so excited to start a new chapter in my life! ",asexuality
I thought this story may be of interest to people here. Is good to see asexuality being mentioned in the mainstream news.,"
https://www.bbc.com/news/amp/health-45562014?__twitter_impression=true",asexuality
"I’m sure you get this everyday, but this stupid shit is tearing my mind apart. I need to find out if I’m ace, so I’ve got a few questions.","Ok, so I learned about this whole aromantic asexual thing a few days ago, and it felt about right, but I’m just not sure.  I’m pretty sure I’m aro, I mean, my one time I had a “crush” I was extremely relieved when I found out she did not reciprocate the feeling because I did not want to have a girlfriend. So that’s figured out, but I’m super unsure of about sexually attraction. I just don’t know if what I feel is sexual attraction or not. I watch porn and stuff, so I figured “oh, clearly I’m not ace” but apparently some asexual people watch porn. And now I’m sitting here like “do I want to have sex with people or do I just want to get off?”. I think I might just be in need of touch with someone. Like I’ll see someone and just want to hug them and feel close to them, but it doesn’t go past that. I ran through a few thought experiments in my head, when I was feeling particularly horny, where I asked “if I had the option of having sex with a pornstar right now, or get 10$, which would I choose?” And I eventually decided on the money. Or I’ll think about sex, and I think “maybe it would be nicer just because I could probably finish faster, yah know?” When I think about sex it just feels like a shortcut to get rid of the discomfort that comes with being horny. Is that sexual attraction? I don’t know. Like, if I think about sex when I’m not super annoyingly horny it sounds pretty gross and just evolves into cuddling.  And when I think about the actual sex part it feels more like weird masterbation in my mind. So, after about two days of panicking over that, I figured sexual attraction probably just mean you would want to fuck a person, right? That wasn’t rhetorical by the way I really have no clue if that’s sexual attraction. So to test that version of sexual attraction, when I was at school, I looked at people, imagined them naked, and then thought about if I’d want to have sex with them. I didn’t end up thinking I’d like to have sex with them, although I did end up getting horny, which was annoying. This also had the fun side effect of making me feel like an asshole pervert, So, what do you guys make of this. I need to figure this out so I think properly again. Side note, sorry that this ended up being a bit rambly. And thanks for tolerating my panicking, if you managed to read this whole wall of text. I’m just really confused and stressed.",asexuality
I feel like we should all write letters to the Bojack Horseman producers for season five.,"I started watching Bojack Horseman and I heard on Reddit (season four was out by then, about last winter) that Todd was eventually coming out as ace and such. Well from watching the first half of season five, I think we need to overflow them (probably Aaron Paul--voice of Todd and executive producer) with some kind of meaningful praise. . .because I know this didn't mean nothing to us.

Sure everyone's getting tired of Bojack Horseman being the ""go-to"" asexual representation now, but they did a pretty good job compared to the whole sociopathic expectation of asexuality!

Todd even preaches that just because two people are asexual, doesn't mean they should be together. It's a huge leap considering shows always group the ethnic couple together, or the gay kids. . . 

I don't know, just me thinking.",asexuality
Petition to make these two asexual icons.,,asexuality
I don’t mean to come off as ignorant but is it possible that someone can make themselves aromantic?,Like with beliefs or meditation. I’m okay with occasionally having to masturbate but I don’t like the feelings of wanting affection and to be in a relationship. It might sound stupid but I envy people who are aromantic. I don’t want these feelings.,asexuality
Therapy Advice,"Hey friends.

I'm looking into the idea of getting some professional therapy for the first time in years. My last experience went -really- poorly so I'm scared about this. I'm pretty depressed, have some real cool self loathing issues, and am also questioning my sexuality. 

I have no idea how to find a therapist whose Ace friendly. I'm convinced that if I say I'm Ace they'll immediately jump to that being a symptom instead of being willing to consider it a part of who I am. Does anyone have experience finding psych help from someone whose open minded about asexuality? Is there a way to ask that without having to pay to get onto the couch first? Maybe a secret handshake or something?

Thanks all. I really appreciate any help.",asexuality
I did the thing!,"Fellas I did it, I came out the my parents! But they don't believe its a thing that can happen... What should I do? 

(Edit) sent them the ""parents guide to asexuality"", which apparently made more sense, so I'm out and not having sex wooooo! ",asexuality
I'm tired of having no one to talk to about being Ace,"I'm not even sure why I want to talk to people about being Ace. I think that I'm lithromantic and don't really want a partner, so I'm not really worried about being alone necessarily. I just don't know what's been bothering me so much lately. 

Sometimes, I wish I could forget that I was Ace. At first the label really helped me figure a lot of things out, but now I feel like I understand less than I did 3 years ago. Like do people actually expect sex after the 3rd date? Apparently they do. I have no idea whether I will ever want to have sex, but I would like to try dating. Maybe holding hands. Except, that's not how its done, I guess.

A few years ago, I tried to tell my parents I was asexual, but they didn't care and gave me the typical, don't worry, you'll find someone routine; I wasn't doing that stuff at your age either, etc. Thing is, it didn't bother me much at the time because I kind of thought my parents were ace too ( I project aceness into everybody). They were 36 when they got married and 45 when they had me. They were never very affectionate with each other, They didn't give me the birds and the bees talk; etc.

Now it has become apparent to me that my parents want me to have a relationship and its really awkward. This wouldn't bother me so much, until the topic of asexuality came up the other day and my mom literally scoffed at it. (Also, my dad tried to tell me its okay if I'm gay; at least that's where I think the conversation was headed)

I could keep writing, but I should probably stop.",asexuality
Our Latest Ace Designs,"Our latest Ace designs incorporating the colors from the Ace pride flag, input/opinions are greatly appreciated!

https://i.redd.it/2ugyob0v27n11.jpg

https://i.redd.it/1ocpae0v27n11.jpg

https://i.redd.it/ahprgc0v27n11.jpg",asexuality
"Feeling ""turned on"" without sexual attraction?","Does anyone else here ever feel turned on/aroused (have a physical sensation in your genitalia) by someone you see, but have no desire to have sex with them? Has your erotic interest in someone ever ended when they took their clothes off, but the erotic interest *really was there* when they were clothed?

I've been like this for as long as I can remember, leaving me with a lot more doubt over whether I'm actually asexual. ""If I get a boner from looking at someone, surely I'm not ace,"" is a type of thought I've had quite a bit.

All of this also leaves me with quite a bit of confusion over what ""sexual attraction"" means. Is there some slight difference between this ""erotic attraction"" (being aroused by a person and maybe wanting to masturbate about it), and ""sexual attraction"" (wanting to have sex with the person)?

Is there a specific word for this type of ""attraction profile""?",asexuality
My sex-repulsed girlfriend watches porn?,"I’m sexual and my girlfriend claims to be a sex repulsed asexual.

We had sex for a few months and stopped after she came out.

One day, I asked to use her phone for something, and found a few porn searches. She SWORE that was one time because she was curious (but the searches were incest, so I really doubted that).

Maybe I shouldn’t have done this, but I checked her phone once or twice over the next month or two. To be clear, I never looked at messages or internet history; just the app on her phone where I found it the last time. I found more porn.

What do I do? Do I come out to her and ask why she’s not telling the truth? But then she might feel like I was snooping? What I do know is I’m not happy with the status quo of us both not telling the trutth.

I’m especially not happy with her using porn instead of actually having sex with me.

 I just need advice. And I need to understand why she watches porn but claims to be sex repulsed.",asexuality
"I’m curious is anyone here on the autism spectrum? I’ve seen a lot of fellow aces who fall somewhere on it, online not in person.",,asexuality
"Definitely ace, pretty disappointed about it","While I was growing up, it didn't bother me that I had no interest in boys (or girls). I was focusing on my studies, and the adults all treated me like I was the good/smart kid compared with the other hormone machines my age. Based on what I was taught about saving yourself for marriage, I always kind of figured that I would suddenly gain interest in sex sometime in my early 20s. That... never happened. I'm in my mid-to-late 20s and I have never had a crush. I have never masturbated. I can count on one hand the number of times I have been physically aroused. Even this didn't bother me too much until my first (and only) relationship.

I started dating a friend in my senior year of college purely out of curiosity and a desire to conform, but after dating for a year I realized that I was very much in love with him. We (eventually) got married, and to this day we are quite happy together. Looking back, I can say that I'm pretty sure I'm demiromantic. At the time, though, when I first realized that I was capable of romantic love, the logical next thought was, ""Wait. If love is real... is sex real too?"" That may be a weird way of phrasing it, but being so close to another person and seeing from his eyes, I finally realized that sex was not just a trope designed to sell songs, stories, and products (which is what I always thought it was before). (To be clear, my husband is heterosexual.)

Ever since then, I've just been completely distraught about missing out on something that is so clearly important and wonderful to so many people, including to the person closest to me. Maybe it's not politically correct for me to say, but I hate being ace. If there were a cure I would take it in a moment. I know a lot of you are a lot more confident/comfortable with being asexual, so I'd love advice. How do you stay positive? I do you get over the whole totally-left-out-of-a-wonderful-human-experience thing? I hope to be a proud ace someday, but I need some help getting there.",asexuality
Anyone else feel this?,,asexuality
"Is it possible to ""become asexual""?","Hey there. Im an 18 YO Male. I've discovered masturbation when I was really young. Like pre 10. Ever since then I became really.. into it to say the least. I was  not fixated in sex, but you know, I wanted it (later in life of course.. not when I was a child). Anyway, last year I got my first gorlfriend, had my first kiss. We were together for like, 2 months. We never did anything sexual, even if at the time I really wanted. So, after we broke up I was really down, took me a while to forget her, didn't date anyone else. Got kinda addicted to porn again for some time, I tried to date someone else but then suddenly.. i didn't feel like it. The desire was simply gone. And its been gone for a month or so. No desire to masturbate, to see porn, to have sex, and the desire to be in a relationship is significantly lower than ever. Wich is weird, and so out of nowhere. As I said I was always very.. well, excited all the time, now I cant remember the last time I had an erection, seriously. Personaly, I don't think i ""became Asexual"", probably its just a phase. But with all this happening I just got curious if its possible for someone to ""become asexual""? Even if the person is/was like me? 
Last saturday I went to a party, a woman was hitting on me. Well, we kissed. I didn't feel anything. Old me would be like ""hell yeah, this is good"", be all excited, have an erection, and all . Probably even try to have sex(shes very beautiful). But nope. All flacid, no desire to engage in anything. Again it can be just a phase, and Im pretty sure it is. Still feels really strange.

TL;DR: I've always been a normal guy, but recently I've started to become less ""sexual""/""romantic"". I'm sure its just a phase but I got curious to know if its possible for one to become Asexual",asexuality
Lonely like a satellite,How do you cope with this sharp feeling of disconnection when someone you're kind of interested in talks about sex like it's a regular part of their life?,asexuality
Any group chats for asexuals? (preferably discord),I was wondering if there was possibly a discord server or other group chat (kik for example) for asexuals that I could join. I would love to talk to other asexual people as I have only met two other asexuals in my entire life. Thank you 💜🖤,asexuality
Would anyone be interested if I made a group on groupme for ace people?,,asexuality
Am I asexual?,"  I honestly have been thinking for a while, I'm a teen, and have 'liked' people, but I can't imagine kissing someone, or having sex, I just don't like the thought of it.  But I still masturbate?  I don't think of anyone while I do it.  I'm just really unsure of if that means I can't be asexual?  Or if it's more of a grey area, or if it is okay to still have crushes and think someone is cute?  Personally, the main things leading me to think like this is that the thought of even kissing someone is kind of gross to me and I am at an age where people kiss often and are  becoming sexually active with others but I just don't want any of it.  Honestly though, I am just looking for advice for people who know more than I do.  Thank you for any help you can give. &lt;3",asexuality
My new ace ring is amazing. Too bad the paint is peeling off.,,asexuality
Can I be ace but still want to be in a romantic relationship with someone? Also relationship problems.,"I (21F) have recently realized that I am sex repulsed and I consider myself on the asexual spectrum I just don’t know where I fit exactly. I definitely don’t want to have sex with anyone but I still want a romantic relationship. I like cuddling and light kisses on the lips and that is how I show my love to my current partner (21M) but anything more than that makes me feel gross/wrong on the inside. I’ve had sex in the past with previous partners and my current one (been together for a little over a year and a half) and from what I remember, at least, it felt good/okay ish. I also used to have a little bit of a sex drive but only when I was with someone and right when I hit puberty but it faded fast. I think my past experiences with sex are something like I never knew being asexual was a thing and that I believed I was supposed to have sex with my partners because we were in a romantic relationship. As for the relationship problems it’s kinda obvious. My partner and I used to have sex a lot but after I started to really think about my sexuality paired with seeing a psychiatrist and getting on the right meds for me I have realized that I just don’t want sex. It’s not that I don’t want sex from my current partner it’s that I don’t want sex from anyone. My partner sees it as that I don’t want to touch him like that anymore so I must not like him anymore. He has always had a really high sex drive and I feel kinda bad about switching it up this far into the relationship but I do love him dearly and I want to be with him. Also quick question, can I be bi but also ace at the same time? I’m romantically attracted to both males and females but not sexually. ",asexuality
Keeping busy vs. downtime (x-post /r/AsexualMen),,asexuality
"Why does Asexuality have a ""spectrum"" ?","Hi ! I'm new to reddit, and feel like it would be a good place to ask such a question without too many issues, especially since I'm ace myself.  


For the life of me, I cannot fathom why Asexuality is ""in a spectrum"". Most of the rest of the spectrum just sounds like it's just setting up some conditions for turning sexual later on. I don't understand. I don't mean to be offensive, I just really don't understand, and I would like someone to explain to me with solid arguments why there has to be a ""spectrum"" for it when the rest doesn't. I'm into the impression that the whole spectrum thing confuses people a lot more than it should. Can't it be simply what it is ? Not being sexually attracted to anything / not being interested in sex (although I would argue for this one too), \*ever\* ?",asexuality
Someone built an Ace keyboard,,asexuality
Explaining relationship elements using cats,"My heterosexual friend was trying to communicate her concerns about a guy who is in to her. After talking for a while I had to apologize to her saying I couldn't really understand, because I have never experienced a painful break-up or giving my heart to someone and having them take pieces of their love after a break-up. She sat there for awhile and said that giving your heart to someone is like giving your heart to your cat. You loved your cat so much that now that he has passed, you find it hard to love the new cats in your life with the wholeness that you loved your first cat with. He was so special to you. Though you love the cats that are in your life now, you'd agree that you don't love them in the same way right? My mind was blown... I now understand what she is talking about when she talks about it being difficult to try and get into a relationship again. Thought I would share this with y'all.",asexuality
Why would you tell me I'm wrong when you obviously have no clue what you are talking about?,"https://imgur.com/a/G1L3H3o

Backstory kind of: I'm a sophomore now, but at the beginning of my freshman year this guy (the one who sent the messages) decided to ask me out. At the time I didn't know i was aroace (because i didn't know the word for it) but I still rejected him of course.

We ended up becoming friends because we sat beside each other in 2 classes first semester and we had 3 classes second semester. I still liked him as a friend, but it seems like he can't accept my sexuality so I've just started ignoring him.",asexuality
I learned about the ace ring through this group. Mine just came in today...so happy to feel like I finally belong in a community!!! :),,asexuality
Is there any asexual represantation in the media ( beside bojack horseman,,asexuality
Rise and Grind Gamers,,asexuality
Questioning,"Throw away because I am going to get personal in here. Also, TW for mention of sexual assault. 

So a little about me: I am 22, female, a virgin, and have self identified as asexual for quite a while. I was told when I was younger that I would eventually become more comfortable with my sexuality and want to have sex with someone one day. I had absolutely no desire for it other than procreation and because it was what was expected of me in a relationship. I was in a long distance relationship for a while so there was no way for me to even have sex with my boyfriend if I wanted to, so I got out of it that way. I do want a large family one day, so I was okay with sex for the purpose of procreation- unless I used a surrogate, adoption, or IVF (all very expensive options), I kind of had to be. But other than that, I didn’t really feel anything. 

Friends had told me to try masturbation and honestly... it felt okay. I never found anything that felt actually really good and I never had any desire to have an orgasm. I’ve watched porn to try to see if that did anything for me too. Honestly, it didn’t do much either.

I do have a small confession. At the age of 16, when I feel like I may have had a “normal” sexuality, I was molested by my boyfriend (not the aforementioned long distance one). It was over the clothes and happened only once, and for that I kind of brushed it off for a long time. But by the time I started to wonder whether I was asexual, I finally realized that what happened to me was *not* okay, and honestly, I’m pretty fucked up by it now. I get so uncomfortable when people touch me without my permission and straight up have panic attacks over it. How was I ever supposed to have a sexual relationship when I couldn’t even let someone touch my arm without anxiety?

And then I met one of my coworkers, and now, I have no idea what to believe about myself anymore. I am head over heels in love with one of my coworkers. I haven’t felt this way about someone in years. He has a habit of touching people on the arm when he talks to them. The first time he did this, I didn’t have the heart to tell him I don’t like being touched. But what I found was that it didn’t bother me when he touched me...at all. A couple months later he held his arms out for a hug when he saw me, and since he was already waiting I just acquiesced and hugged him. And I realized hugging him felt...really good, and really safe. From there, I was falling in love with him. We aren’t in a relationship, but I still feel happier knowing him than I have in a while.  I honestly *want* him to touch me when I see him. I don’t want anything drastic, just a hug or a touch on the arm again, but unfortunately (or I guess fortunately, depending on your view), another coworker has told him I don’t like being touched and he’s stopped. I do find it sweet that he would respect my boundaries since he touches EVERYONE when he talks to them, but still. I crave that contact so badly.

But what’s really alarmed me is that I’ve started to feel sexual attraction to him. I don’t mean I want to rip his clothes off at work, but I do think a lot at home about being with him in both a romantic and sexual way. I do want to pause here and say this sexual attraction isn’t like me wanting to fuck each other’s brains out or anything, it’s more like wanting to make love with him.

I’m just very confused by this whole thing. I would say I’m demisexual, but the fact that I was in a long term relationship for such a long time and didn’t feel proper sexual attraction to him makes me question that. I guess I sort of just wanted this off my chest more than anything. Also, yes, if you check my post history, he is much older than I am, as in, in high school when I was an infant.",asexuality
I've fallen for an asexual/demiromantic (long),"I have a friend who I met several years ago under extremely unique circumstances. At our first meeting we were immediately drawn to one another. We spent the day together watching live music, dancing into the night, going for a midnight walk around a lake, sitting alone cuddling and holding hands and being very intimate. And, although our first meeting was by chance and we did not live close enough to each other for easy or convenient future visits, the last thing she said to me when we parted ways was ""See you soon."" Needless to say, I became quite smitten.

When we met again, a couple months later, I was hoping things would continue as they had at our first meeting but they didn't. While we still shared an undeniable connection and had a lovely time together, there had been a clear shift in her demeanor. She later told me that she identifies as asexual and demiromantic and, while she absolutely agreed that there was something special between us, for her, it was not romantic.

I understood and respected her boandaries. Over the years, and especially this last year, we have become close, dear friends. But I have never lost my initial feelings for her. And I suppose it's important to note that I identify as hopelessly romantic and highly sexual.

Recently, I felt the need to 'lay my cards on the table', as they say and tell her how I truly felt about her. For, while she certainly knew that I was or at least had once been interested in exploring a romantic relationship with her, I had never told her the full extend of what I felt for her.

So, we spent the day together. I made us lunch. We went for a walk in the park. We climbed a tree like we were 15 years old again. We went back to my place and talked for two or three hours. And ended the evening with watching a movie together while lying next to each other, though not quite cuddling, on the couch (her suggestion).

The day had been beautiful. I cannot count the number of times I found myself longing for more than friendship with her that day and after the movie I felt overcome with my feelings for her. She actually sensed this for while we were lying together in silence she said ""I sense a question."" And I had indeed been thinking of a question in that very moment.

Before the movie when we were talking, she had told me a sad story about a person she had met who was going through hard times. She had reached out to this person, trying to help and support him, and they became friends. But he had made it clear quite quickly that he had developed a crush on her and, while she did not offer any details (and I did not choose to ask for any) she said that this had caused a falling out between them and she was unable to be his friend anymore.

So, knowing that she had had this recent experience, the question on my mind in the moment that she asked me was, ""Does she know how I feel about her and, if she does, does she still want to be my friend?""

I told her this and thankfully and amazingly she was entirely understanding, compassionate and receptive to hearing me. I explained to her that I have never stopped having a romantic longing for her but that I want nothing more than to be a good friend to her and respect her in every way, however, I was afraid that my feelings for her would push her away, as it had her other friend. But she said that she felt fully comfortable with me, even now knowing (if she didn't already) that I have these feelings for her. I told her I would continue to be the best friend I can be and respect her boundaries but that sometimes (like the moment I was telling her all of this) my feelings might overwhelm me a little. And she was also completely understanding and accepting of this.

In the end, it was a very bittersweet experience. Perhaps the most bittersweet experience of my life. Another thing she told me when we were talking before the movie was that she had recently tried dating someone who she had just met recently. It didn't work and they broke up after only two or three months and she had only known him for one month before they tried dating. The emotionally frustrated, heartsick part of me (that I am choosing NOT to listen to) thought 'You told me you were asexual and demiromantic but you dated someone after only knowing them for a month?! You've known me for years! Why won't you try dating me?!' But, as I said, that's the part of me that I am NOT listening to. Still, again, a bittersweet experience but I'm trying to focus on the 'sweet' part and not let myself become too bitter about it.

We are still close friends with a special and unique conntection. She was open to me sharing my feeling with her, she listened to me and is understanding and accepting of who I am. Is it any surprise that I've fallen for her?

I don't know if I'm looking for advice or seeking suggestions. Maybe I just felt the need to share what I'm going through and get it off of my chest. Thank you for reading.",asexuality
"CW: Sexual Assault, Sex, etc. My Boyfriend is asexual but I am not...(need advice)","My trans (ftm) boyfriend is asexual, however, I am not. We have been together on and off for a few years now but we recently moved in together and got more serious. We have a sexual past together when he was more comfortable with sex before he was sexually assaulted for the second time. Since then he hasn't been comfortable at all with sex. He has a long history of being sexual abused too. So obviously sex is off the table. During his second sexual assault he went out and tried being a dom for a stranger he met on the bus and he assaulted my boyfriend. He was desperate for money and I couldn't help him because I had recently given him a couple hundred and I was out too. This event was is the main reason he can't have sex anymore. It was kind of the straw that broke the camel's back. I don't know if it is wrong or not for me to be a little angry with my boyfriend for doing something so stupid and ruining our sex life and chances of being intimate. Obvious I am infinitely more angry at the man that did this to him. I still feel like my boyfriend should have known not to go to a stranger's apartment by himself or told me what he was going to do before he had done it. I still blame myself for not having more money. If I did I could have saved him from that trauma. Nevertheless here we are, he's asexual (probably for good) and I still have urges to be with him. Somewhere inside me sex is important to me. I don't know why but it feels like something you do to show love or bond with your partner. I know there are other ways of showing love but this still feels really important and I don't know how to move past it. I know my partner won't have sex and won't be comfortable with any alternatives either. Basically if it's sexual he won't do it. I want some advice of how to move past and accept he isn't comfortable and it's for his happiness, even if it means giving up some of mine.",asexuality
I hate being Ace/Aro so much,"I have one friend. The only thing she EVER talks to me about is relationship advice, which I, of course, have literally no experience in. I feel like such a loser. Classmates don't respond well to hearing a 17 year old hasn't never dated or allowed anyone to get close enough to so much as ask me out. Every single sad song on on planet earth is about relationships which my emo ass can't relate to. I hate feeling like i'm going to die alone. I hate having never dated but the idea of dating makes so damn sense to me. I wish I didn't have more things to make me hate myself but whoopdeedoo found out not only am i unloveable, but i am incapable of love.

I'm sleep deprived and sad thank you and goodnight.",asexuality
To the man who ruined me (x-post r/UnsentLetters),"You'll never see this. It's best that way. I've thought of telling you, of forcing your eyes open to the hell you've thrust me into, but I know it won't make me feel better. It won't change anything that happened, and it won't make you sorry.

You used to love me, and maybe that's what I've foolishly been holding onto this whole time. You used to genuinely love me. I was the light of your life, I was your sunshine. You promised me a lifetime of love and happiness with you. With tears in your eyes, you vowed to make me your wife. You swore we would get through everything life could throw at us, together. You used to hold me tight and kiss me like you meant it, and you did mean it. When your arms were around me, I felt safe. When you told me you loved me, I believed you. I believed everything, and now I'm afraid to ever trust those words again.

I gave my body to you - my body, which no one else had ever seen or had before. I entrusted you with that. You made me feel beautiful and wanted, in the beginning. You kissed my lips and touched my body with a passion and hunger that took my breath away. I'll never forget that, but that was a long time ago, and it didn't last.

I had my fair share of baggage, but so did you. For what it's worth, I'm sorry for my part in this. I wish I felt like you were sorry for yours.

After years of self-reflection, I realized a truth about myself that I had denied for such a long time. When I explained to you that I was asexual, I don't know if you didn't understand what that meant for us, or if maybe you just didn't want it to be true. All I know is, the feeling that surged through my body when you rolled over in bed at night and put your mouth on mine and your hand on my breast, that feeling wasn't love, it was pure fear. Sometimes I was brave enough to say ""no, I don't want this"", but other times I just let you slide my underwear down my legs and take what I knew you wanted.

When we became distant, I didn't know how to fix it. You still wanted me, you told me that. I still wanted you, too - just not in that way. I still loved you, but the weight of everything we went through eventually took its toll on us. We stopped saying ""I love you"". We stopped asking ""how was work?"" We stopped kissing and then stopped hugging, too. If I'm honest, I know ""we"" weren't distant - it was just me. I was distant because of the fear of what a hug or a kiss could lead to next.

The first night we spent in our very first house should have been such a happy memory. I remember spending hours that evening cleaning our new kitchen and bathroom from top to bottom, listening to music and singing along together at the top of our lungs in OUR home. That's my happy memory. But it's forever tainted by the sick feeling in my stomach when I think of us, lying on a mattress on the floor in the spare bedroom, and you silently peeling my clothes off my body again. You loved me, and it was our first night together in our new home, the home we bought together. You just wanted to have that special memory of us, you just wanted things to be back to the way they were, and I knew that. So I didn't stop you.

That was three years ago. I couldn't give you what you needed, and even though you told me that you loved me as I was, that you understood, you fell out of love with me. I'm not mad or upset about that. I told you time and time again that if you ever needed to leave, if you weren't happy in a relationship like this, a relationship with someone like me, that I would understand. I meant that.

No, I'm mad that you now treat me like something less than human. I'm mad that in your eyes I'm no longer deserving of basic kindness or respect. I'm mad that the night you suddenly ended it, you immediately went out drinking with her until 5 in the morning, and left me home alone to pick up the pieces after a 12-year-long relationship. I'm mad that you now either talk to me like I'm a child or an idiot, depending on the situation. I'm mad that nearly every remark you make to me is condescending or spiteful. I'm mad that you seem to have forgotten EVERYTHING you once felt for me, like none of it ever happened, like I was never the center of your universe.

I'm leaving soon, whether I want to or not. I know it's the right thing and the best thing. Seeing you every day is not good for me, not when you hate me the way you do. Believe it or not, I'll miss you. Maybe not the ""you"" that you are now, but I will miss the ""you"" that I once knew. I don't think you'll miss me, though. I know you've already moved on. Maybe it's better that way. I don't love you anymore, but you were my best friend for a long time, and I will miss that friendship.

I know I will never forget you. You were my first in every real sense of the word. But you have destroyed me, and I can only hope the damage you have done is not permanent.",asexuality
My friend keeps trying to convert me to Hertosexuality,"Since they asked me some question about being myself, I said that Deep down I feel like something is lost and I’m trying to find it. And then he said, maybe your straight and don’t even know it. And then I say know. And he’s all like don’t knock it till you try it. Not to mention I’ve seen how hard people take break ups so I don’t need a sexual / romantic relationship.",asexuality
Yes! But No,"It was when I casually said it that it became real. I am asexual- and while I am somewhere on the spectrum that's just too confusing for uneducated people to understand graysexual (sexual attraction once, but to be honest I was kinda studying it like you would a science experiment you've never seen before. Had nothing to do with the guy though- it was his smell. IDK, but still counts).

Since I had depression and I was young (19), I thought maybe it would come to me later. But looking back it was pretty clear-- my friendships have been intensely close because it fed my need. I felt behind than other high school students, but I thought it was only because I was more mature and I didn't have the time. I had a few crushes (holding hands types) but I decided whatever happened (haha 6 years later).

Im 20. My depression is still here, and I'm not sure if it'll go away. But still, why should I be ashamed of accepting this? Because it would lessen the cause.

&amp;#x200B;

Anyway, that is figured out, and I just blurted it out when someone asked me if the friend I was talking about ""taking a break from"" was my boyfriend.

&amp;#x200B;

But now Romantic orientation. Sadness. I don't think I've felt romantic attraction to girls, but I feel most comfortable with them. Guys I've had crushes on, but I feel uncomfortable with guys in general. I've only had one hetero male friend. All the others make me too uncomfortable.

&amp;#x200B;

IDK. I'd hate to think that I'm aromantic. I'd chose friends any day, but they usually fade with less effort or care than romantic relationships that try to stay together. and that's the biggest reason I want a romantic relationship. Besides the cuddles and sense of protection in another.",asexuality
Sick of seeing “am I asexual?” posts,Your sexuality is between the self and the self. Only the self can determine its sexuality... not a bunch of strangers. My advice to people asking am I asexual??- quit focusing on the label. Just go with the flow and everything will come in time. ✌🏻,asexuality
Is this asexuality?,"I’m a freshman girl in college and I think I might be asexual. I like the thought of hooking up and having sex but in the movement when I’m making out I get extremely uncomfortable and just stop it. Is this asexuality? Even when I’m attracted to someone and have thought abt having sex w them, I don’t like making out and don’t want to take it further",asexuality
What is it like to do the sex?,,asexuality
Can you relate,"So 2-3 years ago I had a girlfriend we split up because she was so sexual and wanted to do everything seemingly all the time. Now she's gotta boyfriend and he's really understands that we are over and is cool with me. However I feel like I could be close friends with her and have the emotional satisfaction without the sex drive. I feel that I didn't know what a girlfriend meant back then and now I don't consider her my ex. I also feel like I was never into her do don't need to get over her. I  don't think this is  good idea to say and just to him or her and I have no intention to do anything to be her close friend unless she wants to be and I wanna make sure we all understand if this does happen. I know how horney she is and that's my mail worry/concern. 

Anyone have any understanding or similar experiences. Or any advise or warnings if you are in this kinda close friendship. I basically feel like this is weird and unnatural because everyone else I know feels negatively or nothing about there exes.",asexuality
Could I be “half”-asexual? (Semisexual?),"Good morning/day/evening/night, wherever you are in the world right now.

I apologise if this question is at all callous or ignorant. It is not my intent to mock, delegitimise, or appropriate asexuality. I am genuinely curious about whether or not what I am about to describe falls into some category of asexuality or is something else entirely.

I have no interest in receiving sex. I have had sexual encounters and relationships; however, I have never been interested in receiving sexual favours—only giving. I do not enjoy reciprocation. It sort of freaks me out when I think about the fact that I have only ever “tolerated” reciprocation in the past. In summary, I enjoy *giving* sexual pleasure but have no interest in (and even somewhat dislike) *receiving* sexual pleasure.

I would love to chat about this sort of thing if anyone could spare the time. If this is the wrong subreddit for this sort of thing I apologise, but I would be grateful if someone could point me in the right direction.",asexuality
How to tell people I’m Asexual,"So I realized I was ace about 2 months ago and it’s been great knowing why I am the way am and not worrying if something is “wrong with me”. 
My biggest question now is how do I tell people? Do I tell people? It seems weird to me to tell people but I would like to because it’s a part of who I am and I’m excited to have figured it out. I don’t think any of my friends/family even know what it means to be asexual so I feel like explaining it will get way to personal about my sex life(or lack thereof). I’m just not sure if I should tell people or if it’s worth all the hassle? Sorry for the rambly post, any incite or stories of how you came out would be great!

TL:DR
How do I tell people I’m asexual? Should I tell people?",asexuality
Salut juste pour savoir vous parler vous francais car il faudrait un en francais,Just so you know ( not the traduction go figure ) but there istnt that much of french people openly Ace ,asexuality
Am I Asexual?,"I think I may be asexual but am not totally sure. I am 18 and have never felt sexually attracted to another person, consciously. But that is the thing, my body reacts as though it is heterosexual, like looking a provocative image of women gives me an erection and I can masturbate to ejaculation. At no point in the process do I feel like I am sexually attracted and I do not ever feel a desire to masturbate. This only happens with women as looking images of men has no effect at all, even after testing my reaction to different body types. Honestly, this has really confused me- its like my body and mind are not in sync.

What does this mean? Am I asexual? Is there a term for this? 

&amp;#x200B;

(will probably delete this eventually because I am quite embarrassed to write this but just wanted some opinion as I can not ask anyone else).",asexuality
I’ve had this ring for about a year and a half but only recently joined this subreddit . Enjoy 😊,,asexuality
My problems with masturbation.,"I'm a teenage asexual with a libido that jumps up every few days. Usually, I masturbate once or twice a week to relieve it, but whenever I masturbate, I feel terrible. I feel disgusted and unnatural, and I physically feel drained of energy. Usually, people tend to talk about feeling relieved or satisfied after masturbation, but for me it's a feeling of helplessness knowing this is something I feel the need to do but hate doing.

If anyone could recommend any resources that I could potentially use, I'd really appreciate it. If it affects anything, I'm a male.",asexuality
I can’t figure myself out,"I’ve always though of myself as asexual, because the idea of having Sex actually scares me when I see a vagina I also feel uncomfortable. Same with penises. I’m male. How ever I love romantic movies and find the character’s chemistry adorable. Anyway I can experience something like that. I wanna sorta have something like that, but not, I don’t really fell attracted to anyone, Aromatic, but I fell as if people like me. Theirs a girl that stares at me in class and stands uncomfortablely close to me, we share similar intersts. Theres another girl who put their head on my shoulder. And theirs a few who have hit on me. Funny because I’ve always been made fun of for my thick nose and long neck. What should I do is all I’m asking.",asexuality
Am i really ace?,"I'm 15, and I don't know if i hit puberty or not. I experience arousal but never sexual attraction, and when attempting to wank, i feel a small amount of arousal hat soon diminishes to nothing. How do I know whether this is prepubescent stuff or asexual stuff?",asexuality
The puppy likes the new ring.,,asexuality
"MY boyfriend came out to me as Ace, so I started doing some research and... maybe I'm somewhere on the spectrum too?","So it's been a wild week. My boyfriend came out to me as asexual just a week ago or so. We've been friends for a long time and a couple for about 4 months, and had never gone past making out. I started thinking, and read a great book on asexuality, and kind of started considering my own sexuality- something I hadn't done in a long time.

I identify as bi- definitely bi-romantic (my stance is basically ""people are cool""). But, even though I've been pretty educated on sexuality, I never personally separated my two orientations or thought about it. But then I started learning...

My reaction when he first told me, and we got to talking about our relationship and the thought of us not having sex, was basically, ""Oh, ok"". I wasn't happy or glad, but I didn't feel negatively, either. It was neutral. And in the book it described some aces/ace variants as feeling ""take it or leave it"" and neutral- which is kind of how I feel?

In the past if we ever got to the point of almost going further sexually, I was always all for it- cool! I like this person! He's attractive, I'd be cool with having sex with him! But then, when inevitably we would stop due to his discomfort, it also didn't bother me at all. I didn't feel disappointed or frustrated (at most my dumb anxiety brain would feel kind of self conscious, but I also knew it was just the anxiety talking). 

I also don't relate to some stuff allosexuals feel- I don't get real celebrity crushes. I think people can be attractive, but the thought of seeing someone and thinking ""I want to have sex with them"" has never crossed my mind? I feel more motherly, like I want to take care of them, or that I appreciate them from an aesthetic perspective. I always thought people who would say stuff like that were just exaggerating for comedic effect- the same for people who would say stuff like ""oh I can't live without sex, I can't go [insert time period here] without it"". I ALWAYS thought it was a huge exaggeration!

I don't think I'm fully asexual. I've felt what I think is sexual attraction for my boyfriend. But demisexual, or greysexual... those are some things that might be right. I don't know, I'm not a big fan of labels (I use bi and like I said its my romantic orientation so I'm ok with it. But I also generally use queer a lot).

I've talked to him about this but I think I just wanted to write it out and put it out somewhere. Here seems like a good place! I don't feel negatively (especially in my current, very healthy relationship), and I'm still not sure exactly what to think. But... it's worth some thought I never really explored before. ",asexuality
Ace social networks,"Hi,

I'm trying to find myself... I recently joined the acebook social network but there doesn't seem to be much local activity. No one seems to have been online locally in months. Are there any other ace social networks?

&amp;#x200B;",asexuality
Finally got an ace ring!!,,asexuality
Confused on what I should be feeling in a relationship,"So I'm almost 100% positive I'm asexual but I've never been totally sure on my romantic orientation so I've just left that open to whatever happens.  I recently started my first year of university and I met a girl who seemed interesting.  We started talking and hanging out a lot (a couple weeks) and as of a few days ago started dating.

&amp;#x200B;

Now I'm kinda concerned as it feels a little bit like the butterflies have worn off a bit and I'm not totally sure how to put my feelings into words here.  I still enjoy hanging out with her but I still don't fully understand what makes a relationship so special or different from a friendship.  This might just be because we're both new to the relationship thing so we haven't really had any physical contact but at the moment it just feels like we slapped the boyfriend and girlfriend labels on each other and we're waiting for things to progress.

&amp;#x200B;

I just feel super guilty since I can't understand why I don't feel as excited or nervous to see her anymore.  Maybe part of it is that I've grown to feel comfortable around her and I've allowed myself to be comfortable acting a little more reserved but I have a fear inside that I'm not as interested as before and I'm doing the wrong thing. 

&amp;#x200B;

I'm not sure how to wrap up this post other than request that people ask questions or give input I'm largely not sure what to write here.   ",asexuality
"I don't like being touched, and i hate being intimate.","I always disliked being touched (hugs, cuddles, hand holding or being petted etc.) I don't know why to be honest. When my friends touch me like this i have no problem with that, but when my parents or significant other does the same thing i hate it.

They keep arguing about it ""oh my god we can't even touch you, or what?""
I get very cringy when someone tries to touch me. And i get disgusted when my girlfriend tries to kiss me. The idea of having sex with her is a nightmare, i really don't enjoy it at all, and at the end i always end up crying.

Why am i like this?",asexuality
Sad moment: I have to leave my ace ring at home for a week because I’m going on a school trip and I don’t want it to get dirty or damaged.,,asexuality
Failled ace relationships be like,,asexuality
I’m an asexual sex writer. AMA.,,asexuality
Questioning stuff,"Right I have been thinking about this a fair bit recently:

I do experience sexual attraction to people very strongly.

I also experience sexual desire very strongly.

I experience romantic feelings to an equally strong amount.

The problem is that I HATE my sexual desires, they just feel so wrong and gross. Like if I could take a pill and just turn off my libido I would do it because it makes me feel horrid.

It's like an itch that I can never quite scratch and after I have done stuff I always feel horrible and gross. I have tried just not doing stuff because I wondered if it was like an addiction but that just made things worse, its like feeling nauseous really badly and it just gets worse and worse until you throw up but then afterwards you feel gross and only slight relief before it comes up again.

This doesn't sound like asexuality but it doesn't feel like what non-asexuals experience either so im just rather confused. ",asexuality
My Ace ring arrived today,,asexuality
Survey?,"I was thinking about making a survey, just to get a general idea of the people here. Would people answer this? If yes, what questions do you want? All sex/sexuality based questions? Or some others, eg garlic bread or cake?

I'm off to bed now but if you're up for this, please feel free to let me know and comment any questions~! 💜",asexuality
Lack of desire for sex causes problems in romantic relationships - how to fix?,"Hey, guys!

I literally just found this subreddit, and I'm so excited to have a place to speak openly about all this stuff. **tl;dr at bottom**

I've had suspicions that I'm asexual for several years, but funny enough, it wasn't until Bojack Horseman introduced Todd as asexual that it really clicked for me. I am so easily able to relate to his struggling relationship with Emily, but she is much more supportive and understanding about it than any of the partners I've had. Aaaand that's the rub. 

I **WANT** to want sex. I never really feel sexual attraction, but I don't mind doing it to please my partner. But because I *don't* want it, it often ends up feeling like more of a chore (dare I say *man maintenance*) than an enjoyable act, and it *always* starts to cause rifts in my relationships. I don't want that to continue. I'm 25, and while I understand that I've still got lots of life left, I've found somebody that I care for and appreciate a lot, and I don't want our demise (if it happens) to be because of my attitude toward sex. 

I recently found an article about asexuality that said ""sex may be negotiated within the relationship when one partner experiences sexual attraction and the other does not."" I'm not sure how to interpret that. Do we set certain dates/appointments to do the deed? I think I'd start dreading them if we took that route. Do we sit down and discuss how we're feeling each time my partner wants to initiate sex? I think that would kill the mood.

How have you guys gone down this path?

**tl;dr** How do you make a relationship between an asexual person and a person who experiences sexual attraction work?


",asexuality
What fictional characters would you consider as asexual or on the gray ace spectrum?,"Just out of curiosity, what fictional characters who aren't canonically asexual would you consider to be asexual or on the gray ace spectrum? And please, this isn't meant to debunk anyone's headcanons of their fave characters, I'm just really curious. Personally, I consider Sherlock Holmes to be somewhere on the gray ace spectrum, and specific to CBS Elementary's version, I see him as aromantic. I'd love to hear what characters you think are ace! ",asexuality
Bojack Horseman S5 being annoying real (RIP all of us),,asexuality
How do I tell the difference between romantic feelings and just being emotionally connected with someone because I’m not sure if I might be aro as well as on the ace spectrum?,,asexuality
Anyone else have a huge drop in emotional well being after orgasm?,"I'm a trans woman and I don't even like masturbating, that was probably my least favorite part of preHRT life. A doctor told me I'd keep experiencing a lot of intense physical pain if I didn't touch myself. It was such a horrifying disgusting experience to have to do that. After a while I was just horny constantly but almost every night I'd clean the pipes as fast I could get it over with to keep my sex drive low, but I also get post orgasm depression and then I'd have nightmares almost every night. I'd rather the depression hit me at night than in the day when I actually had responsibilities and I didn't want my sex drive being high. Now I just ignore that part of me and life is just a lot better for tons of reasons but low sex drive from hormones is one of the best. I know that part of me is there but I get to go about my life without actually having to focus on it and touch it to avoid intense feelings that I didn't want. I don't have to trade one horrible feeing for another. This isn't even why I consider myself ace, I think of myself as ace because I don't like sex. ",asexuality
Heteroromantic? Or just lonely aro?,"So I’ve mentioned this more than once lately in some comments on some posts here and a lot of other people seem to feel the same way and it’s nice to know I’m not alone, but it doesn’t help figure this out. 

I call myself heteroromantic asexual. I am an asexual male that is attracted romantically to females. Or...I might be? I mean, I always thought I was. But now I’m not sure. I know for a fact I’m ace though.

When an allo person likes someone, they get a “crush” on them. They get butterflies in there stomach, they get super awkward around them, they do silly things around people they like. Some allos can’t even talk to a person of their preferred gender without it being an ordeal. I’ve never been like this. I’ve always had a really easy time talking to girls, I’ve never had butterflies or felt awkward around my “crush”. I always accredited this to my “ace immunity”.

But as far as having crushes...have I ever even had one? Most of the time I’m developing a crush on someone, it’s hard for me to tell if I actually like them. I’ll see someone, and it’s more of a logical thinking, rather than an emotional feeling of “I could date that person”. I’ve never understood the idea of having crushes on celebrities. I still don’t know if allos use that term as an exaggeration or literally. 

I’ve never gotten butterflies in my stomach from liking someone; I feel like I’ve never actually liked someone. Like I thought I did but now I think it’s something else. 

Lately I’ve been wondering if maybe I’m not romantically interested in people...maybe I’m just lonely? Maybe I just want human companionship. Actually, I know for a fact I just want human companionship. But I don’t think I’m actually romantic. Or at least...I don’t know if I’m romantic. 

I know I want intimacy. I need emotional intimacy. One thing that makes me question this so much is that I had a high school girlfriend that really helped me through some hard times and a lot of the time when I was dating her (I feel like such a bad person for this) I kept thinking “Would I be any less happy dating someone else?” Like I genuinely wasn’t sure if I liked the girl I was dating or I just liked the relationship I had. 

Romantics and allos of this sub, do you guys get butterflies when you get crushes? Do you guys *get crushes*? ~~Do you ever feel like you could be with someone else as long as you still had that emotional intimacy?~~ ^(That’s a dumb question, ignore that, I’m still gonna leave it there tho)

Side note: I know I’m not gay. Even if I weren’t hetero and just wanted companionship, I know the emotional intimacy I need I can’t get with another guy. Idk why but it’s not for me. ",asexuality
What the the thing bojack horseman ?,,asexuality
"Christian, Muslim (and other religious people where premarital sex is forbidden) aces and aros alike! How do people react to you, if they know you don't want to have sex even if you want to be married? Or if you don't want marriage at all?","Left out Jews because as far as I know, Torah does not outright say that premarital sex is forbidden (but it isn't approved of by many rabbies).

So I was wondering this: you're ace and/or aro and you don't want to have sex. How do your congregations react to you when you say: ""well, if I ever do marry, I won't have sex at all with my wife. It just simply isn't for me.""",asexuality
Just complaining,Realizing that I’m a heteroromantic ace was so relieving at first. I finally understood why I act and think differently than other people. But as time has gone on I’m starting to see it more as a curse than a blessing. I’m 23F and I just want the happy ending where I marry my best friend and we have a dog. But I’m also a Christian and in the circles I run with really the whole point of getting married is so you can finally have sex so I’m thinking the happy ending isn’t for me. I’m just feeling really bummed out rn and needed to get it out there to people who understand. Thanks for reading. Anyone that has miracle relationship stories where allo and ace made it work plz share:),asexuality
For all my other romantic aces out there,,asexuality
"Fellow Asexuals, what is your favorite emoticon?","Mine is this heart 💜! Thank you in advance if you decide to humor me with an answer! I actually want to post here about some of my more serious questions, but I felt like I needed to break the ice with the community first. 😅 I hope that doesn’t sound too silly, I’m just kind of shy.  I also just really love emoticons/emojis because they help me understand people better when messaging. ",asexuality
"I may not want to have sex with you, but if we have chemistry I LOVE knowing that you want to have sex with me.",Is this a thing? Or am I just weird?,asexuality
Can’t tell if I’m ace.,"I find certain people physically attractive and some people just stand out, like I want to be closer with them. But, any time I try to think about having sex with them it just feels really weird and wrong. I could never fantasize about a real person that I know or a celebrity or whatever. I’ll be like damn that girl has nice legs I want to talk to her but being offered sex with her I don’t think I’d say yes. I kind of don’t get the big deal about it. But, here’s the thing. I have really bad social anxiety and am insecure so idk if I just hate myself to the point where I think that thinking about someone that way is somehow morally wrong because I’m creepy and there’s a mental block there because of it. I’ll fantasize about cuddling with a girl but the second I think something sexual it just feels weird and why would I want this. I’m on antidepressants so that decreases my sex drive but doesn’t eliminate it. When I do masturbate I usually get off on how much they want each other and stuff like that. I’ve never actually had someone be into me before. I’d definitely like that. If someone really wanted to have sex with me, went slow, and reassured me I might want to. But idk it still seems weird. And not something I’d want to do regularly. 

The nuance of a first time interests me a little. But once I do that I feel like it would be kind of pointless. Masturbating would be faster. I think I only want it because I can’t have it. The actual act of sex seems so overrated. I’ve fantasized about sex acts being done to me before but always by a disembodied being. An actual person would be too weird. It’s either I know the person so it’s weird or they’re a stranger so it’s weird. I’ve never been turned on just looking at a naked body. I’ve never been close enough to anybody for anything even remotely romantic to happen. So I have no idea how I’d react to someone’s advances. I get uncomfortable whenever someone talks about sex seriously. If I was offered sex with anyone I wanted in the near future I’d say no. I’ve never had someone want me though so I feel like I can’t get the full picture. ",asexuality
"I've been conflicted about my ace-ness for a while, any guidance?","I know you guys get a lot of these so sorry for clogging up the feed, but I'm conflicted. I'm still in school and I have more time to decide so it's not a big issue for me, but I think that I might be ace? Recently I've been saying that I'm a bi grey-ace but idk. Sometimes I'll feel sexual attraction for a second, but I'll just push it off and forget about it. It's never a positive experience, I always feel like I'm trapped by it when it happens, especially nice it's usually random. Like this thing is happening and it's normal I guess, but it's also really annoying and I wish it would go away. This only lasts about a minute at most, but I feel like it's good to take into account.

I'm sure that I think of it differently than other people I know, I have a few friends that'll talk about those sorts of things every once in a while and I'll mention that I think I might be ace and they'll be like, ""oh, well how could we get you back into it again?"" Which I don't oppose to their faces but for me it's like ""I don't really want that though, maybe? I'm not in the mindset of it being an issue and that I need to get back into it and maybe that""s something?"" And that one statistic thats like ""men think about sex every seven seconds"" seems way off. I think about it maybe once every 2 weeks? probably less than that though. Maybe more if you broaden it to in the context of other things like now thinking if I'm ace or not.

I haven't been in a relationship for a while, coming up on 2 years, and I don't really miss being in one, I'm not looking. I guess it would be nice to be in one though, there are a few people that I think are really nice and interesting that I would like to spend more time with, but it's not really sexual. I like hugs and getting close to people, but sitting with my dog and watching a good movie every once in a while with occasional friend hugs is good enough.

I *do myself* sometimes, but it's more of a force of habit than something I look forward to or enjoy. I'm always bored and/or distracted while I'm doing it.

What do you all think? Any guidance? Thanks in advance for taking the time to write something if you do! I really appreciate it!",asexuality
conflicted,"i’ve recently come across the label of “gray ace” and i feel it describes me well
but i still feel like i can’t be ace because i would want to have sex once or twice. 
i feel like i’m not a “true” asexual and that i shouldn’t belong. 
any tips?",asexuality
Question for everyone here,Do you think being ace or aro means being lgbt as well?,asexuality
"Just realized I'm asexual, no idea what side of the spectrum I'm on...","So I'm currently in high school, and Homecoming is coming up. I want to ask this girl, but I didn't want to go into it without knowing if she was gay, bisexual, etc. because I want to know these things before I initiate stuff like that. Anyways, one of my friends knows her friend and ends up asking them about her sexuality. My friend responds, stating that she's asexual and doesn't seek a sexual partner. Now that I realize this, I decided to Google asexuality. Little did I know, I personally fit into this category. I'm aware that there's different levels of asexuality but for me I essentially would like a relationship, but I don't want to have a sexual aspect of it. Intimacy, to an extent; actual act of sex however, I feel is overrated. To me, sex is like Ubisoft's E3 release of the first Watchdogs game: you see the graphics and you see the gameplay and you're like ""ooh, this looks hella nice and this gameplay is fluid"" and then you realize ""wait, this game was overhyped, ***dude, what the...***"" It's kinda like that to me when it comes to sexuality. So now, I'm in a rut- I still want to ask her out, but how do I approach? I mean, it's not like I KNOW where she fits on the spectrum of it all, but at the same time she doesn't know that I know that she's asexual. Any help from the older/experienced out there?",asexuality
Missing my ex everyone at uni is too sex driven,"I've been really struggling this week and really missing my ex as I've just started at uni, the guys I've met here so far seem a lot more sex driven than back home and had one guy trying to force his way into my room whilst drunk. I'm really struggling with finding like minded people that don't centre their lives around one night stands at the moment. I'm really pining over my ex as its scaring me how pushy they all seem here and disrespectful of my boundaries regardless of what I do. I miss the safety of not being hit on by others due to having a boyfriend and the respect of my autonomy from my ex when we were together. I don't want to go out and meet new people anymore idk it's really distressing me",asexuality
Opinions on lingerie?,"So, as a sex repulsed asexual, lingerie doesn’t have much of a functional purpose for me. However, as friends have recommended me to “wear it for myself”, I eventually got around to it and bought some cute panties since they were on sale. I’m really not sure how to feel about it tbh. Part of me feels good, it looks appealing on me, but in a very blatantly sexual way. Do I feel good bc of my confidence in what I dictate as cute, or is it that I can been seen in a sexual sense, something society says is great and empowering. 

Kinda rambly so TLDR; what’s all your opinions on lingerie and is the confidence it brings just because I can finally feel like a can fit into society sexually? ",asexuality
Thought you all would appreciate this,,asexuality
New Bojack Seasons No Spoilers,Ok so I’m only 3 episode in to the new season of Bojack but I’m convicted they have some one here.,asexuality
Some lovely Ace socks!! I love being a part of r/knitting and r/asexuality! Props to the OP for the great knitting work!,,asexuality
Top post in r/relationship_advice involves an allo [OP]/ace couple... where sexual incompatibility isn't the reason for the post. Instead OP's [jealous bitch of a] sister says it's an excuse because OP isn't hot enough.,,asexuality
"Growing frustration for people that use sexuality as manipulation, and relating vs dealing with the root. (What is that root?)","Best friend of 7 years had her "" sexual awakening"" a few years ago and since and through growing through that she cant turn it off to where she makes everything about her. 
It didnt used to be like that. When we were girls sleeping over having fun it never came up but we love each other and knew each other deeply. Not saying we have to eat ice cream in our jammies, but no matter what, when she gets bored of my company, she has to go out on ""the hunt""  (even if its a married neighbor) an ex or a cousin. If shes feeling real bad.. me.  

We sat down. I told her I dont need that, that it confuses me and I dont appreciate it. She said okay and it was a moment. I felt like I did what I had to do and she understood. 

Fast foreward, I invite her to the bar Im at. Im actually having a great time alone but thought she could come through and enjoy the ambience. It was a chill gay bar and lounge. Everybody enjoying each others company and talking/eventually singing like adults.  I just got fired I was buying drinks (lol) it was a good time. As soon as she comes in its all about putting on a show of how cute she is how Im her ""butch queen"" for buying her drinks (which I hated the most) because it wasnt a exchange because of sexuality or some dynamic like that,  it was a friend buying a friend a drink because Im less broke than her. 
Forcing me to kiss her, being problematic in so many ways my barmate called her out in a funny way saying ""Its all about you huh"" and noting how much she pouts and makes everything about herself. 
After this she gets in her feelings and I was glad but its not in my personality to leave someone hanging so I did what I always do and made her feel better with the attention that she wanted. 
She knows shes chaotic, she knows I dont appreciate being used like that yet its like she forgot to relate otherwise. I want to understand why she does this but also I guess assert myself more to where I take that option away from her completely, even if it means losing for a while a long term friendship. If I can understand this better, maybe I can confront her better.
 I am coming at this from a asexual viewpoint. It makes the most sense for why I dont like (increasingly) why its gotta ""be like that"" from all genders, and people cant reach into themselves to not need sexual attention amd validation? (from someone that explicitly doesnt give that) (maybe even not yet) (but people are so impatient, and horny, and cant just deal with their stuff) im order to have a friendship.  

TDLR: (question) why can some people not channel their sexuality in a healthy way to where it doesnt become permanently ingrained in your personality, therefore affecting everyday life causing problems and harm to others and themselves. And making this worldview where you just see through the lens of sexual currency and manipulation. 


",asexuality
I swear the purple is much darker in real life,,asexuality
Board Game Night,"I had an entertaining experience tonight, thought I'd share with you folks.

There's a board game I've enjoyed recently, **Code Names**, which has a fun mechanic: there's 25 cards, each with a word on them. Each team is trying to guess about 1/3 of them, without guessing the other team's words, the non-team words, and the one ""insta-lose"" word. The clue-giver has to give a single-word clue, and says how many words it relates to.

For example, tonight, on a board that included three ""football related"" words, ""touchdown"", ""block"", and ""player"", I needed my partner to guess the last two but not the first one, so I gave him ""tackle for two"". He got the logic correct, along the line of ""If he wanted me to guess touchdown, he'd have just said football, so he told me the one thing that can't have happened on a touchdown -- a tackle.""

Why is this relevant on /r/asexuality?

Because there's also the ""Adults Only"" version, which is full of words that might conceivably be squick to a seriously sex-repulsed ace ....

... but it turns out that the game is so flooded with slang and euphemisms, that there's not really dirty clues you can give to tie words together without inadvertently tying in three other things that are euphemisms for the same things.

In other words, the winning strategy is to give **clean** clues that tie together the dirty words on the board.

I had the pleasure of partnering with a so-naive-its-cute ace girl tonight, and utterly crushing our dirty-minded allosexual friends. I wish I'd taken a photograph of the board to recreate it precisely for you, but we knocked out eight words on just three clues while our friends were struggling.

TW for PG euphemisms, to follow below, for anybody who wishes to play along and see if this might be something they would have enjoyed.

.

.

.

.

The board was something like:

    TONGUE     BALLS    POLICE  KNOCKERS COYOTE
    TOY        BLING    SEX     DILDO    EAT 
    CABOOSE    LATEX    BOTTOM  SINK     CANDLE 
    STILETTOS  TACO     TRUNK   BUSH     WHISKEY 
    HEADLIGHTS NUTS     WASHER  SQUARE   NAIL

To allosexuals, that's pretty much a hodge-podge of dirty concepts, while simultaneously being almost entirely kid-friendly.

Opponents went first. They had nine words to guess; we had eight. Their first clue was: **Dominatrix** for **two**

&gt;!They correctly guessed LATEX and STILETTOS.  !&lt;

First clue: **Gift** for **three**

&gt;!Partner's guesses:  TOY, correct..... BLING, correct ......  she talked about guessing ""washer"", but decided that was a pretty terrible gift, and instead guessed CANDLE, which was incorrect/neutral.  !&lt;

We had six words left, they had seven. Their next clue was: **Toolbelt** for **three**

&gt;!They guessed NAIL and WASHER correctly, then NUTS, which was incorrect/neutral. !&lt;

Second clue: **Automobile** for **two**

&gt;!Partner's guesses: HEADLIGHTS, correct ..... TRUNK, correct ..... and, as she was allowed one more guess, she tried again for my ""Gift"", and this time got WHISKEY, correct.  (This was my best clue, as I avoided ""Car for two"", so she never considered ""Police car"".) !&lt;

We had just three words left, and they had five. Opponent's next clue was: **Acme** for **two**

&gt;!They correctly guessed Wiley E. COYOTE, then the guesser picked up SQUARE from ""Toolbelt"", but she was lost on the second Acme and guessed CABOOSE, which was incorrect/neutral. !&lt;

Third clue: **Cunnilingus** for **three**

&gt;!This was a terrible clue -- fine for an allosexual, but it was a real stretch for my ace partner. She said she'd never heard it spoken and didn't know how to spell it. But, she thought she knew what it meant, and jumped right in with TONGUE, correct. Go, partner!  Then, things got really dicey ... she considered ""sex"", but talked herself out of it. She scared me by talking about ""bottom"", which was the instant-lose ..... but then she got very excited when she recognized the euphemism for TACO, correct, and she quickly finished with EAT, correct.!&lt;

I think this last one actually proves my point. Literally, any two aces would have had an easier time of this clue, because &gt;!the obvious thing tying EAT, TACO, and TONGUE together is any clue about eating. ""Dinner for three"" would have done it!!&lt;  By giving her the dirty/allosexual clue, I made her job oh-so-much harder than it had to be.

&gt;!Opponents, meanwhile, were left with SINK, BALLS, and KNOCKERS, if I recall correctly. ""Sink"" had been the other target of the ""Acme"" clue. BOTTOM was the insta-lose. !&lt;",asexuality
Years of Confusion Over At Last,"23 years old, and I just came to the realization that I'm asexual. Wow, never typed that before. Never *said* that before. It feels so empowering to finally be able to identify with a sexual orientation.

&amp;#x200B;

Looking back, all of the signs were there: no desire to have a boyfriend, no burning need to have intercourse with another person, and ZERO attraction to anyone for either sexual or romantic purposes. I remembering becoming aware of these anomalies during high school, but I didn't have a clue as to what it all meant. I debated internally, telling myself that it was only because no one asked me out or showed any interest in me, and that I would feel what everyone else felt once someone had. When that didn't happen, I began to think that I just hadn't met the right person yet, and that everything would click once I did. I felt damaged somehow. Broken, like I was missing some fundamental part that everyone else had that allowed them to form bonds and function like normal people.

&amp;#x200B;

It was around this time that I did some research and briefly looked into asexuality, but I didn't think it applied to me at all as I had a healthy libido and frequently enjoyed masturbating. I considered that maybe something was off about my emotional state, and, for a while, seriously thought that I must have had a personality disorder that kept me from experiencing certain feelings or emotions even though I really didn't fit the symptoms. It was also during this time that I made my peace with the fact that I would probably never fall in love or get married and lead a mostly solitary lifestyle. 

&amp;#x200B;

Which made it all the more awkward and confusing when years went by and I went to college and guys began to take an interest in me, leading to my first (and hopefully my last) 'screw-up.' Long story short, a very nice guy was sweet on me, I took the opportunity to explore my sexuality, realized that I felt absolutely no romantic or sexual attraction whatsoever, and broke things off with him. Things didn't get very far at all (we hadn't even gone on a date), but I know that he was a little broken up about it and probably felt like I was leading him on (which I was, admittedly, as I attempted to conform to heterosexuality). While I was glad that I cut things off, I felt absolutely terrible about it, and still do, especially as we are in the same major and have had courses together for the past two semesters. Aside from one muttered hello, he hasn't spoken a word to me, and I am constantly reminded of my previous ignorance.

&amp;#x200B;

Inexplicably, I decided to look into my 'condition' again yesterday and found a lot more information on asexuality than I previously had and began to read several articles that explained what asexuality was in great detail and that a healthy libido didn't single someone out from being asexual. As I read, I found myself ticking off a long series of boxes that perfectly described my situation, and I felt relieved that I finally had a name for what I was. That was also when I stumbled across this subreddit and received even more confirmation that I was definitely ace. The community here seems very supportive from what I've seen of it, and I can't wait to start contributing where I can.

&amp;#x200B;

It's such a relief that I can finally put that confusing period of my life behind me. I know myself better now and have gained a heightened sense of self-awareness that I'm sure will help steer me clear of making any similar mistakes in the future. 

&amp;#x200B;

I wish I had known sooner, but I'm glad that I do now. ",asexuality
My Older Sisters are Proud of me.....,My whole life my older siblings have told me how proud and happy of me they are because I’m mature enough to avoid conforming to what other people like and how I don’t pay attention to guys or wear makeup to impress them......I don’t have the heart to tell them it has absolutely nothing to do with maturity. XD,asexuality
Sometimes I just don't get allo people...,"I'm usually quite good at understanding and following allo viewpoints (at least when they're not directed at me) but sometimes something comes along that makes me go 'Really? *That's* what you're focusing on?'

I'm beyond terrified of heights. Recently I conquered those fears a little by going paragliding. There's so many things I could say about the experience. The feeling of achievement, the adrenaline rush, the amazing views, and how scared I was. But what most people want to know is if the instructor was hot.

Really? You're all great people but I just don't get your priorities.",asexuality
"My aro ace tattoo, I designed the bow and found the arrow online",,asexuality
I had a talk with my bf last night,"We hadn't have sex for over 3 weeks and he initiated the talk about having no sex.

He is the only one who approches first, when it comes to sexual situation. I found everything is ok with him as long as we have sex, although it wasn't so often. but according to him, 'it is devistating' because he has a feeling that I don't want any sexual contact with him. And I never had an orgasm since we met, 3 years ago.

Also my ex partners complained about the same issue. They tried hard to encrouge me, but my 'libido' has been always low. I just had sex to please them, most of the time.

Further information for you; I never liked any actors or singers and never fantasized them as I grew up. And I think of myself as a pan sexual. this is for sure, because I love person no matter what they look, or what gender they are. or I can even love aliens lol ...altermately, what genital part they have don't matter

And I remember what I said when I was 5 or so. I said, I will be happy as long as I have 'something' I love in my life. This was my view of romance. That could be music, studies, any hobby, or pets. I never dreamt of getting married or never felt a need for it. This part is still the same.

However, I had a really strong sexual attraction for few times. Precisely only with two men and one woman. I was not in the relationship with them, but I liked kissing them. And whenever I saw them, I instingtly craved them. At the end I had sex with all of them and it was not really what I wanted. It was just the person that I desired... It is still confusing because I liked sex, and snuggling and all. But after all, I left them. I realized that they wanted just sex, not the romantic and emotional bond.

The last time it happend was 5 years ago.

Since then I haven't experience this strong desire toward sex. I'm living with my boyfriend and I love him so much. But he dosn't arouse me.

We almost had sex on the first date, and I chose to go to bed. after that night, I am always been like this with him.

I told him that I will explore hard and try to find my sex fantasy. But honestly, it is very difficult. I just can leave without having sex for the rest of my life as long as we are together. Ironically, different thoughts aoubt sex is causing problem and it drives me nuts.

How do you see me? Am I asexual? what test or experiment should I do to find myself, what am I exactly?",asexuality
Sex ed,"Sitting in sex ed at the moment. (I'm 21, its for an internship)
Even tho I know that being asexual is completely normal.... I cant help, but feel really sad? Like I'm missing out. I don't even know what sexual arousal feels like, yet here I am learning about the diffrent kinds of orgasms and positions. I'm learning a lot. It's interesting? It shouldnt matter, I like myself and my life. Why am I about to cry?",asexuality
P a r t i e s (alcohol and ‘kisser guys’),"Hi, I’m a 19F (aro?)ace at college in the closet. I’m close to the independence day of my country and the next week it gets full of parties and alcohol, also for being in college parties are so much common and with more liberty (alcohol is legal here at 18+) than in school.
Since I avoided them a lot in school now I actually want to experiment more, get drunk and have good time with friends. But there’s always this stupid idea of correlation between parties~drunk~kissing. 
My friends usually go to parties to kiss someone and it’s seem normal that if you’re single to kiss anyone, I not mean in every party but that that usually in parties happen that, specially if you get drunk. I think the idea of not kissing anyone anytime it looks weird, or people don’t think about it or don’t get it. Once I asked to someone to please make sure I’ll not kiss anyone if I get drunk and she asked if I just broke or I was with someone. It’s like the idea of deciding not wanting to kiss someone (anytime) if you’re single it’s weird.
Aaaalso, there’s this major issue about guys taking advantage of drunk girls to kiss them (worst if you actually want to dance too), boundaries and consent it’s not so much taked in account :/ Usually they’re some strangers that go to the parties just to drink and kiss girls.

I don’t have problems with others doing that and it’s whats more understood about parties, but I just don’t want those things to me. I want to get drunk safely and have good time with friends but not ending in uncomfortable situations. I already almost got in a similar situation (but lightly) and handled to avoid it but I don’t want to end in uncomfortable situations like those again.

So, when you go to parties and issues like these could happen what do you do to avoid them? Do you have some ideas to avoiding those kind of problems?
I just wanna have good time with friends and be safe. Remember that I am also in the closet but I am willing to read about your experiences :) Thanks! ",asexuality
I dont know if i am Ace,I only feel romantic attraction and and all but dont feel the need to go furter like sex i guess that make me ace but maybe i just havent met right person yet i dont know,asexuality
Could I be Panromantic?,"So ever since I figured out I was asexual, which was at the start of Pride month this year I've been question my romanitc orientation. Recnetly saw something that said panromantic/sexual was not caring about gender when it comes to relation ships. One thing that is causing me some confusion is as of now I don't want to be in a realtionship and in the past really have wanted to be in one. If I ever where to be in a relationship I wouldn't really care about the gender of who ever it was with. Just want to hear what other people think on this to help me come to a conclusion. ",asexuality
Share your experiences for The Asexual Awareness Project's book!,"[The Asexual Awareness Project (TAAP)](https://asexualawarenessproject.org/) is a new organization that's working on promoting asexual awareness, especially in the Washington DC metro area.  One of their current projects is writing a book on asexuality and aromanticism that is geared towards people who work with asexual and/or aromantic people in a professional setting (such as mental health professionals, doctors, guidance counselors, volunteers/employees at LGBTQ+ centers, etc).  If you'd like more information about the book, [this post from TAAP's tumblr page](https://theasexualawarenessproject.tumblr.com/post/177873421083/book-contributor-interest-survey) goes into a bit more detail.

 

In order to write this book, they are collecting input and experiences from aces and aros.  If you are an ace and/or aro person who would be interested in sharing your experiences for this book, all you need to do is take [this survey](https://docs.google.com/forms/d/e/1FAIpQLSdiwnsg0mCDRD3uSN6Z70tarC7O4RbOK2ZRjrE5nCTmX_i4fA/viewform), and then complete the questionnaires that get sent out afterwards.   If you have the time and feel comfortable sharing some of your experiences, TAAP would greatly appreciate it! :) ",asexuality
My First bit of Ace Pride March,,asexuality
The best feeling,,asexuality
Tips for an allo in a relationship with someone on the spectrum?,"I have been in a relationship with someone who is demi-sexual for a few months. It took some time before we started having sex. He also has fetishes where one of us has to wear something specific in order for him to get hard, but he doesn't stay hard for very long even with it.

Now we have sex every now and then, but he won't come by penatration. He actually cannot come unless he masturbates. He did masturbate twice when I was in the room, knowing I enjoy hearing him, but it doesn't feel good to him at all. He feels like it's a breach of his intimate world. So he's been telling me how much I turn him on and how it made him masturbate (when I am not there).

I have become kinda sex-neutral with him. I think a lot of the pleasure I get from sex is through the high both partners feel from having intense sex, coming and the rush of hormones. Also through foreplay and just spending a lot of time caressing and kissing and just enjoying it together. Because he doesn't feel that way, sex is kind of neutral with him for me and I don't really initiate anything anymore. 

I have told myself it would be ok since we started and that I don't really need it, but in the last days it's kind of sinking in that if I stay with him, I will probably never have passionate sex with anyone ever again, or enjoy just sharing sexual intimacy and take our time having fun with it. 

And as it is sinking in, I realize how much I am kind of silencing that part of me since we've been going out. He's been telling me to be patient and that I was too fast for him in terms of sexuality, but in some way I don't understand (since I haven't initiated sex at all in the past 2 months). I guess he can feel that part of me which is longing for more. 

I also know he has never had orgasms while having sex with past partners. I am understanding more and more that even if things evolve a little bit, he is the way he is, and hoping for him to suddenly start liking brussel sprouts is silly and not nice for him. And it starts to clarify that just having sex to reach orgasm (myself, not him) feels kind of pointless to me (I don't come by penetration alone anyways) and that I long for something more. (I am also a pretty sexual person, usually thinking about various ""versions"" of it every day, and that's been the case since I was probably 6 or 7 years old).

This is leaving me pretty confused. I don't know if I can spend the rest of my life without ever having again these great sexual intimacy moments I know are possible. I mean I really wish I could, especially because we have lots of other things that work. I am trying to go without it. 

But now we are starting to go forward in our relationship and build these entanglements that are so painful to remove (buying a car, moving in together, planning costly trips to meet each other's families) and I feel that small part of me which is miserable inside and is kinda ringing an alarm.

I would like to be given ideas of things people tried to overcome this kind of mismatched sexual preferences. Especially from allo people in relationships with people on the asexuality spectrum. You can talk to me privately too. Thanks!",asexuality
I'm confused about my asexual friend,"My boyfriend (straight and sexual) and I (female, pan and sexual) are friends with this girl who says shes either asexual or aro/ace. She likes to have lots of physical contact with all her friends, as in she likes to give hugs and kisses to everyone shes close with and she says all of her physical contact is just 'friendly'. Some of her friends, including my boyfriend and I and another one of our friends, 'A', find her touch to be a little bit creepy, I'm not too sure how to explain it but it just doesn't sit right with us and gives us a strange vibe. For some backstory, 'B' (male, ace i think?), used to like my asexual friend and they had a thing but were never in a relationship. After my asexual friend turned him down, she continued to keep being physical with him. A few days ago we were all at a party and my asexual friend was touching 'B' almost all the time, hugging him, leaning on him, tickling him, etc etc. 'A' had no idea about their past and when 'B' was out of the room, she questioned my asexual friend about their relationship status and whether they were together or not. My asexual friend then said that they were just friends went on to demonstrate various embraces on 'A' and ask what was the difference between the way she was touching her and the way she was touching 'B', trying to imply that she believed there was no difference and everything was just friendly.

My boyfriend and I got into a heated discussion with her about the differences between a touch between friends and a touch between two people in a relationship, however she absolutely refused to try and understand what the difference was. I brought up 'C', a boy who is a few years younger than us and definitely not as mature as us and how he treats girls. He likes multiple girls at once and it changes every week and he is very very touchy with all the girls on his list. He used to like me and told me out of the blue, we weren't even really friends yet but he started being really touchy with me, hugging me heaps, moving his face really close to mine, leaning his head on my chest, putting his hands really really low on my back, etc. I found it uncomfortable, plus I was having troubles with my ex at that time, and I had no feelings for 'C', so I told him on multiple occasions I didn't like him in the same way he liked me and that I didn't see us getting into a relationship at all. Even after I told him I didn't want to be with him, he continued to touch me in the same way. My asexual friend's response to me when I told her this was, ""Okay, but did you tell him to stop touching you?"". No, I can't remember if I ever told him directly to stop touching me, but I moved away from his touch and avoided his hands a few times and he would always look offended afterwards, and 'C' new I was uncomfortable with his touch because I told his best friend and his best friend told him. But no, I can't remember if I ever told him directly. However, isn't it common sense? I told him I had no interest in him, but he continued to touch me in those ways anyway. Am I being unreasonable? Do I have a right to be offended by my asexual friend's question?

Something that annoyed me was when she was talking about a 'hierarchy' in our friendship group. My boyfriend and I are fortunate enough to be in the same friendship group so we all know each other and we were all friends first. I'm the newest one in the group so everyone's known each other longer than I've known them (including my boyfriend and my asexual friend). My boyfriend's ex and my asexual friend didn't get along well and my asexual friend made a comment back in the day saying that he couldn't ""have his girlfriend and his best friend"" in the same room together. My boyfriend organised a dinner for his birthday and of course he invited his ex because they were together. Personally I think that in some situations it's okay to choose your partner over your friends and in some situations it's not. So I think it's okay to invite your partner to your birthday dinner despite some conflict between your partner and one of your friends. I wouldn't tell my partner not to come to my birthday dinner ((right???)). My asexual friend got upset over this ((it happened almost a year ago)) and it came up when she was talking about a 'hierarchy' in our friendship group at the party a few days ago. My boyfriend stated that I'm his girlfriend, and then my asexual friend said ""Yeah but how's that different from your other friends?"". I'm really confused by her. She doesn't seem to understand the difference between how partners behave and how friends behave. She thinks people are trying to 'push her inside this box' and she's tired of being viewed as 'trying to get into everyone's pants' because she's really physical with all her friends. But she doesn't try to understand why people might think that, because she's way more physical than other people. I don't know if this has anything to do with anything, but she's a pathological liar as well. She really believes she knows things and information when she doesn't. ((She says the reason why the cold weather doesn't bother her is because she was born on a 'very cold winter's day' when she was born in the middle of summer................... and the way she said it was like she really really believed herself....... she has this attitude with every lie she tells)).

A question that's been bugging me. Okay so she's really physically affectionate with me as well as other (female) friends. She hugs me the way my boyfriend hugs me. Wrapping her arms around my sides and standing there for ages, just holding onto me from the side. She also kisses my shoulder, my cheeks and my forehead. My question is, if she really views her physical contact as 'friendly', how come she doesn't kiss my boyfriend the way she kisses me? How come she doesn't kiss 'B' the way she kisses me? Why does she only hug them? She's known the both of them for longer and they are much closer than she and I are. Is it because she knows it would be inappropriate? But that makes no sense because she doesn't (want to) understand what the difference is between a friendly touch and a lovers touch (yes I am aware that kissing on the cheeks or forehead happens between friends and family members as well, but then how come she doesn't kiss my boyfriend or 'B'?). I'm just really confused by her way of thinking, whenever we try to explain anything she just responds with ""I can't think like that, I'm asexual that's not how my brain works."" Okay but surely she can try to understand or at least respect people who aren't the same sexuality as her? Of course as a sexual person, I have sexual urges and as an asexual person she says she doesn't and I understand that and I respect that. I respect that there are asexual people. But it seems like she doesn't respect me or my boyfriend or any other couple who is sexual. She doesn't understand why touches 'have to be viewed a certain way' and why she can't touch people the way she wants to. She doesn't understand why some people are uncomfortable by her touch that she views as friendly but other people don't. My boyfriend had a talk with her and asked her, ""If you saw two people walking down the street holding hands and they go in for a kiss on the lips, would you think they're in a relationship?"" and she said no. 

I could go on for hours and there is definitely more to say about her and her personality and some more context that would help out but this post is plenty long already. Is there a certain way to deal with her attitude? Are there other people with the mindset that she has out there? If there are, how can I understand them?",asexuality
What is romantic attraction?,"I'm still trying to figure things out. But I can't seem to understand what is romantic attraction. 

""Romantic attraction is an emotional response that most people often feel that results in a desire for a romantic relationship with the person that the attraction is felt towards"" (Avenwiki)

What is this desire for romantic relationships? 

Can you site examples? Could be situational. 

Thank you! 

",asexuality
My entertaining conversation with a sexual person who doesn't understand asexuality at all. Thought I'd share.,"[Part 1](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/9f3e35/sexual_people_of_reddit_what_questions_do_you/e5tisup/?context=3)

[Continuation of thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/9f3e35/sexual_people_of_reddit_what_questions_do_you/e5tov7r/)

_________________________________________________________________________________

[More](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/9f3e35/sexual_people_of_reddit_what_questions_do_you/e5tiox0/)

[Continuation of thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/9f3e35/sexual_people_of_reddit_what_questions_do_you/e5tr8q6/)
",asexuality
Im hurt,"I am 21 years old and have had a slew of things with girls but never have I ever wanted sex (Im getting right to it), I've never masturbated (def cant see myself doing that one ever) but I love kissing, cuddling, feeling, and all that stuff and I've been in a relationship with someone who clearly loves sex and she's held out as much as she could but its starting to crumble now and it sucks because I truly cared for her, lately it feels like I want to have sex sometimes but its just the drive is just never there especially not enough to overcome my anxiety about ejaculating, I'm lost and it sucks knowing I'll have to end up alone in my life, as im an asexual who still craves a closer than friends bond with someone and its just lame. ",asexuality
Rejection and Hatred From Non-Ace Identities,"I'll try to keep this short since I tend to ramble and make no sense, but long story short, earlier today I checked out the GSA at my school. I didn't have time to stay for the meeting but I just wanted to say hi to the teacher and ask how often they met. 

Well, within the few minutes I was there, I felt so panicked. My heartrate went up and I got sweaty and started shaking and stuttering and all that great stuff anxiety thinks is helpful. I felt so scared to be in this environment with about 10-15 people from the same community as I am. And I've noticed that even in non-LGBT based environments I get something like that too. There's a group thing I go to with a fellow transguy, many gender nonconforming people, and a few L/G/B people and all allies if they're cishet. I'm not out publicly but I felt so out of place and scared being near these people.

It's not like internalized homophobia or anything since I never even knew the LGBT community existed until I found out I was part of it. I just felt like I was a trespasser and that I didn't belong there. Maybe that's just my anxiety and imposter syndrome, but there has to be others who feel/have felt like this. I felt like they'd find out I wasn't queer enough and that I was trying to participate in something I shouldn't even think about. Like if I said I was aroace they would talk behind my back about how I don't belong there because I don't experience the same thing with the whole attractions and stuff.

Has anyone had experience with LGBT groups/people rejecting them for being ace? I know the community is supposed to be accepting but I see so much on LGBT+ people hating aces and saying they dont belong and need a different community. I've read stories where people tried to be vulnerable and come out as ace or aro or both but then others start hating on them.

Edit: Lol whoops looks like I couldn't keep it short. Sorry I just have no one else to vent to haha..",asexuality
I think I finally figured it out.,I am attracted to women but it will always be in a “romantic” sense. Sex has never been my drive. I want companionship. ,asexuality
An ace spectrum social platform,"Hi all,

I'm doing some market research to gauge interest in a social platform specifically for aces (as in the umbrella term meaning non-allosexuals).

If I may ask for a single minute of your time, please head over to [the survey](https://www.surveymonkey.com/r/6LKFSLL) and fill in the 3 simple multiple choice questions.

I will be crossposting this to a few other subs but feel free to do so yourself where appropriate in case I miss any. You're welcome to share this outside of Reddit as well.

That's it, thanks folks!",asexuality
My new shirt,,asexuality
"Tomorrow is my 17th birthday, and it kinda feels...too soon","Hello everyone, I'm new to this but I just sort of want to speak my mind for once, while hoping to get a second opinion. This is more of a rant than anything, but I'll try to keep it short. I will apologize in advance that this is not exclusively about a*sexuality*.

 I'm new to the ace community, and although I never really considered it to be my thing, some posts I have seen here and on instagram resonate with me. I'm aroace (most likely? It's hard to prove an absence of a feeling I never had), and a massive tomboy. For the longest period of time, I just thought I ""wasn't boy crazy"", ""a late bloomer"", and that I ""saw the person, and not their face"". I had a reasonable calm time for the last few years, with little to no problems with my parents or my grades. And I had an anti-mainstream attitude toward typically ""girl""-things, including love, all things pink and frilly, as well as the (physical -and fake?) closeness with other girls I barely knew or didn't like. I wanted a *rougher* friendship, and an honest attitude with others. When I finally got that, I was already 15 and started to sense that there was  something more than my sophisticated, superior self, honest to everyone that set me apart. I complained about the massive abundance of love songs in popular media, and about the (to me at least) pointless, unlikely and unsubstantiated plots in novels and movies. ""But imagine you found the love of your life?"" I could never sympathize with characters risking everything for a person they just met. And I could never understand why they absolutely *had to* sleep with one person or another, endangering their own and other relationships. 

But in the end, I thought I was *too young*. A boy confessed to me when I was thirteen, and I didn't dislike him so I just went along. But hanging out with him never felt like more than friends. Things that are supposed to be romantic just felt awkward, and we went separate ways after a while. I thought that at some point, I would understand, fall in love like everyone is supposed to. I did some ""research"" in novels and the like, and the protagonists are almost always sixteen. It was the magical age of revelation, where everything falls into place. And while I never was romance-centered, it feels *wrong* for it to be over, while nothing happened at all. 


To this day, I have no clarity. I am still ""immune to fanservice"", I don't understand attraction beyond friendship, and it feels like people are dancing to music I can't hear. But I still doubt. I doubt when I see someone I thought I knew do something unexpected, something special, I doubt when I see someone particularly attractive (although I have never been able to tell who's **hot**), and I despair when I feel alone at night, wondering if I will always be a *second option*. I have found hope in this community, and I apologize in advance if this doesn't fit here after all. But I can't be sure if this is another wave I ride, another idea I convince myself of, never able to objectively tell my feelings. There likely won't be massive changes if I decide to out myself; but it's still hard for me to accept all of the consequences.

Tl/dr: I'm really unsure of myself; I think I'm aroace, but I feel alienated and just disappointed. It feels like I'm missing out on ""the human experience"". But I have reached a point at which I can no longer ignore all of this.",asexuality
"I posted this on /r/asexual, but I thought I'd ask here too: Recently, I've been questioning my sexuality a lot, and I'm wondering if anyone here can help me figure some stuff out","I'm sincerely sorry if anything in here comes off as insensitive, I'm just ignorant about all this. Living in a homophobic state didn't allow for much learning about different sexualities.

About me, I'm a 16 year old (trans) girl.

I already am confident that I'm aromantic. I've known that for a few months now, and my experiences and feelings have seemed to align pretty well with that.

I thought for a long time that I was bisexual, but recently, after figuring out I was trans, that sent my confidence in my sexuality spiraling.

After thinking about it for a few weeks, I think I'm asexual. I think. I don't think I experience sexual attraction, but I'm not sure. Maybe I do and it's just not strong or it's infrequent, so I fail to recognize it. Maybe I am capable of it but just haven't yet. How do you know? Am I too young to know?

I feel weird because I still desire sex. I just don't really desire it with one specific person. Is this normal for asexual people? My experience is limited and from what I've seen, it isn't. Like I said though, my experience is very limited, so I have no idea.

I've also heard most asexual people find pornography gross and don't really masturbate. I don't find it gross and I masturbate regularly. I get off just as well without it though, which is not the same as what I've heard from some other teenagers on a certain subreddit I'm active on. (Sorry if this section was a little TMI)

Again, I'm truly sorry if any of this seems insensitive. 

I also wonder if my feelings are just being blocked because of my mental state and sittuation irl, which is, to say the least, stressful.

I guess, how do you know? 

Also, do you think I'm asexual? I saw the pinned post on /r/asexual describing different types of asexuality. If you think I am, what type do you think I am?

And I know no one can really answer this except for me, I just feel so lost and I'd love some advice.

Thanks everyone",asexuality
I kinda like how I’m asexual,"I love that I’m asexual because it lets me see people 100% for who they are.  I have no sex drive so I’m not driven by appearances at all, which is a blessing.  Also, I have grown to accept the fact that I won’t get married probably, I want to explore and be individual my whole life.  Thanks, you guys have helped me a ton.",asexuality
It's been stuck in my head and I wanna explain myself so I can at least shed some light in this maze of feeling.,"I think I might be ace and here's why. For the longest time I've been a sexual person as in I'd vet aroused often. After getting into a real relation ship with a best friend (I know, bad idea) for 5 months and ending it this May I had a couple things in my head as conclusions and questions.


I don't like relationships. It's honestly a chore for me and to be honest I think I got into it because the feeling of being wanted. Other then that I'd rather of stayed friends with her.


I wish I was never aroused or get that ""build up"" of sexual arousal. The only thing I like about masturbating is when I'm done and the feeling of wanting to do or see something sexual is gone. That is when I'm most happy because that's when I am most myself and i see everyone under the same light. I wish I had that feeling all the time.


Sex means nothing but to release that build up. If someone came up to me and ask if I wanted to have sex I'd say no. I've never had sex before but I did get head and honestly I'd rather do something else.


Am I ace? 
",asexuality
Is there a word for this,"I get crushes fairly frequently, but I'm disinterested in most aspects of a relationship so that if I were to date it wouldnt look like a typical relationship and I dont always pursue romantic interests. I dont think its aromanticism because I still have that attraction but idk if it could be anything else. (I already know I'm ace)",asexuality
Give me some hope here,"Ok, 31F, pretty sure I am Gray Ace. I am new to the sub and new to the identity. I am pretty sure it is accurate though - everyone else's stories sound just like me and I have been feeling like I am broken since high school when I had to pick a crush basically because he was decently cute and nice enough. I had the same ""crush"" for years just to have an answer when other girls asked.

So, good news: I now know I am not broken and that I am not alone!

But I still want all the typical things. I want a husband. I want a family (really want kids but am not keen on trying to raise them alone).

But I am not really attracted to men. I think I was legitimately attracted to only one or two of all my past partners. I am not sex repulsed and can enjoy it, but my last partner kept complaining that I wasn't initiating enough. He had low self esteem so he didn't understand that my disinterest wasn't a judgement and that I was just as happy not most of the time. 

So, my dilemma: do I hunt for a man who makes me get butterflies in the belly, get weak knees, blush, and do whatever else you are supposed to do when you are attracted to someone? I mean. I am Gray. It's not impossible.

Or do I find a man I can love romantically and live with and just accept that I am not gonna get that attraction? Is it unfair to the men to do this???

 This is a big worry for me. Is it unfair for me to be with a man who I don't find attractive? Shouldn't he get that validation from his partner? I mean, I like to know that I am attractive. My ego likes it, so shouldn't he get the same boost?

In other words, can you give this Gray Ace some hope that it can work out, that I can find a life partner? 

",asexuality
Moments in hindsight that were obviously Ace?,"I know this is a common post around here, but it's been a while so I figured why not? I'll start with some

* In my freshman year of college, a few months before I realized I was Ace, a drunken game of never-have-I-ever led to my friends wondering why I had never had sex. The best answer I could come up with was, ""I don't know.. I've been too busy? I mean, I had schoolwork, and the debate competitions take a lot of prep time so it never really crossed my mind?"" 

* An interesting difference I've noticed between my story and the usual one is that I never thought I was broken. I was raised in a household that taught me not to think about sex, so I assumed I just had amazing self-control. Additionally, rather than assuming I was broken, I thought it was some combination of late-blooming and high standards. I was genuinely worried that I was secretly an asshole until I realized I was Ace haha

* My puberty-fueled sex dreams had everything except sex. There would be the initiation + foreplay, then my mind would do the camera pan and fade until the cuddling afterwards.

What are your stories?",asexuality
Questions for all the non-sex-repulsed people,"Hello

I recently realised that I am sex repulsed. Before that I kept thinking that everyone is disgusted by sex but they just do it because the pleasure they receive outweighs the disgust they feel. That is not true right?  


Do you also find genitalia ugly and gross? (or is it just my repulsion)

Do allos want to put it in their mouth or do they just do it for their partners?

Does the process involved in sex make any logical sense to you?

I know many people like porn but I just cant understand how everyone is not a little bit disgusted by watching someone else go through their personal business. In my brain it is equivalent to watching someone take a shit. I just want to look away and give them their privacy even if they willingly want to do it in front of me,",asexuality
Not able to feel your feelings?,"Hello fellow asexuals,

I have been thinking about my asexuality for a while now, and I’m wondering if anyone else has this sense that I do. It’s hard to explain, but I think I have the biological response to feelings, but I don’t feel the feelings. For instance, if you’re watching a sad movie and something really sad happens, I’ll start crying a little, but I don’t feel sad... or I’ll see someone who’s objectively attractive and my body starts to get aroused, but I don’t feel the attraction or the arousal. 

I’ve considered myself asexual for a while now because I’ve never really desired sex. However, now I’m wondering if it’s actually that I have feelings and sexual desires, but my body notices it and I don’t. 

I don’t know if that makes sense or if I’m weird in this way. But let me know if any of you feel similarly.


",asexuality
Wondering whether I'm ace and the definitions/language around asexuality?,"Hi there! Very recently I had my second sexual encounter and I found it thrilling, up until the point of actual PIV sex. In all of my relationships in the past, I haven't had condoms and never felt ""ready"" so I've stayed away from sex, but I'm beginning to wonder if my self-control was also due to some degree of disinterest. I've identified as male/heterosexual so far, but I haven't enjoyed or really initiated on either of the accounts I've had PIV sex. It was like I had to focus, with all my mind, on being pleasured (and the only pleasure there felt... artificial?). Is this evidence of an ace/gray-ace experience? 

To be clear, I enjoy and am turned on by everything before and after PIV sex. I find women attractive, and I definitely want to have kids of my own in the future. It seems to me that in trying to define asexuality and where I might stand in it, I have to define ""sex"" and what part(s) of it I don't enjoy/don't want to participate in. And that's kinda difficult, because sex is defined so loosely or not at all for many people. Is sex defined by how I want to define it? In this case, can I identify as asexual (in that I'm strictly opposed/indifferent to PIV sex only) as long as I'm comfortable with it?

sorry for the potentially TMI post and information dump, but I'm not really interested in being in limbo as far as my sexuality. I'd like to know where I (should) stand, and anything you all can do to help would be fantastic! &lt;3

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",asexuality
On today’s episode of I Don’t Understand Allos,,asexuality
Flirting - STOP,"Flirting is annoying. Implying the want for something is no way to live.

“I want to ask this girl on a date but not invest to much emotionally into it, I’ll ask her like I don’t want the date and am not interested, instead of saving some time and just asking if she want to go out with me.”

“Oh what would a guy like me have to do to get a girl like you?” - first of all, ask her on a date. You want to ask her on a DATE, but here you are beating around the bush and the bush is really small, it mystifies me how badly you are missing. Just hit the bush and go on with your life. 

“You look familiar, do I know you from somewhere?” The answer is no, no you don’t. I have never seen you or said a word to you. Your Instagram profile says you are in a different city, there is no way I know you from anywhere especially since I’m in college and I like to stay at home.

Flirting is a dying art. Art in the sense of smash mouth being anything other than the band that played for Shrek, flirting being Dubstep. Dubstep is when you give your child a midi keyboard and he smashes all the bases together with a shit sample to make a “song” that’s the equivalent of egg salad sandwich in the sun, it’s good for a little while and then it just turns to hot garbage.

Currently I’m 18, if you’ve read my other posts you know this (hipster aesthetic, with the face of a one night stand, it attracts middle age woman and gay men) have to deal with instagram girls (and guys, which is even worse) striking up conversations with me, because “I’m too shy to start one and they wanna take the initiative.” - no you are mistaken my lady, I’m not interested (and if you took three seconds to look at my profile you would see I’m in a relationship). But this can’t stop them, they have to deliver their killer pick up lines. Girls think guys are bad at these, but it’s a two way streets ladies. And news flash, both sides are equally trash.

Recently a girl sent me a message saying “do I know you from somewhere” and again the answer is no. From my past experience I’ve learned that anytime ANYONE says “do I know you from somewhere” it usually leads to the question of a date. Now the question was how long would she take? 

Three days. It took three days of her beating around the bush to finally say “you are cute, let’s go on a date.” But to also add a little cushion she added “but I still think I know you from somewhere”. An attempt at salvaging the conversation to renew my subscription of interest which had long been canceled, unfortunately I can’t be removed from this mailing list. - and if you call me cute I still dunno how to take that. Cute implies I’m small. I’m thin but tall, not small. 

If this is how flirting is supposed to go, you have to stop. It’s inefficient. You can lead with your interest line instead of trying to make up some garbage, and please look at people’s profiles before messaging them, like I get it if it’s private, but I run a public business account you can see my posts with out following.

And flirting to get me in bed with you is also shit. Listen chief, not interested. (Also won’t work when I’m drunk or high so don’t invite me out for drinks, cuz I’m 18 and sex is nasty miss me with that shit). 

Honestly I don’t know if other people are as annoyed with flirting as I am. It’s not smooth and it’s not romantic. It’s sloppy and misses the point, grays are really annoying to deal with so just give it to me straight chief, save us both some time. ",asexuality
Just really confused?,"I've considered myself to be asexual for a little while now, but sometimes I get a little confused. I have no sex drive, but I know that if I loved someone enough, I'd probably be wanting to have sex with them all the time. But I don't want casual sex. Ever. In fact, I haven't had sex at all since last March, with my first ever boyfriend who I was in love with. But since then, things have just changed in my way of thinking I guess? I don't know. Sex doesn't seem appealing to me in the slightest generally. It's just...eh. I don't personally know anyone else who's asexual, so I don't know if what I'm feeling is 'normal' for asexuals or not. Am I just overthinking this?",asexuality
What does it mean to be asexual? (Please be nice),"Is it having no sex drive or a lessened sex drive? 
Can the drive be directed towards self? 
If the drive is directed towards strangers, but never wants to be acted on,  is that a kind of asexuality? 

I’m curious about this and have been for a while but have been too afraid to ask. I know I’m not bisexual or homosexual, but I also don’t have a super strong drive toward the opposite sex either. ",asexuality
Is it dishonest to have sex when I don't want to?,"I get in bed pretty much whenever I feel I'm expected to because I don't want one more reason for people to leave. Am I lying to pretend to be into the sex? I make faces and noises and pretend I like it. I'm such a basket case with a very unconventional life in many ways being ace on top of it all makes me feel unlovable. I'm gray ace, I sometimes for brief periods of time enjoy the sensation but it's brief and not worth it. When the ""right spot"" is being hit I feel a building up of sensation that for like half a minute is pretty enjoyable but then it builds to levels where I don't know how to deal with it. the feeling is way too intense. I don't find sex sexy at all but I can fake it seemingly convincingly, I've never had anyone complain or ask if I like sex. Withholding the information feels like it crosses lie territory when I decide to go along with sex. I'm willing to have sex sometimes, i just think it'd ruin it for them if I say I don't like it",asexuality
don't want a relationship or sex but crave human touch,"I don't want a relationship or sex but I crave human touch. I yearn for a hug, a looooong hug. How do I get over this? 

&amp;#x200B;

I'm curious about relationships but I don't really want one. I've been thinking for a while, though, to maybe go on tinder or something to try it out but I'd feel bad for the other person. I don't want to play with their feelings, I wouldn't want them to think that it'll last because at the end of the day I like being alone. It's just that lately I've been feeling lonely more and more. Should I try it out and see if I can find someone that would be okay with no sex/kissing just hugs? I'm also quite anxious and depressed so I wouldn't know how to approach someone. I also don't really have the time for a relationship, or friends. I just want a hugbuddy. 

&amp;#x200B;

How do I get over that craving for human touch? And should I try to get a relationship even though I'm not in love with anyone and probably never will? Isn't that just hurting someone else's feelings? ",asexuality
"I drew this wallpaper a while ago, but I just found this sub. I like to think it's kinda cute. Feel free to use it!",,asexuality
I feel so confused...,"I'm asexual while my partner is sexual. Although I have no attraction to anyone/little to no sexual desire, I would still have sex if it makes the person i'm with happy. Right now I don't know what I should do, my partner wanted sex in the beginning and slowly it dwindled. Although i'm happy that I no longer have to perform sex for them, at the same time i'm kind of feeling down. I don't know if it's insecurity, but I feel like by not having sex with me, his interest in me might be dwindling. I don't know what to do, any advice?",asexuality
A rocket launch leaves ace pride!,,asexuality
Ace hair,,asexuality
Great; I was due for an existential crisis. Anyone want to join me?,"I’m at that age where everyone is starting families and having kids, and I’m just now getting my shit together. Not just that but I’ve always never wanted to push out kids from my vagene. 

Even as a child I never dreamed I would have my own kids. I always said I would adopt beautiful children. Other kids wanted to actually have them. I never did. Never crossed my mind. 

Now I’m at this point where other people are talking about their biological clocks ticking and it’s creeping me the fuck out y’all. I don’t know what this demon clock feels like but I do not have one. Reading about other people having that urge to have kids just makes my skin crawl. 

I’m just feeling sad because when everything tells you you’re supposed to be settling down, you feel wrong. 

I just wanted to ramble. I’m tired of seeing pregnant women and families everywhere. I don’t even know why I posted this. Just need some kind words or advice or anything. 

By the way, hi and how’s your day?",asexuality
The Asexual welcoming committee,,asexuality
"So I have a question. If I experience Sensual Attraction over Sexual Attraction, does that put me somewhere on the ace spectrum? (The picture is irrelevant I just needed an image)",,asexuality
I feel like I just can't accept myself.,"So, I know that I posted here not too long ago, but I think I should post this. I’ve been thinking that my doubt my just be something I bring on myself, and I’m just refusing to accept myself. I mean the doubt I have now isn’t the same as when I first had it, now I just sort of have it, but I’m not in distress or anything. I just kinda feel it there, but now I’m not sure if that’s there because I’m putting it there. I want to comfortable with my sexuality, but when I try to work things out I don’t trust myself and get obsessive. I think that’s because I feel anxious labeling myself something that I’m not 100% sure about, even though I know that I may not feel that way ever again. The most that I can try doing is not caring, but I don’t want to do that forever. I want to get out of being able to hide from the asexuality, but I don’t know if I’m the one holding myself back, or what will break me free. I mean I’ve talked to people, done research, and I recently counted 32 people that said I’m ace (after reading my self summary, which is below), yet after that and 9 months I don’t have the confidence and pride that I want. I don’t know what to do, i just kinda feel numb...

As usual, I'll provide a little c﻿ontext as to my experiences, if it's any help. When it comes to relationships, my two crushes (the only ones I've ever had) were purely romantic, and all I desired was the emotional aspect. Sex really isn't an aspect I want in a relationship, and in my vision of a perfect relationship sex is absent. I ﻿can recall thinking why people would ruin a perfectly good relationship with sex, though I can understand why people do it now. When it comes to other things though, I do have a libido, and masturbate, though I know that it doesn't really matter all that much. I usually only do it because I'm bored. If I ever use visuals I don't concentrate on who's doing what, but rather what's being done. It's more of the act than anything else. If I have any sort of fantasy, it's not about any specific person, but an anonymous figure, though I can but a person in there, it just doesn't really add anything. If it's someone I know pe﻿rsonally, or a stranger where there's no sexual aspect to whatever image I'm looking at, it feels weird to me. If it﻿﻿'s a stranger that has some sort of sexual thing happening then I can substitute them there but nothing really changes. There's also this weird feeling. I can get this feeling out of nowhere, where my heart rate increases and I can sometimes get this weird tingling ""down there"" (though it's definitely not anywhere close to﻿ full arousal, if it's arousal at all). This can occur from physical proximity or looking at someone (often with people I guess I'd find aesthetically attractive, though I don't actively﻿ think of them as such). My thoughts don't really line up with it, and I'm usually just thinking about the fact that I'm feeling something. It's a little jarring, I guess. It also goes away very quickly. If it makes any difference though, I am 15 and thus hormones may pay a part.

When I was younger, I used to get that same﻿ feeling, albeit stronger, when looking at people, but at it's strongest I'm pretty sure there was a clear trigger. Anyway, I'm pretty sure the trigger was bra straps for me (oof this is kinda embarrassing), and that's when it would be at it's strongest. I would just get this urge to just kinda stare. If I'm being honest I'm not sure what I was thinking, though it was probably just on the bra straps. On top of that, I was also masturbating at this age, and I remember it feeling better when I was in a room with a lot of people I didn't know around my age, but I don't remember wanting to talk with any of them or wanting sex with them or anything, just that it would feel better than usual when I ""did the thing"" afterward. Though, I haven't felt a feeling that strong in a long time, and the thing with bra straps is completely gone. And I was pretty much smack dab in the middle of puberty there so hormones may have been a larger influence.

Sorry if the summary is getting a little repetitive. I just need to get this out. I mean right now I don’t really feel bad or anything. I’m just confused as to how I’m feeling, like it seems like I should be feelings bad but I’m not...",asexuality
I don't know what's going on?,"TW: Sexual Abuse, Rape

Okay, so 20F here. I've been having issues with my SO recently because I haven't been wanting to have sex or do anything sexual, I'm never in the mood, it rarely crosses my mind, etc. My SO on the other hand is almost constantly thinking about it and getting so frustrated that I'm not. Its been the subject of nearly every fight for the last month, and it doesn't help that I'm away for school so we only get to see each other over the weekends. The thing is, I used to be really sexual and wanted to have sex all the time, especially at the start of college. The other thing is, I was a victim of some serious sexual abuse when I was very young and I haven't been able to start really dealing with the fact that it happened until now. 

So, I don't know if maybe I've just been depressed/stressed out from starting to cope with that trauma or school or anything like that. I love my SO, I do think they are attractive, I do enjoy it when we do have sex, and feel bad that I don't want to have sex. Could I be ace? I honestly could just be overthinking it but I have been considering that this might be a possibility for some time now. I also just generally hate putting labels on these things because if it comes up later that I've regained the ability of sexual attraction, then what will that even mean?",asexuality
I often see people who can't tell the difference so here is a guide,,asexuality
You know I had to buy it,,asexuality
I think this belongs here,,asexuality
"[ UPDATE ] Boyfriend of four years wants to marry me, I need help"," original post here  
[https://www.reddit.com/r/asexuality/comments/9cmj8l/boyfriend\_of\_four\_years\_wants\_to\_marry\_me\_i\_need/](https://www.reddit.com/r/asexuality/comments/9cmj8l/boyfriend_of_four_years_wants_to_marry_me_i_need/)

&amp;#x200B;

I just wanna start off by saying, wow. I never expected the post to get so much attention and so much amazing advice, I am so eternally grateful. Your words and advice kept me going through the week when I felt like I was going to fall apart. I wanted to reply to everyone but I've been busy with college and I didn't want to respond to just a few. Everyone that commented offered such amazing wisdom that I couldn't have gotten anywhere else and it made me feel amazing being taken seriously. I love you all so much for helping me out.

Now that that's been said, I made the hardest decision of my life yesterday: I broke up with my bf. I drove some odd hours to see him, met at a park, and said what I needed to say. There were lots of tears and heartache. He came around and said that he had accepted me for who I was and would give up all of those things that he wanted in order to stay with me, which made things really really hard. Still, I knew it would be best for both of us to split. I know how much he wants from a marriage, and he was going to be unhappy by giving up everything. I knew things would get worse in the future if we weren't both happy and agreeing on those big decisions about intimacy and children. I made it clear that this was probably the end for good too, and that he shouldn't hang out to the possibility that we could get back together. I've been grieving and hurting and crying, probably not as much as him though since I had seen this coming for a few weeks.

We probably need some space, and that's okay. Even if it never happens, we agreed to still be friends, and I'm happy with that. Sometimes it's really hard to tell if I made the right decision though. It didn't help that my mom called me and I told her about the breakup, then she cried and talked about how amazing my bf was like he had just died and how she loved him like a son. And also that I need to ""get fixed"" and see help (about ten thousand times), even if it makes me miserable because ""no pain, no gain!"" Anyways sorry, that's a-whole-nother issue that I've been working on.  
Thank you all again for reading my story and helping, please never stop being amazing and wonderful people.",asexuality
"$5 Footlong, Ace Style",,asexuality
ace_irl,,asexuality
Yeah sex is cool but,Have you tried anything else?,asexuality
I assigned the different aces in a deck of cards to the different kinds of asexuals I see on this subreddit. Let me know if I'm missing anything or if anything should be changed!,"I had a lot of fun making this, but I wanted to make sure everyone was included! Which ace are you? Let me know if you don't relate to any of these.

◇**Ace of Diamonds**◇: Has no desire for sex at all and gets no form of arousal. Alternatively, they can feel aroused, but never want to act on the feeling. These aces could include those without libidos.

♡**Ace of Hearts**♡: Can feel aroused and are comfortable with having sex. However, they don't seek sex out and could easily live without it. These aces could include grey aces.

♧**Ace of Clubs**♧: Can feel aroused, but they are repulsed by the thought of engaging in sex. They could enjoy watching pornography, but would never wish to experience what they watch. These aces could include grey aces and demisexuals.

♤**Ace of Spades**♤: Only prefers to engage in sex with people they are comfortable with. Even then, they may not want to seek it out. They may also be comfortable with pornoraphy. These aces could include demisexuals.

Edit: I'm thinking about making a strawpoll or a survey depending on how well we refine this list. It would be cool to see what kinds of aces browse this sub!

Edit 2: Made some adjustments to the Ace of Diamonds and Ace of Clubs!",asexuality
My kinda place,,asexuality
I want to identify as heterosexual,"After a lot of reading, I realized I technically I fall under the definition asexual but I still want to be heterosexual. 

I date men and I have no problems except when it comes to sex. lol. 

I feel guilty for not being turned on by my bf's body when he is so attracted to mine. 

I think I'm going to identify as heterosexual everywhere, except in the bedroom, because I can't. 

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",asexuality
Why do so many ace people read boyxboy and girlxgirl stories?,"Idk, it's just a trend I've noticed in my own group and some online spaces. For me personally, I just find the emotions expressed in these stories to be much more genuine because the character(s) often have to come to terms with their sexualities first.",asexuality
"""This is a bad meme"" -me, while making this meme","&amp;#x200B;

https://i.redd.it/x4o04suhx4l11.jpg",asexuality
Finally,,asexuality
Not as black as I'd like but it's still my little black ring,,asexuality
"Not sure where I lie on the aro spectrum – if I'm aro or if I'm a romantic person just with a low ""romantic drive""","My confusion is getting bigger and bigger. While it's been easier figuring out my asexuality (though not completely easy), it's very hard to figure out where I lie on the romantic spectrum. As you all know, it's hard to identify a feeling which you lack. With asexuality on general, it's easy since sex and sexual attraction is omnipresent. Sex is everywhere and I could identify a feeling which I lacked much more easily than with romance.

I only have little relationship experience, just one which ended shortly after it began (I'd say two weeks max) and it was in my teens so I don't remember much of it. I had exactly two crushes in my 28 years of life. One recent and one not so recent but both were similar in terms of what I felt. My only point of reference here is other people and their experience but I had what I would call ""butterflies in stomach"" but not as intense as it seems for other people. I definitely didn't imagine spending the rest of my life with that other person or that I would think about them the whole day. I would be in a relationship but still would be single and would be able to do my own stuff. My idea of a date would be (and still is!) just hanging out, talking&amp;becoming very good and intimate friends, sightseeing different cities, doing what we like such as cooking or making music. Definitely not some candlelit dinners or watching the sunset together. Not even holding hands. I also imagined the physical/sensual side of the relationship. In my mind, we'd hug and cuddle. And when it comes to kissing? Only lips to lips or lips to cheeks as other forms of kissing seem unnecessary and/or gross to me (especially french kissing).

This would indicate that I incline towards some form of romantic attraction, right? Anyways, I have never felt the overwhelming need to actually go out and find a romantic partner. I'm already doing most of the ""relationship stuff"" with my friends. I cuddle with my friends. I hug them. And sometimes even kiss them. I go out on ""dates"" with my friends. I wanna know their dreams and deepest secrets. And I'm quite happy being alone too.

Maybe, the need/urge to find a romantic is buried somewhere in me but the ""romantic drive"" (analogically to libido/sex drive) is so low that I can actually ignore the romantic attraction altogether. Or maybe I'm some kind of aro (maybe grey aro?). I don't know. Any help would be appreciated.",asexuality
Made an explanation for the different types of attraction,"So I made this but I don't know how accurate it is. Also my original plan was to make all the characters as androgynous as I can without realizing until I finsihed around half of it that I could have just drawn white blobs (like TheOdd1sOut and many more) but it was too late so now we have this. There also might be some anatomy mistakes but let's just ignore that...

&amp;#x200B;

[https://imgur.com/y2gVTqF](https://imgur.com/y2gVTqF)

&amp;#x200B;",asexuality
Where is everyone from?,"It's hard to find ace friends. Who knows maybe some of us live near eachother. I live in tulsa, Oklahoma USA. Where does everybody reside? ",asexuality
Asexual?,"Something has cause me to conduct some introspection and has cause me to question the fact that maybe I'm not what I say I am. I've said in the past that I was heterosexual,  but looking back I have realized some things. Every person that I've any sort of desire to get to know better has been more... caring(for lack of better phrasing) that what I would consider average towards me, and it's never really been about sexual attraction, but rather compassion. For the past two days, I have questioned myself, asking if I am who I tell myself I am, and have come to the conclusion that I may not be. Asking myself that if I am not who I am, then who am I? Maybe I am who I say, maybe not, but this has me kind of confused and it's weighing on me. Never really considered otherwise. ",asexuality
Wondering if I'm ace,"Hello been a lurker for a bit. In a relationship, I (29f) and he (26) have been living together since last year about October. When we first got together we banged a lot. Was excited to please a new partner. Thought it would chill out after like 3 months it turns out he wants to bang like twice a day or more on the reg. I avoid it as much as possible, limiting to once a day for 5 mins or less. Feel stressed if we ever bang twice. I'd rather not, and have always been down to not. Don't feel super wet often. Maybe like once every 10 times.  Dunno if I am just less sex drive or asexual? Any aces been with super sexually active partners and able to deal somehow?",asexuality
Me too. Got mine today,,asexuality
Asexuals and Healthcare Access,"Hi folks.

Over the last few weeks, I've been searching the internet for information (research, surveys,  forum posts) regarding barriers to healthcare access for asexuals, or simply the uncomfortable comments or assumptions made by healthcare providers about asexuality.  Bizarrely, I've found almost nothing. The reason I find this bizarre is that...I receive negative reactions to my asexuality from every single healthcare provider I  disclose it to. Many but not all could also be experienced as homophobia/heteronormativity or misogyny. I'm wondering if others ever encounter the same?

&amp;#x200B;

Some of my examples would be:   


\-a psychologist not understanding what I meant by ""asexual,"" and from his comments interpreting it either as ""intersex"" or ""non-binary/agender"" as he talked about ""having OTHER clients who feel they're neither male nor female.""  


\-a GP being disbelieving that I had not been sexually abused, because I stated I was disinterested in sex and that PAP smears are painful and difficult for me.  


\-an ultrasound tech telling me to stop being stubborn about submitting to an internal ultrasound because ""it's the same size as a penis, any woman could have one.""

&amp;#x200B;

\-a psychiatrist stating that my lack of a sex drive was likely due to depression. When I informed him that I have never been interested in sex, his written report claimed that I must have had chronic depression since childhood. Not a specific event, but I do generally avoid mentioning asexuality to healthcare professionals for this reason.

&amp;#x200B;

\-doctors/nurses being disbelieving that there is no possibility that I am pregnant.

&amp;#x200B;

\-no psychologists, counselors, or doctors while I was questioning my  sexuality while in a manipulative relationship mentioning asexuality (or anything other than heterosexuality) as a possible reason why I  felt uncomfortable being sexual with my then-boyfriend.  


\-general disbelief and judgement that I'm not on birth control.  


In general, how do you discuss your asexuality with healthcare providers? Do they believe or understand you? What kind of reactions do you receive?",asexuality
"Aces from Brazil, A new asexual collective was founded!","Hello from brazil,

A new asexual collective was founded on mid august, it's called coletivo AbrAce, and it's on the following social media:

* Twitter : [@ColetivoAbrAce](https://twitter.com/ColetivoAbrAce)
* Facebook: [coletivoabrace](https://www.facebook.com/coletivoabrace/)
* website: coming soon.

",asexuality
Realizing your gay until late age,"Hi, I realized that im ace at around 17 years old but didn’t realize I’m gay until 20.  

A lot of stories I hear is that people realized that they’re gay/bi/pan at a supper young age. And I was wondering if late realization an asexual thing. ",asexuality
A meme for m’you,,asexuality
This right here is why I love Bojack Horseman/Todd.,"&amp;#x200B;

[ They wrote the character and figured out over time he was ace AND they have consultants who make sure they do right by the community! I'm not crying over 2 tweets, not at all. I love the attracted to snacks bit so much too! ](https://i.redd.it/9kvn5v1m1uk11.png)",asexuality
Adulthood,"I have yet to come out to my family as Asexual. I would have, if it would change anything or improve my current situation, however given my circumstances there is no benefit or loss to coming out so I’m in a conflict. 

I’ve grown up in one of the most sex positive houses in the world. Every conversation devolves to some aspect of the joys of sex. Sometimes I understand it but most of the time it seems like a waste of time. “You get to have children, you will love them with all your heart” my mother tells me, I don’t want kids, I enjoy sleep. I enjoy only having to think about myself, and most of all, I enjoy having everything organized. Children would ruin everything. I know I know, children are the future adults, but so far I’m fucking up as an adult. I’m 18, I have a nicotine addiction and draw hentai for a living. I’m asexual so that’s a big contradiction, but I like money. I’ll draw whatever you want for the right price.

My parents know about my sexual history, at least shimmers of a shitty six months. Throwing out the “V-card” and replacing it with the “Permanent-Regret card” (I lost my virginity to a tinder girl, she was too good at talking and I wanted to try this, safe to say it was like playing no man sky, as wide as an ocean and as deep as a puddle.) The whole experience was not worth the money, I didn’t pay her. I had to drive out there to see her. It was an hour drive both ways. That’s like $5 in gas. 

They encourage sexuality, it’s strange for me. My father being very forward with his advice. My car, a Toyota Corolla 2007 was bought simply because “the seats fold down” (more room for activities). Didn’t ever fold the seats down. I did, however manage to fit a bike in my car! That was the most enjoyment I had felt in ages. The satisfaction of fitting a big thing in a small thing. I guess that is the feeling of sex for most people. I also had my first kiss in my Corolla, pretty shit. She smelled like ash and she didn’t even smoke. Her lips felt like a latex glove covered in saliva. She tried going in for the tongue and I was beyond grossed out. This all happened in the parking lot of HomeDepot I wanted to go home but she just wanted to make out, establish some common interests, before you try to seduce me please.

I’ve come to accept my asexuality as it is me. There will be no magic solution to make me a “fuck boi” not even sure how I would get my work done if I was having sex. I stay up all day currently working and writing, I forget to eat! How could I deal with wanting sex and actually enjoying it?!

If I came out as Ace to my parents I wouldn’t gain anything. The idea of sexuality is a weird concept for my parents, I have used the excuse of me having sex so I could stay out late and talk with people. Honestly they wouldn’t believe me. And I can’t blame them, they have been so positive towards it I should be like sex squared since they love it, but instead I’m neutral, I have yet to enjoy a sexual encounter and as far as I’m concerned I can live without them knowing I’m asexual.

In conclusion being asexual has made my life a lot easier than I though. I never have to think about accidentally creating life, I never have to buy condoms, and I never will have to worry about “being a good role model”. ",asexuality
Are there Ace gatherings/meetings?,I'm new to considering myself to be asexual and I've yet to tell anyone yet. I would like to meet with others who are going through this but don't know where to find them.,asexuality
It went from uncomfortable to relatable real quick,,asexuality
Ace related?!?!?!,,asexuality
I thought up a new way to describe some ace feelings to allo people,"""Have you ever thought when your parents made you? It's like that feeling of nope, but with everyone.""",asexuality
If I made a groupme for ace people would anyone be interested,,asexuality
Having a Dilemma,"I don't know where to post this, but I somewhat trust this sub and I think some of you will understand where I'm coming from.

First, here's some context. I'm a grade 10 high schooler and I'm classmates with some hypermasculine guys, I'll call them Brett and Brock. Now, I also happen to be in the same elective class as them, and I get stuck with those two for a lot of groupworks. Just my luck.

One day, during lunch period, I'm looking for this girl from my elective so I could eat with her, but I couldn't find her, so I settle for the table with Brett, Brock, their hype friends, and a few girls. I really only went their because I was friends with one of the girls. They're talking about random things and at some point, Brock  leaves the table. I don't notice cuz I'm eating my food, and then Brett goes, ""Hey QuicheThief, Brock has a crush on you. Blah blah blah.""

Yikes. Yikes yikes yikes. I felt like that was a dick move on Brett's part, and he was always a huge dick, as I have noticed from afar. It made me really uncomfortable because at that moment, I felt only indifference towards Brock, and he doesn't know who I am, really. (Jic you guys want to know, a friend promised to eat with me during that lunch period. She's great)

The a week after that, Brock seems to think we're on friendly terms. He removed the honorable when he refers to me (the honorable was never necessary, but it was weird for him to remove it). He asks for high-fives without context. I don't know, he just tries to initiate friend things.

Here's my dilemma. At some point, he tried to hold my shoulder, and I internally panicked, so I brushed it off, and he said, ""Wow, QuicheThief. Wow."" ;-;. I know other people touch me, but I'm not as touch positive as I used to be, and I really hated that. He didn't get it. He hit me with a heavy plushie; you could do that to a friend, but please not to me. At some point during class, a classmate told me, ""Brock said you guys are meant to be."" My goodness, please stop.

He didn't cross any lines, so I have nothing to go against him, but I don't want it to reach that point. I might be overthinking it, and Brett says a lot of things I should take with 60 pounds of salt, but I really don't appreciate how those two interact with me, and I especially don't appreciate Brock thinking we're closer than acquaintances. I know I have trouble making my thoughts known, but I don't want to speak to *Brock*, let alone let him know I hate his ""advances"". I need some advice.

Tl;dr I think someone is making advances on me and I need advice on avoiding it",asexuality
Have an Ace Bill Cipher Card I made...,,asexuality
"Human Rights Campaign makes a post for National Coming Out Day for coming out as lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer, or...as an ally. They mention coming out as an ally instead of as asexual.",,asexuality
The Grand Question,"I’m pretty certain I’m Ace. But why not get the verdict from the court.

I am 18 and a dude. Girls are cool, so are Guys. I however find girls more appealing. 

Relationships are fun, but only with girls. Guys are kinda boring. You get em going and soon there talking about sex, then I’m lost and I feel like I’m trying to agree with references from a show I’ve never seen. I mean my ex’s have all kinda been that way, but I get bored and sleep or something

Porn is pretty funny. Would compare it to Seinfeld on levels of comedy. They have a good ol time making it. Not my cup of tea.

Sex is cool, I guess. Rubbing the nasties, what a sport. I don’t much care for sports. “We can chase the ball and then when they score the game is finished”. I’ve had sex, what a time. You put in the time and then it’s like being on a rollercoaster, but you dropped your shoe, the guy next to you is having a good old time, but here you are some shmuck who dropped his shoe and it was a good shoe, probably $40. You bought them at Target. They were comfy, and now you gotta walk around and find it. Your foots going to be dirty. Not fun not fun at all. Better ask if someone saw your shoe. Hope it didn’t hurt a kid when it fell of your shoe. Fuck what if it did, man that would suck. He probably is thinking what a fucking ass hole. Oh and by the way the rollercoaster finished it’s run a while ago. And you could have done something better with your time, like literally sleeping. (I say as I write at 12:32 am). 

When someone asks me to tell them my fantasy (sexual) I see a static screen. “You know the one where she’s in the kinda sitting position, but on the bed and I’m doing the other thing?...” - I say, “that’s just cuddling”... Shit. I failed the test. 

I guess I’m attractive to people. I look like a hipster torn out of an H&amp;M’s. “You have a nice body, and a really nice face”. There is little to no meaning in this statement to me. There must be data to support her claim. Logically if we to examine the whole population in the United States, I would guesstimate based on my experiences in my area, that 25% of the population is fit. Looking at my bmi, I am underweight, therefore I must be in the top 25%? Ergo I must be attractive since I fall in the upper bracket of the population. “Thank you” I reply. “You look good to me, but I know nothing about you so I’m not going to attempt hitting on you”. 

It’s a miracle I managed to get into a relationship with someone. She’s also ace. Her though process is very different from my own, but we have amazing conversations and that’s probably my favorite thing.

Oh, forgot to mention. I do get horny, but it’s not at anything in particular. About once in a blue moon, I have a “mind fog” set in where I feel like everything looks amazing, I want to touch and hold and kiss and do everything, but with who, how would I do it? Where would I do it? I usually end up boxing and doing weight training until I’m tired. Getting swole is better than sex. (I’ve had sex a few times, and the gains from weights are better) - and I’m a slut for peanut butter protein shakes.

And apparently I came out as ace when I was high. One of my fiends told me that I should try sex high and she says I went on a monologue about fish and bionicles. Talking about how bionicles and fish were way better then sex. Not sure of all the specifics because me and my S/O were blasted but it was a fun night. I got sleepy and just was having a good time.

In conclusion. I’ve run the numbers and I think I’m Asexual, where in the spectrum? Not sure.",asexuality
Is it worth being more open/community based?,"So basically, I’m about to go back to university and considering whether it would be worth me joining an LGBT+ group or a group for asexuals or something like that, and if anyone has experiences of this sort of thing as an asexual.

Pro’s I’ve thought of:
- Potentially more friends / meeting likeminded people
- A sense of belonging
- Free biscuits
- Apparently some of you have a plan for world domination, so I want to get on your good side

Con’s:
- Unsure how well asexuals are received in LGBT+ groups (I’ve heard stories of both acceptance and rejection)
- Activities might cost money
- Would reduce time for napping and cat related activities

Any more pros or cons you could put forward, as well as personal experiences with being more open about your asexuality would be appreciated to help me make a decision.

Also love the content you all post on this sub, as well as other LGBT subs! Much strictly non physical love to you all!",asexuality
Kissing,"So my friend just kissed me. I’m a bit of a pushover, and told him I had romantic feelings for him, even though though those feelings were pretty weak. He kissed me today, and it was awful. He kissed just fine, but I found it gross. Afterwards, he asked if I was sure about my feelings, and I told him yeah. Is there anything I can tell him, since I still want a relationship, just maybe down the line a bit, once we’ve been friends for longer? I don’t want to hurt his feelings :/",asexuality
Found at my local goodwill! Gotta love some ace pride :-),,asexuality
"Yes, I know Lemmy was far from asexual in his life. But I needed some amusement at work, damn it!",,asexuality
ace_irl,,asexuality
"I feel like I don’t need relationships, but still long for something?","Bear with me please, it’s hard to explain perfectly. 

Being graysexual, I feel like a whole. I never needed another half or someone to complete or compliment me. I am so at peace with my being, I don’t need anyone else for codependency. It actually stresses me out to think I would have to be responsible after a relationship, because it would hinder my freedom, in a way. 

I can imagine my perfect life, as in the long term goal, where I am living in a beautiful cabin with animals, books, and nature. It is what I have imagined for years that I will do, after I complete my goals. But as I imagine it, I can’t help but feel something is missing. Don’t get me wrong, I can totally be alone forever and be okay with it, but it just feels off. 

What the confusing part is, is the fact that I am physically and mentally incapable of wanting someone for relationship purposes. I don’t care about sex, or typical romantic things, and I would hate to feel like I owe someone that. But I *want* to want something, while simultaneously distancing myself from it. 

I’ve struggled with this because I can get obsessed with ideas or people (not in the normal sense) and when I do, I try to convince myself I’ll suppress my asexual feelings down and do what the other person wants. Or the other way around, where I imagine being all alone, and suppress this strange feeling of ‘missing’ something. 

Any advice or insight at all on this would be greatly appreciated. I don’t want lose true myself, but I also don’t understand what to do or feel. 

Thank you guys so much for hearing me out. ",asexuality
My friend who introduced me to asexuality (the title not the life) got me an ace flag!,"I don’t have pictures yet because she hasn’t given it to me, but she told me she has it for me! I’m so blessed with her. Thanks Jasmine!",asexuality
Just realized why I like my schools floor so much,,asexuality
At least he didn’t try to convince me otherwise.,,asexuality
"Tab Kimpton's Minority Monsters comic book is on Kickstarter! Features an ace succubus, plus many other LGBTQI+ creatures",,asexuality
Made a longboard.,,asexuality
Some Asexuals Have Sex,"I was teling a friend about my relationship with my 'Sweetie', the trans/non-binary woman I'm dating. I'm open about the fact that I have sex with my Sweetie, and my friend said, ""Why do you have sex if you don't have sexual attraction to anyone?"" And the answer was simple, ""I enjoy the intimacy. I enjoy being touched and receiving affection. It strengthens our bond, and I really love her. Plus it feels good."" I thought my friend was gonna freak out, but she took it pretty well and said, ""I support you."" YAY! How do y'all think about asexuals who have sex???",asexuality
Coming out,"For the last couple of days, I have been reading everything I’ve been able to find on asexuality and all it’s forms, and spending a lot of time on this subreddit especially. I don’t know if this post is going to have much of a point besides me telling my story, but I feel like I really need to type this out. And who knows, maybe it can help someone find themselves the way all your stories helped me.

First off, I heard about asexuality for the first time a few years ago, and I thought I knew what it meant and thus didn’t think it was me. (Emphasizing that I really didn’t know much, and the little I knew was mostly wrong.) Not knowing there were different types of attraction (and not realising that the body’s normal biological responses aren’t sexual attraction) it was easy to mix other feelings with being sexually attracted.

I always thought there was something different about me, though. In sex ed at school, my interest was purely scientific, not understanding why others made such a big deal about it. It was basically like any other biology lesson, right? Or when talking about crushes, I just picked someone I wouldn’t mind hanging out with platonically, not realising others meant they actually wanted to bone theirs. I also distinctly remember a sleepover where someone asked ”if you found out right now you have twenty-four hours to live, what would you do?” everyone else mentioned losing their virginity was the first thing that came to mind, whereas I just thought it would be nice to travel somewhere new and beautiful and pet some dogs.

Going into my twenties, I thought going to bars and having more of a social life would change things. That I’d meet someone I’d wanna sleep with. No one ever piqued my interest though, and I started to think that I was shallow and picky and hated myself for that. Around this time I also realised I liked looking at both pretty men *and* pretty women and thought I was bisexual, just not very good at it.

Then, a few nights ago, I started to read more about asexuality, about different kind of attractions, and how allosexuals experience the world. I actually teared up, realizing that there was nothing wrong with me, there were other people exactly like me! I read stories and thought ”that’s me, word by word.” When I identified as bisexual, I felt a little bit better, but not *quite* right. Saying ”I’m asexual” feels right like nothing else before has, although my bi identity (…*bidentity*) is still very important to me. Just in a biromantic sense.

It actually has been somewhat world shattering, in terms of realising that apparently most of the world experiences things *so* differently.

Maybe the biggest reasons for not realising my asexuality sooner were not knowing the correct terminology, and that I’ve always been aesthetically very attracted to beautiful people and confusing that with sexual attraction. Looking back, there were *so many* obvious signs. I’m planning on coming out to my friends after some processing, and I’m thinking of asking if they ever wondered, because honestly I’d find it hilarious they figured it out before me :P

Anyway. All of you are beautiful and valid and *sorry* for such a long post, you are a true superhero if you read even some of this. Apologies for any and all typos, it is between the hours of late night and early morning and english is not my native language. (Oh, and I’m a 22-year-old female if anyone was wondering.)

Love you.

&amp;#x200B;

edit// forgot to add, if any of you ever want to talk about anything, feel free to message me anytime!",asexuality
"If anything, what would you say is the nicest thing about being asexual?",,asexuality
"My room was missing something, I think this ties it all together nicely! Feels good to finally hang a flag up.",,asexuality
Platonic friendship cuddling?,"Bad title, I'm aware, but here's the deal:

So I've been very openly asexual my four years at college, and all of my friends know it well. This semester I've gotten really close with my friend, and we've been hanging out like almost every day, getting high or getting drunk and all around having good times. 

Recently, I've been dealing with some severe depression and anxiety, and they've been really open to being apart of my support system. last weekend after a night out of drinking and smoking we crashed in my bed together. I've honestly never felt so like, cared for before like that, and I've been thinking lately that I'd really just love to have someone to sleep next to some nights without ever having the relationship being sexual.

I've NEVER been a touchy person, and I've certainly never cuddled with anyone, but just sharing a bed with them made me so happy and comfortable and I kinda just never wanted that feeling to end.  to even say that  I want to cuddle would be like SUCH a hit to my esteem because i kinda just want them to hold me in bed and cuddle seems so like romantic and gross. I'm so ace it hurts me sometimes.

My friend is straight, and actually that night we confronted a guy they hooked up with who left them very suddenly with no responses or reason. either way, i know they aren't ace nor are probably interested in being in a same sex thing with me?

TLDR:

Sorry, I'm not good at like explaining the situation, but either way, I want to come out to them and tell them how much i liked sharing a bed with them even just once in a while because i feel so alone all the time. Basically I just want to cuddle and sleep together without it ever being sexual. Does anyone have any like advice, like if you've been in a vaguely similar situation? They're like my best friend, and I don't want to make our friendship weird by saying anything.

&amp;#x200B;",asexuality
unsure of sexual and romantic orientation recently,"I just started my freshman year at a college and I've been hanging out with this one girl a lot and it's caused me to question what I want out of a relationship and if I'm asexual.  I enjoy hanging out with her and it's just comfy doing stuff together.  I've described this in past but my ideal relationship involves just being with someone who is willing to do stuff together and just be a good and dependable companion.

&amp;#x200B;

Now back to my original question.  Despite enjoying hanging out I don't feel any extreme draw or nervousness around her like I did more when we first met.  I'd guess I'm just comfortable around her but hard to say.  I'm pretty confident I'm still pretty asexual I haven't unconsciously thought about sex and while it has occurred to me I don't really have a negative or positive reaction I'm far more interested in doing stuff together and just being close.   Maybe sexual attraction is super unconscious but I don't think it is based off my interaction with my gay and straight friends.

&amp;#x200B;

I was grabbing dinner with some friends a few days ago and people were going around the table listing off their celebrity crushes and their ""types"" and I really felt like I couldn't contribute.  I've never been in that situation before but I understand how people who have described it before feel.  

&amp;#x200B;

I'm a little concerned about my lack of ""romantic"" feeling toward this girl though.  It feel like I had a brief phase of excitement around her but now I'm comfortable and would be open to more romantic actions but also not super driven to pursue them.  Am I aromantic or am I experiencing what's normal.",asexuality
Alone Together,I feel like 'Alone Together' on Hulu really represents what kind if relationship I want in life,asexuality
"Unless they're aromantic, how is anyone okay with being single?","I know this sounds pathetic but I don't understand how anyone is ever ""okay"" with being single 

I guess I feel like this because I have a huge need/desire for romance.

I'm in a constant state of loneliness but I often hide it. I know I have my friends and my family, I love them but it's not the same even though I've never really had a romantic relationship I know I want one.

I have to confess that I've had online ""romantic relationships"" to try to relieve my loneliness but it's not the same, well, of course, they wouldn't be the same, nothing is happening in real life. 

I've been trying to be ""okay"" with not having romance but I don't understand how anyone is okay with it as it means no cuddles or affection.",asexuality
"I dont know if im ace, or just supress my feelings for people","I moved around a lot as a kid, as in so far as I can remember I went to five different primary schools. When I was 11 I was sent to a boarding school in the UK. As such I know I have abandonment problems and none of this will have helped my autism. But the worst aspect is definitely boarding school. Boarding is the most hypersexualised homoerotic environment you can create (worse than a prison as its less strict on rules). I remember doing things like group watching porn and walking in on two guys racing to see who could ejaculate first, and I was abused (sexually) by the other kids in my dorm twice (won't go into detail). looking back it was the single worst environment for a growing ace. As a result of this or nether cry in front of other people, I instinctively see all others as expendable in any plot I need to run and I don't get strong emotions. As such I'm having difficulty deciding if I'm ace or just can't feel any sexual attraction that's there. The only 'crush' I can think of is a girl who everyone else thought was flirting with me (tbf they were my closest friend), but I never felt the great drive everyone else seemed to get over this sort of thing, in the end, we never went out but keep in touch to this day. So my question is how do I know if I'm ace or just suppress the emotion?

P.S 18M",asexuality
Still having vague doubts about sexuality,"So﻿, ﻿I﻿ haven't posted here in a while because I've been trying to not t﻿hink about asexuality at all, though something happened yesterday that prompted me to make this. For a while now I didn't think about asexuality, and as long as I didn't think, I didn't care. It wasn't a permanen﻿t solution, but it would work for the time being. Yesterday, however, I started feeling myself losing my grip on it and slipping back towards the obsessive doubt hole. I don't even know why. I don't feel in distress or sad about this or anything, but I still feel somewhat unsure﻿ and that I should say this. I kinda feel numb to it all. I mean, I want to comfortable and confident in my sexuality, but whenever I try to get there I obsess and don't really trust myself, so it's difficult. The most I can do is just not caring, but that doesn't leave me satisfied. I mean if people ask I just say that I'm ace but I feel I don't really know. I mean I recently counted 32 people that have said that I'm asexual (after reading my self-summary, which I'll put below) and I've talked to a lot of people about it but I don't know if I'm getting anyw﻿here, even after almost 9 months. Sometimes it feels like I am but I'm holding myself back, I don't know how to describe it. I just feel almost as if it's false doubt. Ugh, I'm just not sure what to do.﻿
 ﻿﻿

As usual, I'll provide a little c﻿ontext as to my experiences, if it's any help. When it comes to relationships, my two crushes (the only ones I've ever had) were purely romantic, and all I desired was the emotional aspect. Sex really isn't an aspect I want in a relationship, and in my vision of a perfect relationship sex is absent. I ﻿can recall thinking why people would ruin a perfectly good relationship with sex, though I can understand why people do it now. When it comes to other things though, I do have a libido, and masturbate, though I know that it doesn't really matter all that much. I usually only do it because I'm bored. If I ever use visuals I don't concentrate on who's doing what, but rather what's being done. It's more of the act than anything else. If I have any sort of fantasy, it's not about any specific person, but an anonymous figure, though I can but a person in there, it just doesn't really add anything. If it's someone I know pe﻿rsonally, or a stranger where there's no sexual aspect to whatever image I'm looking at, it feels weird to me. If it﻿﻿'s a stranger that has some sort of sexual thing happening then I can substitute them there but nothing really changes. There's also this weird feeling. I can get this feeling out of nowhere, where my heart rate increases and I can sometimes get this weird tingling ""down there"" (though it's definitely not anywhere close to﻿ full arousal, if it's arousal at all). This can occur from physical proximity or looking at someone (often with people I guess I'd find aesthetically attractive, though I don't actively﻿ think of them as such). My thoughts don't really line up with it, and I'm usually just thinking about the fact that I'm feeling something. It's a little jarring, I guess. It also goes away very quickly. If it makes any difference though, I am 15 and thus hormones may pay a part.

When I was younger, I used to get that same﻿ feeling, albeit stronger, when looking at people, but at it's strongest I'm pretty sure there was a clear trigger. Anyway, I'm pretty sure the trigger was bra straps for me (oof this is kinda embarrassing), and that's when it would be at it's strongest. I would just get this urge to just kinda stare. If I'm being honest I'm not sure what I was thinking, though it was probably just on the bra straps. On top of that, I was also masturbating at this age, and I remember it feeling better when I was in a room with a lot of people I didn't know around my age, but I don't remember wanting to talk with any of them or wanting sex with them or anything, just that it would feel better than usual when I ""did the thing"" afterward. Though, I haven't felt a feeling that strong in a long time, and the thing with bra straps is completely gone. And I was pretty much smack dab in the middle of puberty there so hormones may have been a larger influence.
 ﻿

I just don't really know how or what I'm feeling anymore...
Sorry, if an apology is ﻿needed.﻿﻿﻿",asexuality
"My ace life, in a nutshell:",,asexuality
Romantic Interactions for Asexuals,"This is just something I’ve been thinking about, but as an asexual, what is your ideal version of romance? When do you know you have a crush on someone romantically? 

I know that asexuals don’t view these things in all the same ways, but I’ve been dwelling on it a lot lately.

I’ve been trying to sort out my feelings about romance and whether or not the feelings I feel are actually romantic or I just want to get closer to them as a friend. I’ve also been talking with some friends about romcoms, and I voiced the idea, “What would a romcom be like with an ace main character?” They immediately responded that nothing would happen. I don’t think that would be the case, but at the same time, I don’t know how it would look either. 

What do you guys think? What is your ideal version of romance if you are looking for that?",asexuality
I'm repulsed by sex but still want sex?,"I get extremely repulsed by certain things, moreso than others I know, partially because of some ADHD related tics, but in conflicting ways that confuse me.

For example, I hate saliva. Smacking lips, licking fingers, chewing with your mouth open, strings of spit sticking to where your lips just were... It all makes me feel like dry-heaving. Imagining kissing someone and trading saliva and the *tongues* makes me want to dry-heave. But, I also think kisses are very sweet at the right time and place, and want to experience that someday without feeling sick.

It's worse for sex. I get immediately attracted to certain people, or certain people might build up attraction in me over time, but either way, I've definitely been horny before. I've had the occasional wet dream like anyone else and I want to have a good experience with that someday. But, reading/seeing a sex scene, or even references to nudity/butts/oral sex or anything related makes me physically nauseated. I can't stand thinking about bad smells or sweating. I hate touching my own feet, for Pete's sake. I've been told it's ridiculously picky and I know it is, but I don't know how to not be incredibly repulsed.

So I'm left wanting it and also despising it. I have wondered how to deal with this for years and I just don't know where to go from here. Does anyone have any advice or anything? Is it a mindset thing or a mental thing or physical or what? I don't want to get into the thick of it and then ruin the mood by puking on my SO when I was just starting to enjoy it...",asexuality
Is asexuality a primary or a secondary attribute? (x-post /r/AsexualMen),,asexuality
"Ace men who have had sex with a women, how do you feel about the experience? Do you consider it something worth having even without experiencing sexual attraction?",,asexuality
How I Knew I Was Asexual,"So throughout my life, I've always questioned my sexuality but never knew what I fit into. I've always been romanticly attracted to girls but, never really wanted a girlfriend because I saw it as a waste of time and still kind of believe that now in my 11th year of high school. People at my school, like almost all teenagers, talk about sex and having sex all the time. And I've never been afraid to talk about it with people, hear their experiences, and make lude jokes as well (""That's what she said"" jokes are the best kind of jokes hands down). But whenever I would think about having sex myself, it always felt wrong and uncomfortable (I once described it to a friend of mine as, ""It feels like thinking about what it would be like to lick the bottom of a shoe""). So naturally, I came to question my sexuality, I wondered, "" Am I Gay, Bi, etc."" These questions would occupy my mind but never more so than when I would hear people say things such as, ""Big boobs or big butts?"" (I would just say a random answer) or ""She/he is so hot!"" I never really knew what they meant until I asked my friend. They said, ""It means you are attracted to a person in a way you want to have sex with them."" But that still didn't make sense to me, I suppose it was like describing a color to a color-blind person, you don't get it unless you get it. Then, I read an article about a woman who is asexual and it all clicked. I never felt so comfortable in my sexuality, some people just don't like sex, or even want to have sex for that matter. It's possible to still want to be with someone and not need sex. And so much more. Frankly, being asexual is liberating. I get to fall in love with people, not because of how sexually attractive they are, but rather fall in love with who they are as a person. And isn't that what matters most. ",asexuality
Will I ever find love?,"Hey, whoever is reading this. I’m quite new to the whole Reddit thing but a friend of mine told me that this is a good place to find answers to my maybe asexual maybe just weird things.

So I’m a 18 years old girl and over the course of the last year I’ve been informing myself about the aro/ace spectrum. A couple of years ago I had a boyfriend and we tried having sex but afterwards I just felt pretty yuck and tried to avoid it at all costs. My best friend told me it was mosst likely because the sex was just shi*ty 
So i decided to try it again with someone I with loads of experience who I just had a one night stand with-it was so bad! But not because of him, more because I couldn’t stop thinking about how I should have done my mathshomework or if I should buy a new lampshade. I was bored to death.  Anyways I’m finally able to admit to myself that it’s ok if I don’t want to have sex, I haven’t masturbated like ever or felt the need for it. The only reason I would even consider having sex would be to get pregnant.  So now my questions: do you think that I could be asexual? I mean I never felt sexual attraction but on the other hand I don’t even know what that feels like so how would i know if I haven’t felt it? I just feel like I’m faking it for some weird reason. 
And are any of you in relationships as ace or with people that are ace? I’m jut really scared that I’m never going to find someone who is going to stay with me because of it. What I’ve heard and read sex seems to be a pretty important part of the relationship for most people...  sorry for the incredible long post...",asexuality
Just allo things,"I recently read an article about a heterosexual man’s dilemma about whether bringing a condom on a first date makes him look bad by eagerly wanting sex or not bringing a condom makes him look unprepared and thus irresponsible. I am not judging or criticizing, but I was just surprised to find the degree that some allos overthink stuff and even found it quite hilarious tbh. What I would do myself and they can too if they want and are that afraid is just do not bring one and say that they planned to wait. Just my two cents.",asexuality
Is there a reason r/asexuality doesn't have a (pinned?) FAQ type page?,"Thinking of something similar to what r/whatisthisthing or r/bodyweighfitness have.  Some general info, related sites, common anecdotes etc. Seems like it could help a lot of people who are new to the idea.",asexuality
"Boyfriend of four years wants to marry me, I need help","throwaway account because reason

&amp;#x200B;

I'm 19 F and my boyfriend is 18, and we've been together for more than four years since high school. Neither of us have been in any previous relationships. 

BF has, for the past few years, been completely fixated on marrying me, and I didn't pay much mind to it because we were both very young and it seemed more like a fantasy at the time. Speed up to about a year ago and it has only gotten more and more prevalent, to where we haven't had a casual conversation without him talking about how we're going to be married and how he will propose to me and how many children we'll have. He is absolutely serious. Spending the rest of my life with him seems like something that could really be amazing (but again we are still young). The thing is though is that I'm asexual and have absolutely no desire for sex, kissing, touching, or even physical contact. We've never had sex before and we kiss and hug and all that, but I've never once wanted to do it. He's been very very respectful of my sex boundaries though and has never tried to coax to make me do anything serious. 

I never really thought I was asexual in the past; I thought it was just my age and that I would warm up to the idea eventually, otherwise I would never be in a relationship. I just kept waiting and waiting thinking that the time would come and it never has, and I came to the realization that I'm asexual. I told BF this a few weeks after realizing it, fully expecting him to break up with me because our plans for the future (for a family, for sex, etc) were very at odds. He didn't though, he said he would stay with me because that was his choice, but when we get married, I have to change. I need to get therapy so I can warm up to the idea of sex and so we can have kids (I don't even think I want children either). I don't think I can do that, it just seems absolutely impossible, like a Pray the Gay away kind of thing. It's so upsetting to think about.

&amp;#x200B;

I feel so lost and upset. He doesn't deserve this, but I feel like I need to break up with him. It's so unfair and he's been so good to me and I know it would be all my fault. He is so head over heels for me, I seriously feel like a breakup could ruin his life. I don't even want to break up either and it would be more than hard for me but I don't see any other options and I don't know if I can keep leading him on.",asexuality
19 year old female struggling with whether or not I'm ace,"I've been struggling with whether or not I'm asexual since I was about 13. The first person I heard the term from was my then-boyfriend at age 15 or 16. For years I had experienced romantic attraction and what could be considered very innocent and vague ""sexual"" attraction (making out, etc. But I always got bored from kissing &amp; such for too long.) I never really experienced a true ""sexual awakening"". I kind of halfass masturbated from a younger age to relieve tension and hormonal urges, but to this day I've never experienced orgasm but it doesn't partiularly bother me. I've always been pretty scared of sex as well. The boyfriend who introduced me to the term actually stated that he wasn't interested in sex early on and I told him the same thing. Nearing the end of our relationship he tried to discuss the possibility of him being ace with me but I grew up in a very conservative, Christian, Bible Belt home and we both went to Lutheran school, and this relationship was during the height of ""liberal cringe"" popularity. So naturally I was scared of any consequences. I was also bigoted &amp; had my head up my ass. I look back on the situation and feel awful because I'm sure I hurt him a lot by not accepting him. I also hurt myself by shutting myself off from possible discussion and peace of mind about the matter with someone who was going through similar things. 3 years later I'm still struggling with my own sexuality. Sometimes I find myself aroused by the idea of sex but not with people I actually know or can imagine, never by the thought of penetration or intercourse. I had a slight interest in BDSM for awhile but I think it was just the aesthetics. I've never tried to have intercourse but I did try foreplay/light BDSM with another ex boyfriend and I always ended up bored or upset.
It's almost like roleplay was acting for me and I felt I could make it believable. It caused a lot of mental issues for me as well. Attempts at sexting would constantly turn into late night conversations, which is what I always found more appealing in a partner anyway. The repulsion is something I've tried to fix but I always come back to this thought process in the end. I don't know whether I'm a repulsed hetero, just developed a hatred for physical interaction (although I enjoy cuddling/kissing) or if I am in fact asexual. I've been researching the topic a lot but it's hard to get real feedback from videos and articles. It's less about the label for me and more about whether or not other people experience the same thing.",asexuality
"When did you all realize you were ace, and what was this like for you?",,asexuality
Post Asking if I'm Asexual #0856187201,"Warning: Long, contains tangents.

​

Throwaway.

&amp;#x200B;

I don't think I want to have sex with anyone in particular - most of my crushes have been very naive style ""I hope they like me and we get to do things like cuddle!"" (I am a mid 20s cis male). Based on what I've read, this should be a done-deal asexuality label.

​

But also based on how I've seen people post here, it seems ubiquitous that you'd all prefer nobody like you sexually either, and (if not also aromantic) love you for other reasons? This is really bizarre to me, because I have a super strong desire to be desired sexually. It doesn't do anything for me sexually, but it does stroke my ego. ""Yes, haha, yes! Proof that I could have sex if I wanted to, but guess what!""

​

But that worries me more, because I start questioning if I don't want to have sex because I'm asexual, or if I'm really lazy. If there's a to-do list for life, it's like sex is near the bottom, but I'd still take it and maybe like it if it was just given to me with no effort on my part? Or I might be demisexual, because of how into the idea of someone else being into me. I look at someone and I just don't find even supposedly sexy people sexy? A certain aesthetic appreciation, but no desire to fuck.

​

This confuses me further, because the thought of being in a romantic relationship with someone I don't find aesthetically pleasing to look isn't something I want. I want them to have a good personality and look good, even though having sex with them isn't my priority. This is weird, because based on what I understand about asexuality, shouldn't our desired partners be about the same as our desired friends? And I don't require good looks from my friends.

​

It makes me wonder if I'm not in some way aromantic as well, and my high standards are a manifestation? So I'm totally into the idea of having a romantic + sexual relationships but by the way they need to be someone so perfect they don't exist and also do all the work for me ;)

​

If you ask me most of the time what I'm thinking about, it's going to be things like how to make the world a better place, a way to solve a problem, so on. What I want out of sex or a partner is only something I worry about on rare occasion, where I'm prompted to think about it, like now where I'm asking if I'm asexual. That's when I get into thoughts like ""I can't really be bothered unless..."" followed by those impossibilities listed above. Further, the thought of never having sex for the rest of my life doesn't bother me? There was a time when it did, but on the back of thoughts like ""If I never have sex then it means I'm a worthless person,"" obviously absurd and I've since fully rejected. No desire in-of itself, and especially for anyone one I've ever met. I have desired to enter a romantic relationship with specific people which you think would throw off any doubt of being aromantic but then it's closer to ""I hope they want to be in a romantic relationship with me"" than me wanting to put in any effort of courtship. I'm always thinking long term, and I've even had relationships straight up offered to me, and I always need to say no because I can't see myself bothering unless it furthers my goals in other areas and that feels to me like a shitty reason to be in a relationship that can only end up hurting the other person?

​

Further, I'm not really comfortable with sex talk. Not in the ""I have nothing to say"" sense, but because it feels pointless to me? I've acted the performative male, ""yeah I'd fuck her"" talk, but it's just that, performative. Something I say because it's quick and easy. Other times, if audience allows, I go the male feminist route and talk about how I don't like objectifying women in this way, which is more to the truth but also, I feel, missing the central truth.  While I would prefer a world where women don't need to deal with most men's bullshit, it mostly stems from not giving a fuck.

​

Speaking of preferring women not needing to deal with men's bullshit, I have some problems with this sometimes. I get anxious talking to women precisely because of my awareness of how many men exist that are an active danger. I don't want to be looked at like I'm that kind of person. This, mixed with my general desire to be liked (not just in the sexual sense as above but really in that human 'I hope people will like me as another person') creates this tension where I'd like to talk to people and have a mutually enjoyable conversation, but I feel like my obvious maleness makes talking to women tricky. Then, because I also have an aversion to appearing sexist, I end up not speaking with men either. Mostly I just try very intently to stare at some section of room with nobody there, or my phone.

​

Finally, as much as I want people to like me and like the idea of it, I suppose I'm also afraid what would happen if they do. Once, I made a really good performance and someone who I could aesthetically appreciate got into me. It's a lot of effort and anxiety to say no to sex, which I had to. I got really mentally excited at first in the sense ""here's someone who obviously wants me!"" but when it came down to the moment before, I was mostly worried for the various potential long term consequences, for both me and her. I apologized and we didn't have sex, and the whole thing was the most anxiety inducing moment of my life.

​

I half-wish we did have sex, because it feels like then it'd be off my to-do list entirely, and I'd never have to do it again. ""Yeah, I had sex once,"" I could say in the same way I say, ""Yeah, I smoked weed once. Wasn't for me."" That would unfair to the other person though so that's the half of me that doesn't wish that.

​

I guess when it comes down to it, I don't know if I'm seemingly asexual because I'm overthinking things (I'm always overthinking things, and have frequently been told by friends I've shared pieces of this with ""stop over thinking things and just get laid!"" when trying to explain my position) or if I'm just asexual.

​

If you read all this crap, thank you.

​

​

​

​

​

​

​

​

​

sin(x)/cos(x)",asexuality
I need help! What am I?,"Hello all, I'm trying to figure out where I lie on this crazy spectrum that we call sexuality. I was chatting up with a friend, before I mentioned all my ""ailments"" regarding my sexuality. Upon hearing this, he suggested, ""you might be asexual!""

&amp;#x200B;

""Uhhhhhhh, what's that?""

&amp;#x200B;

And so I begun my research. However, some of the terminology puzzles me and I feel some of my conditions vary differently from ""normal"" aces. Here's a list...

**1)** I've never masturbated. I know, crazy, unbelievable, but it's true. I've never felt any urge in the slightest, and I've simply never bothered. I've been pretty ruthlessly mocked for this by my friends, since I'm well through university and still haven't performed what I always assumed was a basic human function. It's always crept up on me, ""Is there something wrong with me, do I have some sort of sexual deficiency?"" This is why I've been desperate to find a community of individuals that have also never ""launched the pocket rocket,"" but my attempts have come up zilch. I figured that some in the Ace community would also share this trait, but from what I've seen browsing this subreddit, it seems I'm in the STRONG minority here.

**2)** I don't watch porn, also an extension of point 1.

**3)** Literally no sexual urge. Like damn, sex looks painful bruh.... slamming something into a hole with force seems like it would hurt!

I kid, I kid,

But really, my desires to engage in anything of that nature is completely zero. In fact, some traits of sex, like blowjobs, disgust me. The idea of making a women ""below me"" to perform fellatio seems, in a way, oppressive and just.... nasty...

**4)** I've had a few crushes, but most of them were of the ""I'd really not like to go past 1st base with these people."" Even then, 1st base may be stretching it.

&amp;#x200B;

I know you guys have probably heard a million of these ""am I ace?"" stories before, but it would help me tremendously. I have often struggled to identify with a group (My Bi-Racialness doesn't help here), and just to have a selection of people who can relate to me and I can chat and shoot the shit with would go a long way to helping out some of my other persistent issues, like my crippling self esteem troubles. But that's a story for another day.

Thanks for reading, have an awesome day!",asexuality
Would it be appropriate for me to claim to be Asexual?,"I am posting this on an account I just made as I get into some private information.

Hello and thank you all for giving the time to check out my questions. I have been greatly considering the label of Asexual for myself for the past year or longer, but I just need to get a straight answer from someone. I look at many other people's stories and experiences in their lives and growing up, such as a disinterest to sex, awkwardness and disinterest in flirting, however I do enjoy masturbation and have some fetishes, which I will bring up later.

For as long as I can remember I always had a disinterest or mild aversion to sex. I'm not disgusted by it, but it has never been something I wanted to actively pursue and have never felt the urge to partake in it. I am very well aware when someone looks very pleasing and attractive, but I have never experienced the desire to be with anyone in any sexual way. I've also never been in a relationship with anyone and, just like sex, have never wanted to be in one, as I have always felt quite comfortable just being myself and living life how I want. I have other things that take my interest and have been the driving factors in my life such as College/School, improving my art skills, reading, mythology, games, family, movies, geeky/nerdy things all these takes up a large part of life, but sex and relationships just never did.

When I was a teenager, I remember always having difficulty understanding or comprehending other people's fascination with sex. Hearing people in school actively discuss how they partook in sexual acts (partially for gloating, I'd assume) would result in me trying to go by unnoticed by them as the conversation seemed so ""foreign"" to me and I wasn't able to share their liking of it. This would also translate to movie franchises that were big in my youth which I loved, such as Harry Potter and Spider-Man but were unable to relate to their relationship and possible sexual issues. When I was 14, I remember specifically getting flirted with by an older girl on a bus and I was trying my best not to take notice and just responding with a ""yes"" or ""O'k"", it also didn't help that several people from my school were whispering in my ear to ""...get stuck in"" which is slang term where I come from meaning to get laid. The me of today, would've been a little more accepting and just taken the compliments though. I kept telling myself, you'll be ready when you're older. So as a teenager, I kept waiting year after year for that change to happen from 14 to 15 to 16 to 17 to 18, which is when I realised, okay something must be different or ""wrong"" about me, but a small voice in my head kept saying, just wait a little longer, maybe you can still be like everyone else. Well, here I am at the age of 23 and I still don't feel compelled to partake in any kind of sexual matters.

There was also a moment I thought that maybe I might be gay, but I was even less interested in that.

So yeah, I never had any distinct interest in sex and have never pursue or looked for sexual interaction, it sounds that I may fit the asexual description, which I was very happy about when I first found out about it around 3 years ago. I related  to a lot of other people's stories experiences that I had read on AVEN or seen on Youtube. It felt like there was a bell in my head constantly ringing whenever there was a moment someone would recount experiences and thought processes that felt so true to me.

However, as I said before, I do partake in masturbation and have sexual fetishes. I know that asexuals may have fetishes and some do like masturbation and some even have sex, but I feel the need to be a little distinct here. I have fetishes for breasts, butts and for some mild kinky stuff. I do masturbate to it and I do get pleasure from it. I do watch porn, but my preferences are mostly for seduction and stripping. I never had an interest in unclothed porn and definitely d not like penetration, in fact if the video goes that direction, I lose interest immediately.

Please note that I am very sorry for how long-winded this post is as I didn't intend for it to be this detailed. I just wanted to present my perspective as clear as possible.

So I guess, with all that considered, would it be appropriate to consider myself as asexual or at least somewhere on the spectrum, as I don't want to be using the label when others may feel offended or may not think that the term is applicable.",asexuality
"Asexuality, introversion, and social life","Combo “am I asexual?” and “community opinion” post here.

So, here's my story: I'm a youngish ace, just started university, and I've been pretty shy my whole life. My place of origin is not forthcoming about sex, and until about a year ago I assumed I was just straight without much of a social drive. As I started to get older I thought “you know, maybe it's more than that.”

I've been in a close but not sexual relationship before, which didn't go so well (they more just needed a listener for mental health reasons). I do have a libido, but other people don't generally factor into my thoughts. In short, I can’t recall having a sexual drive towards other people, but the few people I've spoken to about it tend to remind me that I’m a quiet, introverted, and maybe-a-little-scared person who’s not frequently in situations where sex is a possibility.

The more general question: to what extent is social life a component of discovering one’s sexuality or lack thereof? ",asexuality
In a new relationship with an asexual person looking for advice.,"Hi! I'm sorry if this is the wrong sub to ask this, but I couldn't find an another active sub that fit better. I am not asexual but I just started a romantic relationship with a woman who came out to me as asexual. She expanded on that and told me the kind of physical contact she enjoys (handholding and hugs) and said that anything beyond that doesn't really do much for her, but she doesn't rule it out. She is wonderful and open and invited me to ask any questions I may have, but right now I don't even really know what to ask.
This is the first real romantic relationship I have ever been in and I am not 100% sure what I want/expect out of a relationship. Right now, I am more than happy to maintain a nonsexual relationship and I don't think that will change, but I guess I can't be completely sure. I realize that every person and their experience is unique, but I'd love any general advice y'all can give a sexual person in a romantic relationship with an asexual person. 
I'm not exactly worried and I plan to keep this an ongoing conversation between myself and my girlfriend, but I know next to nothing about asexuality or the community so I don't want to put the burden on her to explain everything to me. Thanks in advance for all your help!",asexuality
Oh yes,,asexuality
Might I be graysexual?,"I've identified as Pansexual for the past few years but I find that, although I experience sexual attraction all the time, I find myself repulsed by the idea of sex and sort of feel like it might not be for me. I'm a virgin btw. 

So, what am I? I have no clue anymore. ",asexuality
"Yes, I understand that not all aro-aces are like this.",,asexuality
How I feel if someone seems judgmental about my asexuality and having never had sex.,,asexuality
Questions For A Asexual,,asexuality
Dropping this here for y’all. Very appropriate reaction image,,asexuality
am i asexual?,"hello dear ace community

im a 22 yrs old male(from germany) and i would like u to ask, even if it is maybe a dumb question if i am asexual?

i had sex in the past , but i dont have a high sex drive. in a relationship feelings and are real connection are much more important to me.

 i could easily live without sex my whole life and my perfect relationship would be sexless. i prefer kissing and cuddling.

but i read that asexuals dont have any sexual attraction and never could had sex, is that true? and if yes, does that mean i cant consider myself as asexual?",asexuality
“I think that purple flag is for Estonia.” - heard at the Calgary Pride Parade,🤨😞🙄,asexuality
"What is sexual attraction/arousal ""supposed"" to feel like?/What if it's just a physical defect?","I am 15, female, and questioning. I have never had sex, never masturbated, and never felt any conscious urges of the sort. I know that guys usually get erections, but would I know if I was attracted to a person? Would there be a physical indication or an unmistakable feeling?  Might I have been aroused and not known it? I can't imagine wanting to do that kind of stuff because all it sounds like is unpleasant and a little gross? I'm still not sure if it's just because I just haven't matured fully, because even kissing seems pointless to me, and I haven't even watched pornography with real people that aren't animated. Will the horomones just magically kick in when I see a real live penis? How can I know without actually doing stuff?

If I really don't get aroused, I'm concerned about whether it's just my feelings or something wrong with my brain chemicals. Is there a difference? I am not depressed or diagnosed with anything that might be the cause. If arousal is a physical thing, then something might be wrong with me physically. How can I confirm how I feel?",asexuality
In my first relationship (kind of),"Hi hi, sorry to bother whoever is reading this but I really need some advice because I have no close friends. Please don’t upvote this because the other person involved is an avid redditor.

I’ve been struggling with whether or not I’m asexual for a while now. I’m 19f and I’ve never been in a relationship, never kissed anyone, never masturbated, and have never felt the urge to have sex. However I know I’m attracted to guys, and have only recently found a guy who I really like.

I’ve been seeing this a guy my age for about a month now. We’ve known each other for about 1 ½ years because we’re in the same class at uni. We were good friends, and he was in a relationship with another girl until about a month ago. They were in a relationship since we started uni but were on the rocks for a couple months before they broke up.

Recently we went on a trip to a neighbouring country to visit a mutual friend of ours. He didn’t tell his girlfriend I was gonna be on the trip, because he said she’s the jealous type. We started messaging everyday since we got back. A week after we got back, he told he knew she was gonna break up with him. I said she wouldn’t do it until after our uni ball. And I was right.

On the night of the ball, I went clubbing with him and some other guys. We later crashed at a friend’s place on separate couches. Nothing happened between the two of us that night.

A week after they broke up, he messaged me from a party saying he couldn’t stop thinking about me. I went and picked him up because he couldn’t drive and took him back to his place where we kissed.

I went home afterwards and have been seeing him since then. However that’s when my school life turned to shit.

His ex began telling anyone who would listen that he cheated on her with me, because someone saw us together on the night of the ball. This ruined both our weeks, and made us both lose a lot of friends on the process. Thankfully by now I’ve disproved the rumour with my friends, but I know a lot of people still dislike me. 

Two nights ago at a party his ex pulled me over and we had a conversation. She said that he’s a pretty terrible person who is very selfish, very good at getting what he wants, has commitment issues, and has pressured her into sex a couple times. It made me rethink the time we’d spent at his place, and what we were doing there together. He told me he respects the fact I don’t want to have sex yet because I’m not ready, and we agreed that we need to slow things down given I’ve never dated/gotten intimate with anyone before. She also said a lot of my classmates were concerned about what I was doing, to which I said if any of them really gave a shit about me or what I was doing surely they’d come talk to me.

I’m in one of those situations where he hasn’t done anything bad to me, but I’ve heard he’s done bad things to other people, although no one seems to know any specifics of the bad shit he’s done.

Last week I asked if we could put a label on our relationship and he said that we’re dating. Today he said he doesn’t want a label anymore. That if I want to say that we’re dating or that we’re bf/gf he’s okay with it, but that he’d rather not have the label. He then asked me if it was okay for him to hookup with other guys (he’s bisexual). I said I didn’t know how to answer that question, and he said it was stupid and he shouldn’t have asked it. He said he isn’t gonna hookup with other guys.

I just don’t really know what to do. I really like this guy, but I’m unsure if it’s just because it’s the first time I’ve been interested in someone. I don’t know if I should break it off before more bad shit starts to happen.

Thanks for reading if you made it this far; he uses Reddit quite a lot, so I know this is a place I could post without him finding

TL;DR: Just got into my first “relationship”. Guy says he doesn’t want labels a week after we put on a label, and then asks me if it’s okay for him to hook up with other guys.",asexuality
"Do you seek a partner? Why or why not? If so, what qualities do you look for in them?","I'm just really curious as to what other asexuals do in this regard. And to add another question, does aesthetic attraction (I guess it'd be physical attraction in allosexuals, but I wasn't sure if that was still present for individuals on most of the asexual spectrum, so I figured aesthetic attraction was the safest bet) factor in?

I've known I was asexual since I was a young girl, but a lot of my confusion in my life over it derived from still wanting romantic aspects of a relationship without the carnal side to it. I do experience aesthetic attraction myself, but it's not really 'I want to climb that like a tree' and more so 'I want to put them with my hoard of pretty things like a dragon' (not literally, but hopefully you know what I mean), and I was wondering if other asexuals experienced the same thing. Or, perhaps you don't consider the appearance of a partner important at all? I'm curious about everyone's input on this aspect of being asexual.

OH AND ONE MORE THING: How do you aces in relationships work through the whole no sex thing? Or are you in relationships to other aces where it works out perfectly? I was wondering about that too",asexuality
Do you ever have sex dreams?,"I'm curious. I've had a few, but they've always been incredibly awkward and non-sexy, which I think represents my discomfort surrounding sex. I had a dream recently where I was experimenting by having sex with a girl, and honestly it was the most bland and awkward dream ever, and all the touches were just that - touches. I guess I should thank my brain for letting me try it out in my head so I don't have to in real life!",asexuality
My exchanges regarding my sexuality are always like this:,,asexuality
Can someone have a sexuality but be aromantic?,,asexuality
"Ladies and Gentlemen, friends beyond the binary. Give me some advice on questions you would ask your therapist on a first visit.",Just moved to a new city and am looking for a therapist to help me with some depression and ocd. What are some questions I should be asking to know they won’t be treat asexuality like a symptom?,asexuality
Asexual and what I think is erectile dysfunction. Constantly confused.,,asexuality
I found something that was a little... insulting...,,asexuality
How can you tell if your relationship is beginning to fall apart?,"My fiance and I have been together for 3 years. As I've been learning more about myself I have realized that I'm actually an acesexual. He on the other hand is a fairly horny pansexual. 

I've noticed that we are both starting to drift off and I don't know if it's because we are starting to fall out of love or if it's the fact that he is rethinking his proposal question.

By that last sentence; he doesn't want to start wedding plans. He's thinking that the whole idea is a joke. 

Ever since I moved to a new state he doesn't want to come out to see me. He's starting to talk/ text less and less. Now he's talking about making friends with a girl. 

I'm okay with him making friends with girls and he's okay with me making friends that a boy's. He knows I wouldn't cheat on him for the obvious reason that I am an ace.",asexuality
What is your response to someone one who tell you that you are not asexual but are only using the label of asexual because you are unsuccessful in relationships and want to avoid rejection?,I just got that response afew hours ago and I responded by telling them I spent a lot of time deciding if the label was right for myself and he should respect what I chose for myself. Do you guys have any witty and clever comebacks for these types of comments?,asexuality
Am I asexual? You tell me [M 26],"Hey folks

I've read some articles here and there, but I'd like to get some direct commentary on my situation, to better figure out whether I'm actually asexual or just facing some mental obstacles.

Like I said, I'm male. I'm a bit of a late bloomer, I started masturbating later in my life than most people, but the fact that I do confirms to me that I do feel sexual arousal. 

It's just when I'm with my partner (female) that I have trouble. I don't know why but the physical act of sex just doesn't excite me. Instead I feel nervous, hyperaware, in my head, and stressed out. I've never been able to go all the way to climax with my partner. 

Nudity arouses me, and touching arouses me, but sex is more awkward for me than pleasurable. 

I suspected some kind of hormone issue, but my blood test results were normal. 

It might be a psychological issue because this ""in my head"" feeling is not just exclusive to sex, I always feel awkward at parties where everyone is going crazy in some alternate reality and I'm just experiencing real life wondering what the big deal is (yeah I don't drink). 

I don't know if seeing a urologist or therapist would necessarily do anything. 

So based on all the information I've provided, does it seem like I'm full on asexual or just suffering from some kind of mental issue that prevents me from cutting loose and going with the flow during sex? 

Thanks for reading! 

",asexuality
"Did your parents ever give you ""the talk""?","I'm working on a project called ""The Talk"" Book, where I'm aggregating the embarrassing, uncomfortable or surprisingly helpful sex talks we received (or didn't) from our parents to determine any correlations between the existence and/or “quality” of this talk and the effect on one’s long-term sexual outlook.

I need about 400 surveys to reach a strong enough confidence level with the data to be able to publish. WOULD love your submission (anonymously of course) so I can add it to the book.

[http://thetalkbook.com/](http://thetalkbook.com/)

""My father picked me up from basketball practice when I was 13 years old. The car ride home was strangely quiet and uncomfortable. I became nervous he was about to tell me that my parents were getting a divorce. Then, 2 minutes from home, he turns to me and slowly says, ""...do you know what a scrotum is?"" Stunned, I quietly said, ""...I think so..."". I didn't. He then responded biologically with, ""It's your ball sack."" And we finished the ride home in complete and utter silence. I can only imagine he was guilted into having this conversation by my mother whom he later told, 'Yup, I did it! We had the talk. Went great.'""",asexuality
If You Could Have A Movie Centered Around An Ace Character...,"Hey!

So I was wondering, if there was a movie based around the main character being ace, what would the movie be about? What would YOU want it to be about.

Yes I know there’s more to a person than sexuality and personal life, but for the sake of movies being movies and needing to be sold/make money, what would you want to see in a movie like that?

Would it be a drama?
A comedy?
A coming of age story?

What would it be about?
Trying to navigate the discovery of their sexuality?
Already knowing, being certain and moving in a world that doesn’t understand them?

I’m just looking for ideas mostly.
",asexuality
How to reject someone without hurting them,"How do you reject people who want something from you? For context I'm a guy and women aren't really used to get rejected because I'm not good looking enough for them to expect it. So often they get really mad at me, tell me that I'm gay and some even tried to ruin my life through spreading lies just for rejecting them. Any advice on how to avoid situations like that?",asexuality
Does your acedar (like gaydar) ever go off?,"Have you ever meet a person who has given you the vibe that they're asexual? How did you get that vibe? Did you eventually talk about it or no? 

I'm asking because I met a women who is pinging my acedar pretty hard. She's also goes on reddit... So Natalie, if you're out there, 👀 ",asexuality
"I am 99% sure I'm asexual, but on Tuesday I have a hook up.","Part of me feels like I've been lying to myself telling me I'm asexual, that I just wanted attention, etc. etc.

But the saner, non-anxious rest of me realises that it's just because I personally feel like I *need* to try before fully accepting it. Not because I believe I'm a freak, but because I just want to know.

I'm not sure why I'm posting this here, I just felt like I needed to vent.

EDIT: Thanks to you all for your answers, they’ve quite tranquillised me about my identity. ",asexuality
Media and being ace; or that self-hating time I didn't love Beyonce enough,"I come from a pretty conservative society. Even with growing up in the capital and all, so not being too sexual in conversations etc isn't so strange. At 27, while I've managed to cobble together an understanding of what I think of sex and attraction over the years, it didn't hit me until now that I am asexual.

What threw me off, as with most, is libido and attraction. I'm reassured now that this + lack of desire to copy/paste self in fantasy or make it happen in RL = pretty standard asexual. 

The point is, I'm looking back at all the media I ever liked, consumed and it just hit me hard how offbeat I was growing up in why I liked things, and how I unconsiously tried to adjust myself to sexual norms. And in a conservative society (I havent even unpacked this yet), that ties with romance 9/10 of the time.

Like --- from Evanescence, to Hunter x Hunter, to Eminem's neutered troll rapping in the early 00s, to liking Beyonce but never quite loving her --- I liked artists for the sheer relief of ever hearing anyone on the radio not singing about sex and romance. The relief of Imagine Dragons, Hannibal, Nicki Minaj's lack of much lovelife talk  --- it never occurred to me to wonder about sex in HP until someone gave me fics? 

My tipping point was when my friends finally got into kpop. I think I gravitated towards kpop as safe place w/o knowing it --- where I can like aesthetics, friendship, skill, stories etc. Idols arent allowed to date, so much of sex there is regulated as to be neutered really. It was only when my friends got into it and started sexualizing them that I realized that I will always be on a diff wavelength. That I've always been on a diff wavelength even when we liked the same things. 

Media esp for millenials --- it shapes the language we live in, yknow? It just hit me how lonely I've always been, and not even for the personal issues I do know about --- there's only so much you can fix before you confront this big gaping hole that is the major reference point for  the language most people live in. That you can't do anything about. 

TL;DR What media/media moment did you like before realizing your sexuality that, in retrospect, kinda were/was a red flag?",asexuality
In relationship but repulsed by sex,"I've been in a relationship with my boyfriend for a couple years now. He likes kissing and touching and I conceptually like that (particularly when reading), but in practice it makes me really uncomfortable. I don't want to have sex anytime soon and I don't even want to be touched or kissed a lot of the time. I love him yet I don't feel any sexual desire involving him and I feel bad telling him this. I might be somewhere in the Ace spectrum, but I'm worried it might be my inexperience that's making me feel this way.",asexuality
Im unsure about if Im on the asexual spectrum,"So, recently I have freed myself of some denials about my sexuality and have began to rethink about it.

On one hand I have no problem getting aroused so I don't think it is hyposexuality as I have no problem with arousal, if I want I can get aroused without a problem.

The thing is the intensity of my sexual interest or atraction changes from time to time, by a lot, I can go from a bit lesser than what I have observed in the mayority of my enviorement to nothing in a few months and can stay at that for years. I can still enjoy sexual activities but I just don't feel any interest on them or very little or stop considering certain things on a sexual manner.",asexuality
Sums up the LGBTQ+ spectrum,,asexuality
Scared of being old and alone,"I know it’s possible that in the future I may find someone who I connect with and could spend the rest of my life with. I’ve always pushed the thought of me being old and alone to the back of my mind, so I don’t scare myself. But I watched ‘To All The Boys I’ve Ever Loved’ on Netflix and ended up crying throughout the whole end titles because I was upset I’ll never find anyone who understands or is willing to be with me. 
I know hopefully I’ll always have friends but realistically I’ll always be second best to to their partners and I feel like I’ll never really belong. Does anyone else feel like this? Any advice?",asexuality
"How did you guys first hear of the term ""asexual""?",,asexuality
Ace ring I made a couple of days ago,,asexuality
"Am I bisexual, biromantic, asexual, aromantic? Please help, I’m unsure of my sexuality and need some advice.","This is essentially a repeat of my old post in r/bisexual; one of the comments suggested I head to this subreddit and I'd really like to know what you guys think. 

I think this might count as slight NSFW/discussions of sex so if anyone here is uncomfortable with that... 

I’m 16, F, and pretty sure I’m bi (romantic at least) as I feel attracted to both girls and guys. But I don’t think I’ve ever been sexually attracted to anyone. I understand that I’m still rather young, but I’ve been starting to think there’s a chance I might be asexual? I’ve tried watching porn (just a little) but I find it to be kinda fascinating but gross.. although everything is still quite new to me. I know that on occasion after reading a explicit stories or seeing certain videos I might become just the slightest bit flustered but nothing more.

Another problem I have is that upon being asked out, I get this awful feeling of anxiety and nausea towards the person, and I can’t take up their offer. I have no idea where that stands with all of this, but it’s been happening since I can remember. I want to be in a relationship and date, but for some reason I can’t seem to take that leap and try it out because something inside me just says no. Happens with both guys and girls, even if I like them back which is really weird. Generally I’m more aesthetically attracted to people than anything else, but I do still get nervous around my crushes as people do.

Do you guys have any advice for me? I’m really confused, and I’m hoping I grow out of it because I seriously don’t want to be an aromantic asexual (but I don't have anything against you guys or think it's wrong/unnatural, it's simply because romance is something I want in my life), but there’s something there that’s holding me back. I’m hoping it might just be general anxiety towards trying things out, or maybe due to low self esteem? Ah, any advice would be appreciated.

I'd really love to say yes when asked out and I nearly did recently to a girl, but I shut her down despite wishing I could take the opportunity at a shot at a same sex relationship. This was due to uncontrollable feelings of anxiety that bothered my entire being constantly until I said no. I found her aesthetically attractive, but we'd only met once before and my first impression of her was that she was rather irritating and irresponsible. After being asked out, thinking about her in any romantic or sexual or even platonic way made me feel sick and panicked, as if I needed to run away from something, and I couldn't understand why. These feelings aren't there anymore (this was about 2 months ago for context). When I was 12, I was asked out by my long term crush I'd had since I was about 8. We went on the date, and I ended up cutting it short because I was still feeling horribly anxious and slightly nauseous even after talking with him for an hour. At that point, I knew I didn't like him anymore though. I'm still unsure as to whether it was because of a lack of attraction towards them, or simply nerves after being asked out (although I gave it a month before confirming a no with the girl, and a month after being asked out to go on the date with the boy). The thing I hate the most is the hugely overrated emotional reaction I have to any of this. Any tips for controlling it, or what the cause may be?

Any advice at all would be gladly accepted and appreciated &lt;3",asexuality
How to deal with parents asking why I don't have a girlfriend?,"Heya, 18M here. Full aro/ace, I just haven't felt anything romantic or sexual towards another person and at this point im sure of what I am.

Now one thing that always makes me uncomfortable are when my parents sometimes press me on why I don't have a girlfriend yet and I don't know how to reply.

I don't want to come out to them because while they are accepting enough of LBGT, they just don't understand the newer identities and with our strained relationship already I don't want to make anything worse.

Thank in advance &lt;3


",asexuality
Anyone else lied to their doctor and said they had sex? Lol I'm an idiot,"I (30F) have never had sex. Last year, I learned the difference between romantic and sexual attraction and I realized that I'm not bisexual- I'm biromantic and asexual. Now, I changed it to panromantic because I would date regardless of gender.

Anyway so when I was 24 I saw a gyno for the first time to get on birth control- I had no plans to have sex, but I was scared of being raped (I know, I know, just bear with me.) I've been using it since. The doc did ask me if I had been sexually active and I said no and she was cool with that. But when I went to the doc again in January of this year, my doc asked (as they usually do) if I had been sexually active, I said yes, even though I hadn't. Don't ask why, lol, because I don't know - I am an idiot sometimes. I guess I kinda felt like 29 was too old to not have had sex yet so I wanted to sound more acceptable/normal. Lol.",asexuality
Questioning my sexuality pls help,"Hello everyone hope you are all well. I am a 19 y/o female. So I have always thought of myself as bisexual, sometimes I think I am a lesbian. The thing is for example I only like men in a platonic way, if I see an attractive boy in appreciate it if that makes any sense, but I'm not interested in dating or anything. With girls I feel I can have some kind of connection but I don't want to have sex I don't feel comfortable with the thought of it. Yet I do fantasize, but I like to keep it like that, fantasies. Maybe is because I am very insecure and the thought of someone touching me makes me nervous. I don't know...

Anyways I would love to read any comments, maybe someone feels the same way?

xx",asexuality
Today on they didn't know it was ace,,asexuality
How do you deal with being asked out or hit on?,"Until last year, the last time I got asked out was one time, 10 years ago in highschool.  It went badly.  I had nervous laughter and made terrible excuses and generally mangled the whole business.

&amp;#x200B;

Relatively recently,  I moved to a small-ish town and now I'm suddenly getting asked out every few months and having to figure out how to deal with it gracefully.  Some of the people work for consultants or partner companies to my own, one is a acquaintance/friend who is part of one of my hobby groups, one is a random person on a hike I talked to etc.  How do you turn people down and make it clear you will never be interested without making things weird, causing gossip, or keeping friendship when you interact with them either professionally or socially?  Do you do anything to try and avoid getting asked out/hit on in the first place?  I guess this isn't aro/ace specific, but it would be great to hear your take.",asexuality
Random realization.,"I had a realization earlier today. It's not a big deal, and it doesn't worry me or anything like that. I just wanted to share with like-minded people.
Anyway, I realized that I've never wanted to kiss anyone before. I consider myself a homoromantic woman, but it just hadn't occurred to me until now that I've never wanted that.",asexuality
Aro irl,,asexuality
Do Asexual People Have Sex? Questioning My Asexuality Again.,"I’ve been wondering if asexual is the right label for me. I know I’m not aromantic. I’m heteroromantic, and I have crushes and fall in love. To me, love is cuddling and taking care of each other. Sometimes I want to kiss people, just to know that they like me enough to kiss me back. But the actual act of kissing grosses me out. I don’t masturbate because it doesn’t do anything for me. When I see an attractive person, I don’t think about having sex with them. I think about asking for their phone number or cuddling on the couch. I don’t have sex fantasies. But I’m not saying I *wouldn’t* have sex. It just doesn’t mean anything to me. A partner asking me to have sex would be like a partner asking me to watch Sharknado 6 again. Yeah, I’d do it because my partner asked me to, and it doesn’t really inconvenience me in any discernible way, but it’s not something I’d get anything out of. Does this sound like it falls within the asexuality spectrum? I think I’ve found a place here but I’m not quite sure. ",asexuality
Obligatory first ace ring post,,asexuality
I need help with an asexual girl I am talking to,"Hello all,

I am coming to you for help with a ex girlfriend that I have recently rekindled with, after a 6 year break. She slowly came out to me as asexual, maybe with out knowing so herself. 

We hooked up after a couple of weeks of talking, and it was a disaster. I initiated the kissing but she initiated everything else, including the sex that happened. In the middle of it she started crying profusely for her mom and I stopped obviously and held her tight. We went to bed, and she awoke me later in the night to give me oral, which I didn’t push or ask for at all.  The next day she said she had fun with me and thinks I’m nice still but didn’t find me attractive and wanted to be alone. But, I had caught feelings and we continued to talk. 

A couple of weeks later we again hooked up and she wanted to try to have sex again, even though she had never gotten a good feeling having sex before and can’t get very wet. I was dumb and thought that it was her past partners that weren’t doing something correct. It was obvious she didn’t enjoy it, so we decided to not have sex again which I am completely okay with. 

There has been ups and downs since then, normally after sexual things happen.  She would try to push away and I wouldn’t want to let her go and it worked its self out. She told me that she felt she was asexual, and very much to my regret I said some dumb things in response. Such as I don’t think you are or you should get counseling. I didn’t understand that asexuality was a spectrum because I knew she was attracted to me in someways. 

Then eventually the lows started to be that she really wants her next partner to click with her physically so we did other sexual things than sex. When those weren’t working for her she pushed away again. Finally on Friday she told me that she doesn’t enjoy sexual contact, and is afraid of people’s penis. She likes kissing and cuddling, but sometimes pulls away from that because she feels like it will lead to sexual things that she feels obligated to do. She said she is Romantically attracted to men, but can only masturbate to lesbian porn, and it doesn’t feel good for her still. 

We talked about this for a while and I said I was 100% okay with not doing anything sexual if that was what she wanted. She didn’t believe me when I said that, and I can understand why now due to some of my previous responses of her trying to tell me about her asexuality. I feel completely awful about it now that I actually understand it. I want to be with her in a romantic way but she says that she wants to stop talking everyday, and then continues to talk to me. Then a couple days down the road she wants to end it again. She feels guilty for putting me through this cycle and selfish for it. But she doesn’t think I could be in a relationship with out the sexual touching.

Sorry if this is not written out well, I have a lot running through my mind. I have a few questions that I am looking to this sub to help me with. I truly am okay with no sexual touching, unless she initiates it, which she said she likes to do every once in a while because she likes seeing me feel good.

1. How do I properly apologize for how I first responded to her coming out? I do think she is on the spectrum of asexuality, and that there is nothing wrong with it even if she feels broken.

2. How can I convince/show her that I am okay with out the sexual contact parts of a relationship?

3. Will the cycles of ups and downs go away if we establish boundaries well? My heart can’t take the constant beating that it does when this happens.

4. Is there a way for me to show her that kissing doesn’t need to turn into sexual touching like she believes at times? She tells me she enjoys kissing, but is scared of what it may lead to.

She is someone I very much so care about and don’t want to lose. I want to make her happy and comfortable with me. 

Thank you ahead of time for your help, and I apologize for not fully understanding asexuality before, but this sub has really shed some light on it for me 
",asexuality
"Sorry if this is an exaggeration, but you can sometimes see the Asexuality flag pattern in this GIF, and I thought sharing here was cool.",,asexuality
"I kind of enjoy sex, but when I think about it later I feel disgusted??","When I'm actually having sex it's okay, I've never really loved it the way other people do but it can be fun. But when I think about doing it after the moment, the idea of it is gross to me. What's up with that ??",asexuality
What am I? Am I ace or something else? I'm confused rn,"I'm attracted to guys but occasionally I find some women attractive too, I know I like to kiss, hold hands and hug but IDK about sex, I was in a serious relationship with this guy for 4 months and he never really got me off and I'm kinda concerned as to why, because I found him really attractive, he was really good at what he was doing to,  like it felt really good but, at the same time it didn't really do anything for me and I really wanted it to but, I just couldn't get off and that is weird for me because, whenever I do anything to myself it's really easy for me. PS. I've only been with a guy so far ",asexuality
(Poorly) Drew this for a friend to warn him about the dangers of asexuality,,asexuality
Body Image(I need to vent),"Ugh, I'm forced to take swim classes at my new high school, I'm sorry if this isn't the usual type of posts that belong here. BUT, the idea of people staring at my body and judging it, or finding it sexually appealing GROSSES me out. I just don't get allosexual people and how their minds work.

 I'm so afraid of being sexualised because of my ""skinny"" body(think ariana grande in 'bed' video with nicki minaj. Ugh, I love her music but sometimes she just sings about sex too much, but that's not what I'm here about). It just fucking sucks, UGH!

 I hate being an asexual woman in a highly sexualised world. I wish there was swimsuits that don't sexualise women, or stop sexualising swimsuits. I'm sorry but no one irl really gets it, so, sorry if I'm venting. ",asexuality
Am I foolish to fear coming out to my friends even though they are lgbt+,"I’m sorry if this is rambles on but I just need to vent a little 

I’m sure most have heard the horror stories of people coming out and getting the responses of “you just haven’t found the one.” Or “you can’t just not have sex.” But that’s not why I’m worried. A while ago I went to go join my friends at a pride rally. I was going to use this opportunity to come out since I hadn’t yet. I got dressed up in the colours of the asexual flag and even got a bit of face paint done. But as I was making my way to the rally I was stopped by a seeming horde of people. Somewhere around 15-20 people also making there way, dressed up in there own colours. They began to insult me saying how I wasn’t lgbt+ and that I’m nothing more than a heterosexual that gave up because of my appearance.  Needless to say I never made it to the rally and I never came out to my friends. 

That was almost a year ago. I still live in fear that they won’t accept me and that I would lose the few friends that I do have. I just was hoping for some advice and to see if my fear was rational or not.",asexuality
Questioning and need help,"(tw for mild nsfw / sex talk, for those of you who would rather not see that.)

I'm a 20 year old biromantic cis girl. The thing is, I know I'm somewhere on the ace spectrum; I'm just not sure exactly where. I've been identifying as demi- for a while. I have an SO who I love very much. He's the only person I've ever dated, and the only person I've ever done anything sexual with. 
What's really causing me to question myself is how I felt last time I visited him (LDR). I love cuddling, hugging, etc, but kissing isn't necessarily my favorite thing in the world. I don't dislike it, but I definitely prefer cuddling/similar forms of physical affection. I kiss my SO because I love him and I know he enjoys it, even though I'm indifferent myself. 
Now, on to sexual stuff. I enjoy him doing a limited number of things to me, because I like how it feels physically. But only very specific things, and I tend to think about other things/situations while he does so. Also, I'm indifferent about doing things to him, and some things I straight up dislike. In other words, while I do have a libido that fluctuates (sometimes it is very high), I don't think I experience these feelings directed at my SO. It's almost like he's the only person I trust enough to help ""take care"" of my urges. That's the only way I can really put it, though it may sound confusing. 
I hope I've given enough information here. If not, I'm totally open for questions. Thanks for taking the time to read. ",asexuality
This just in: chainsaws may remove asexuality,,asexuality
Makeshift ace ring b/c I hate jewelry and have a plethora of hair ties,,asexuality
VENTING: Uncomfortable Conversation from Ex-Coworker,"CW: sex mention 

So, an old coworker of mine (who I was pretty friendly with) just came into the store and we haven't seen each other or talked in probably 8-10 months. She just moved back to the city from her parents house, so we catch up a bit then I get her food and it gets busy so she stands to the side and converse whenever we can.

Then, in between customer's orders, she for some reason shows me a (admittedly censored) nude of herself on her phone! And just said ""check this out."" Like what the fuck? And she knows I have a monogamous partner. It was very bizarre. She then begins to tell me about the people she's been fucking, and then about a threesome she had last night! And when I told her I didn't need to hear about that, she continues on and then invites me to hang out after I get out of work. Fat chance.

Just wanted to vent to a community of people who I feel would relate. I'm not even necessarily sex-repulsed but as someone who is gray/ace it was pretty gross and made me uncomfortable and anxious. ",asexuality
Does anyone else find it annoying that so many people use “sex” as a synonym for kissing and cuddling?,"Does anyone else find it annoying that so many people use “sex” as a synonym for kissing and cuddling? Examples: Netflix and chill = sex, if there are no dates and you just want to meet in your room at your house, you want sex, if you are interested in looks more than friendly interests that means you just want sex, sex is necessary to prove that you are more than just roommates. Sex can be replaced by kissing and cuddling in all those examples.

I once mentioned that I wish that I was more successful on dating sites and someone mentioned that sex chat and hookup sites would be more effective, but I am only interested in kissing and cuddling, not sex. I have noticed that people (mostly non-asexuals) tend to use sex as a synonym for any romantic affection and I find that obnoxious. Does anyone else notice that and find it incredibly annoying?",asexuality
I just found out about the word prurience.,It’s a good word for aces. ,asexuality
Custom License Plate,"I don't have a car or anything, but my college was giving us one of these as part of Welcome Week. I love mine! I picked a unicorn since all the aliens were pretty ugly.

https://i.imgur.com/OJFcSrV.jpg",asexuality
"If I experience sexual attraction towards men, but I do not desire to act upon it, am I considered asexual?","I do experience sexual attraction to men, but I do not desire to act upon it sexually or romantically. I have no interest in having sex or love. So, you could say, ""in practice"" I'm asexual.

**Possible TW** for sex in comments. Unsure, view at own discretion.",asexuality
"A coworker likes me and wants to start a relationship, as a probable aro/ace girl I don't know what to do. Help.","I wrote about this first in r/relationships, but maybe you will be able to help me more. 

Original:
https://www.reddit.com/r/relationships/comments/97ccxd/i_26f_have_never_had_a_boyfriend_in_fact_i_think 

In summary, I am 26 female and never had a serious relationship before. This is because I haven't felt attracted to anyone  and was pretty happy with it.

I started to spend sometime with a coworker lately and he has told me he likes me and if I wanted to start a relationship. My first thought was a no, as always, but actually I decided to give him the benefit of doubt since who knows, maybe I am being too rash with how I feel and maybe I just need a bigger connection (something I have never tried) or more time before turning someone down other than not having an initial spark. 

So, I told him we should have a date before I answered anything. 

This is where the original post ends.

So, we went for a date and I decided to be honest with him and told him I didn't feel attracted to him BUT I haven't felt attracted to anyone before. He called me weird, but in a good way that made me felt comfortable (actually he called me a psycho, and I found it funny). We cuddled and talked about relationships, expectations and stuff, and I was comfortable almost the whole time because I was being honest. I learned we are compatible in some things, but incompatible in some others, obviously. 

But when I looked at him I realized... I felt nothing romantic for him, even if he was a good fit for me. He didn't make my heart race, found him specially handsome, made me specially happy, wanted to kiss him, or inspired in me any weird feelings. Just nothing but a good guy that was with me and made me felt comfortable. And I have the feeling that may never change. 

He still wanted to know my answer. I told him it was a maybe, because this was the first time in years I have seriously considered it, but not feeling attracted to him was kinda unfair for him and me to start something. He, of course, wanted a more solid answer that wouldn't let his exposed feelings in a undefined limbo waiting for who knows what, which I felt it was pretty fair. I told him to give me a week.

The week passed and I found myself thinking seriously about a lot of stuff that previously I didn't care too much. A relationship, for the first time, sounded pretty attractive. I felt anxious and nervous, and in some things it was hard to concentrate. But I realized it was because of the perspective of a relationship, something that hasn't happened to me before, but not specifically because of him. 

Yesterday we went together for lunch. He asked me what I had thought and after thinking it the whole week I told him... no. 

My reasoning was that it would be difficult for me to engage in a relationship as he deserves if I am not romantically/sexually attracted to him. I don't know if I will even be able to kiss him in a way that is not forced and I don't want to push myself and being uncomfortable in something like that. There was a possibility that actually, with time, I would develop something more for him (I am a naturally passionate person, but I need a reason to be it), but there was a possibility that not, and considering my actual non-hypothetical feelings, the best was not to start something that probably won't fulfill his expectations. He deserves better. 

But now I feel sad about it, specially because the idea of a relationship actually sounded appealing and exciting and probable for once, and he is the one who has been the closest to make me comfortable enough to consider it. But I think it wouldn't have been fair for him. He is a great guy and knowing that someone likes me is nice, I am just sorry I am unable to correspond him as he deserves. Right now he wanted some distance, which I find fair. 

So, do you think I made the right choice? Do you think it is possible to have a successful relationship without attraction? Any stories of your own with a successful aro/ace relationship only from one side? 

Thanks!",asexuality
This is canon now.,,asexuality
"""When did you know that you're bi?""",,asexuality
What are your thoughts on using allonormativity,I was in a bad headspace for a few hours today and I was reading Reddit and I keep reading comments are definitely something a asexual would not think that got me thinking about how heteronormativity is used to identify behavior and trends that are harmful for the more general LGBT+ community and if there was a more specific phrase for asexual to use. I did a quick google search and found one site using allonormativiy and I have mixed feelings about it. It reaffirms that I not alone but I can see how it can foster an us vs them mentality. What do you guys think?,asexuality
Asexual anthem,Petition to make Anne Marie’s song FRIENDS the asexual and aromantic anthem,asexuality
"Lol, true",,asexuality
Definitions of Various Attractions and Relationships,"Okay, so... I created this list of definitions about some of the attractions and relationships I've learned about over the years, and thought I'd put them into a list which might be helpful to folx on the ace spectrum. Of course, some people will have alternate definitions for this terminology, but I hope some of it may be useful to some of y'all. If I haven't defined  things in a clear way to any of you, let me know. Also, feel free to share your alternate definitions in the comment section below:

​

Limerence: the state of being infatuated with another person, typically experienced involuntarily and characterized by a strong desire for reciprocation of one's feelings, but not primarily for a sexual relationship.

&amp;#x200B;

Lythromantic Attraction: the feeling of romantic attraction, but without the desire to act on it or have it reciprocated.

&amp;#x200B;

Grayromantic/Demiromantic Attraction: experiencing romantic attraction on rare occasions, or after a close connection with a person or persons has been established.

&amp;#x200B;

Aroflux Attraction: attraction that is fluxuating somewhere on the aromantic spectrum; feeling aromantic sometimes, and gray/demi romantic at other times.

&amp;#x200B;

Aesthetic Attraction: acknowleding that you like the way someone looks.

&amp;#x200B;

WTF Attraction:  not experiencing attraction in a typical way; an uncertainty of if you're feeling platonic, romantic, or queerplatonic attraction to a person; unable to tell what the difference is between the various types attractions that exist in the human experience.

&amp;#x200B;

Sensual Attraction: the desire to kiss, hold hands, non-sexual affectionate touch to a person or persons.

​

Queerplatonic Attraction: experiencing a deep, intense, emotional connection that transcends the usual parameters of platonic relationships.

&amp;#x200B;

WTF Relationship: uncertainty of if the relationship you're in is platonic, romantic, or queerplatonic; unable to tell where your relationship fits among the various types attractions that exist in the human experience.

&amp;#x200B;

Sensual Relationship: a kissy, touchy, hand holding, non-sexual affectionate relationship with a person or persons.

&amp;#x200B;

Queerplatonic Relationship: making a committment to being in a deep, intense, emotional, transcendent relationship that goes beyond the usual parameters of traditional friendships. Sensual activities in the relationship are optional and up to the person or persons involved.

&amp;#x200B;

Zedsexual/Zedromatic:  the opposite of asexual/aromantic.

​

Autochorissexualism: a disconnect between you and the object of your arousal; looking at sexual imagery or having sexual fantasies without having a desire to be present within them. 

&amp;#x200B;",asexuality
Another reason I love EDM,"I primarily listen to EDM, but my ipod was on shuffle today and Poison by Bel Biv Devo came on. I sang along, and the sexual lyrics didn't bother me, but it made me realize that part of why I prefer EDM is that most of it isn't about sex. Granted the majority is instrumental, but the ones with lyrics that I listen to have some romantic lyrics here and there, but nothing blatantly sexual. Never occurred to me that that is part of why I love it so much. ",asexuality
I feel like being Demi-romantic can ruin friendships.,"I kinda fall under the demi-romantic part of the asexual spectrum. For the most part I feel kinda hopeless . I make friends and enjoy my time with them and then out of nowhere I start getting feelings for them . But I know the chance of it being reciprocated are close to none. So I try to move on over it yet I can’t . If I confess I ruin the already established friendship but the more I let the feelings fester the more delusional i get .  I don’t want to see some of my friends in this light but I do . And even then it still confusing I want to hang out with them , talk more and lay my head on them and what not but I don’t want to kiss them and stuff. But I’m also rather jealous and want to share a lot of my time with them knowing full well that it is unlikely. It’s just so confusing and uncomfortable, like we are friends but I still want more than that .  ",asexuality
Allos and their beds,"Hello friends

So I’m very much not out to my family. They are, unfortunately, obnoxiously allosexual. I am moving to a new apartment and the following conversation took place:

Mum: did you ask for a single bed?

Me: yes

Mum: you know that can be very inhibitory for your social life. Is it too late to change your mind?

Now, friends, I live in a very expensive city. My bedroom is TINY. She knows that I wouldn’t be able to fit a desk in there if I had a larger bed. Is sex really more important than having a decent study space or am I the crazy one here? 

The only times I ever consider coming out are when they question my decision making over trivial matters like this and their effect on my perceived “sex life”.  Are you all also bothered by this? Is it worth coming out to family members who inevitably won’t get it? Let me know your thoughts.",asexuality
This really be how it is sometimes,,asexuality
“I Thought You Were a Woman”,,asexuality
"Picked up a silicone band for workouts as my ace ring, peep the tiny turquoise sparkles!",,asexuality
"For those in school, (or other applicable place) do people often ask you if you're gay?","Throwaway because sister, close cousin, and brother know my main and I'm not ready to come out as ace to my family yet.

Anyways. I had some moron knucklehead in front of me in class who constantly tries to flirt with me and I'm always telling them to go away/they're annoying/please stop/etc. I am male, they're female.

So after all this crap, I get fed up with her, insult her and tell her to go to hell because it's getting creepy and uncomfortable. She then says to me ""this is why you'll never have a girlfriend, have sex, or get married, treat a woman with respect""  (???) (this has been going on for a while) and I respond to that by saying I'm not interested in relationships, sex, marriage, or any of that.

So, she says, ""oh, so you're gay. I didn't know that.""

???

Since when does that mean gay? Gay people want sex, relationships, etc, too. I don't. I tell her I am asexual and she's confused... I try to get through her dense head, but she can't seem to get it.

Anyways, does anyone else experience this? Getting called or asked that you're gay, under any circumstance.",asexuality
"I'm going on a date with my best friend, I'm biromantic, shes aroace, HELP","I NEED ADVICE WHAT SHOULD I DO

**Update: She changed her mind. Nevermind.**

**:'(**",asexuality
Coming out??,"My family is mostly really homophobic, toward anyone who isn’t heterosexual. I’m pretty young, but I consider myself to be asexual (demiromantic??) and I’ve told some friends, but I’m terrified to tell my family. I have no clue what I should do... my mother is prone to hitting for ‘Discipline’ even when I’ve done nothing wrong.. she’s made several statements about ‘beating the gay out of people’ and ‘Love is a choice’",asexuality
This is so dumb why is it still a thing,"Do you ever feel like the ace discourse™ you see online (mostly tumblr) literally doesn't matter outside in real life? Like I've never really been to any pride parades or event in my life but I've seen images and videos from not just the ones in the states but other countries like Japan as well and see ace flags, support and solidarity within other lgbt+ groups and everyone is just so friendly and cool with it like there's no gatekeeping. Then you get online and get a dozen something blogs dedicated to gatekeeping and whatnot because they don't want ""cishets in the community"" not to mention the many troll blogs by self proclaimed exclusionist who purposely pretend to be a-spec and make it seem like the ace community are raging homophobes and transphobes and  I honest to god am tired of it all. So what may y'alls opinions be on the discourse?",asexuality
How to engage the world as a questioning and reluctant asexual?,"I've built up this identity over my 32 years of living that I am a sexual being. But for over a year, since a bad relationship ended, I have had absolutely no sex drive. And looking back, I realize that my sex drive was always kind of forced. I like the idea of sex, and I have always (blindly?) pursued it, but when I have the opportunity I tend to get indifferent and come up with excuses not to engage.

I deeply want sexual companship, but I've become doubtful that this will make me happy or even be possible. (My dick just says no.) Still though, I'm lonely and I want a partner. I'm very reluctant to accept that I'm asexual. 

But I also want to stop suffering and stop lying. 

So... how do you recommend I share my existential dilemma with old friends, new friends, and family? I dont want to forever commit to the label of asexuality, but I'm so tired of lying about what's really going on in my world.

Thank you!

",asexuality
How do you guys reply to people doubting you?,"You know the usual. ""Oh you just haven't met the right one"" or ""you'll grow out of it"". How do you guys respond to these people?",asexuality
I was just looking for Halloween decorations and now I’m low key triggered.,,asexuality
A testament to how much aces love puns.,"I have a big letter Q on the wall in my room. My girlfriend asked why and I told her it's so that if there's an awkward situation, I can just point at it and say ""welp, that's my Q"" and walk out of the room. Instead of laughing, she gasped and hugged me tight like I'd just made some big romantic gesture. I've only ever dated allosexuals until now, and I've never been with someone that loves shitty jokes so much. Haha so it feels pretty great.",asexuality
Just a late bloomer?,Any of you turn out to just be late bloomers and not ace after all? How did you feel when you realized it? How did you know? Did you have a second Coming Out after?,asexuality
Fantasies with people you know,Can you have a fantasy about a friend or someone you know and still be asexual? ,asexuality
Is anyone else worried about dying alone?,"I'm getting to that age where most of my friends are in relationships and it won't be too long until some of them get married, have kids, etc. I don't want any of these things and yet it still depresses me a bit. I can tell some of my friends  think that I'll grow out of it or ""find the one."" 

But what bothers me is that I'll get older and I'll really be on my own. It's really saddening me. I can tell that my friends value their romantic relationships above that of their platonic friendships. At the end of the day I'll only ever be second best to someone who I actually value a lot more.  Is it wrong for me to want to matter as much? I feel like it is. 

Edit: Wow I woke up to a lot of nice replies and lovely sentiments. Thank you for taking the time to comment, it means more than you know. ",asexuality
"Are we all ""born this way""? (x-post /r/AsexualMen)",,asexuality
"""Tits or ass, man?""","A new acquaintance of mine and I were out walking, talking about most everything, and suddenly she asked ""So - what attracts you most to a girl? Are you a tits- or ass-man?""

I found I could not quite answer. Now, having given it some thought, it is a pretty strange question to an ace (of most any variety). It is akin to asking ""So - what attracts you to a girl? Are you a small intestine- or gallbladder-man?"" It is pretty much as irrelevant. 

It is not like she could have known, of course, it just sparked the thought in my head.

&amp;#x200B;

You get questions like that that just stumps you because you are not wired for it?",asexuality
I may be gray-a?,"I have a beautiful boyfriend and love him. We only had sex one time, because I was curious and wanted to try it. But I really don't want to do it again. I'm really into physical contact like cuddling and kisses.
If he touches me in a more sexual way, something in me just tells me ""No!"". But I think, I wouldn't have that much of a problem with touching him. I'm just so sorry, because I don't want to have sex with him.
Now I'm confused and would really like to know where I am on the asexual spectrum.",asexuality
"Possibly aromantic, friendship question","I may be aromantic or demiromantic, but I am not certain. I definitely like ‘sensual’ affection, such as kissing, hugging, and cuddling but generally don’t like to think of a romantic attraction to the person I would be physically affectionate with. It would be more a platonic, friendly attraction with sensual affection. Asexual friends with benefits? Ahhh! Does anyone else feel this way?

Also, does anyone else here worry that they rely too heavily on their friendships because they cannot form romantic or sexual relationships and thus platonic connections are the most significant relationship they can attain? I wish I could be in a QPR. I wish I could be in a polyamorous relationship in which it was accepted that I was aroace or demiace or something! ",asexuality
How do asexuals watch porn?,"So, I'm questioning stuff right now (when am I not tbh) and I know asexuals can and do watch porn, but I was wondering how &amp; if it's different to how non-asexuals watch porn. 

My focus is on the act itself, not usually the people buuuut I do look at the women too. Never the men, though (if it's straight porn, i've also watched lesbian lol). idk if that means anything or not...

Do other asexuals focus on the person in the video that matches their gender? Or do you not focus on the people at all? Or do you look at both of them? ",asexuality
Does anyone else worry about finding out their partner is too sexual?,I'm scared to be really into someone and find out that their sex drive is too high for me to even tolerate,asexuality
19 F from England. How do you date if you're sex repulsed?,"It's taken a long time to gather the courage to post on here, but I think I'd benefit from hearing other people's experiences. I've had mutual interest with a few people before but it usually doesn't work out for obvious reasons :( 

&amp;#x200B;

I literally don't know a single other asexual person irl and all my LGBT+ friends are allo so it can feel pretty isolating sometimes, and  I suffer from mild anxiety which makes going to things like meetups quite daunting as well..... I just don't want to get to the point where I'm 30 and have never even attempted to date. Any advice for this angsty teen?",asexuality
Where to meet all other Aces?,"I’m wanting to meet other Aces. Im not sexually attracted to people. My fiancé doesn’t understand that and he’s pressuring me into having sexual relations with him. I comply but I’m miserable.
Every time I try to talk to him he says that he understands and then that night he does it again. I’m hoping to meet another person that understands where I come from. 
Is there a website or something that I can use. I can’t break up with him because I would be homeless with a cat.",asexuality
Biromantic??,"Throwaway account: I’m an almost 30 year old female and have been questioning some things in my life, and maybe with some assistance I could get pointed in ... a direction lol

Is biromantic what it sounds like? 

I’m asking because in my teenage years, I’ve had some experiences, I kissed girls and I liked it. I kissed guys and I liked it...however now, as an adult, I’m just not as interested in sex...at all. Once in awhile I’ll get the “urge” and then when I do satisfy that, usually with a man because I haven’t even explored with a woman much, I retreat into my turtle shell. 

Recent attempts at dating are me with a guy who’s sex drive is alarming and not my speed at all. 

Am I bi-curious? Should I go out there and find a lady? Should I ask a different sub? Am I in the right place?

Thank you! ",asexuality
"Is there a reason to ""come out""?","I don't quite understand why some asexuals feel the need to ""come out"". We don't feel sexual attraction, so why do we need to ""come out""?

I have told my younger sister and 3 friends, one who is also asexual about being asexual but I don't see the point in telling anyone else, it seems pointless.",asexuality
What am I? What can I call myself?,"Let me explain myself first. 
I’ve had sex a couple of times in my life and in those times, I’ve never orgasm. Maybe the sex wasn’t great but shouldn’t have happened at least once? I’m sometimes an affectionate person. I love hugs and giving kisses and receiving them. However, sex doesn’t interest me. Masturbation does the job. When my last partner tried to get sexual, I felt very uncomfortable. Maybe it was just him? 
I don’t know if I’m asexual. I’ve been lurking around this community seeing if people can relate to me. ",asexuality
What are your sexual dreams like?,"Hello friends, I am wondering if those wet dreams/sex dreams that you were either supposed to get or still get from time to time are different from allos. 

Personally, mine are completely different from what I was taught. Supposedly, you dream of someone you have a crush on and (as a guy) you ejaculate. My “sex” dreams, however, generally had me doing something as far from sexual as you can get...followed by random ejaculation then me waking up. When I have had dreams of having sex with people or doing things like kissing, there is no feeling or pleasure or anything. It’s like my penis is a finger and is just doing the motions. Weirdly enough, I haven’t  ejaculated from the sex dreams; only from those other ones. Anyone else experience something similar? I know some aces experience sexual dreams and liking it eve though they aren’t like that in waking hours, but I want to know even more peoples experiences. Thanks everyone. :)",asexuality
Does asexuality extend beyond sex to things like hugging and kissing?,"Last night my girlfriend of one and a half years said that she is not physically attracted to anyone anymore. She has stopped reciprocating things like hugging, kissing, and has not wanted to engage in intercourse. There are some other signs that she may have lost interest in our relationship, but until we talk about this issue later in the week I won't know for sure what the cause is. However, this behavior makes me wonder if she is potentially asexual. If she is, I want to fully support her, but I also wanted to know if asexuality extends to things like hugging and kissing, or if it is more centered around just sex. ",asexuality
What was puberty like for asexual people?,I'm talking about all the shitty hormones and urge to masturbate...did you go through it like normal or  had a different experience?,asexuality
Do you watch anime?,"Anime often times use sexuality as a key technique to market the show. Characters are very often designed to be busty and curvy and sexual tension is frequently pushed on. Many feminine outfits are designed to show lots of skin or emphasis traits in characters that people would think of as sexy. Even if sexuality is not overt, subtle details such as the conformity of clothes to a woman's chest or bottom suggest that a character ought to be thought of as 'sexy'. 

The widespread sexuality of anime seems to be embraced as part of the culture of anime watching itself, which isn't necessarily a bad thing, but I wonder what you people think of it, whether you are sexually repulsed, positive, or whatever disposition in between.  

For those interested, there is a subreddit dedicated to asexual-friendly anime called/r/animAce. Though i question some of the entries on the list, they have a list of 'asexual-friendly' anime pinned to their subreddit. ",asexuality
Do I Have Erectile Dysfunction Or Am I Just Ace?,,asexuality
Confused about where i fit in,"Hello! So, I have a strange relationship to sexual attraction. I enjoy flirting with some people, and then I can have sex 1-3 times enthusiastically. But afterwards I'm indifferent. I have a feeling I only like flirting and subsequent sex as part of a ""hunting"" pattern. I have ADHD and I'm constantly seeking dopaminergic activities. Flirting is one of those. But if I was actually asexual, how would I determine if I'm actually attracted to people, if I've never felt it? Am I attracted to people or do I just enjoy the high I get off flirting? I'd appreciate any insight.",asexuality
Thank you all!,"TL:DR I just finally figured out I’m ace. I want to thank everyone on here for having advice and life experiences to help me realize I’m ace!

Longer story: I’ve always wondered why I wasn’t as sexually attracted to girls as my friends appeared to be. I’ve had a couple girlfriends and I’ve enjoyed the kissing and cuddling but never had a desire to have sex with them. Even when totally drunk. I’ve had people ask if I was gay (I’m definitely not but I don’t have any problems with people who are) and people would tell me they thought I was lying.  I first heard about aces on Bojack, thanks to Todd, and it’s been sitting in the back of my mind since then. This weekend it was really weighing on my mind.  After some research on what it all entails, and reading stories. I’ve finally figured out I am Ace and I want to thank everyone on here for posting information, stories, and being supportive of those trying to learn more about the ace community. Thanks also for powering through my rambling.",asexuality
How Do You Know When You’re Asexual?,,asexuality
Can I ask a question?,"I suppose I should begin by saying that my name is Tara. Hello.

So, as far as I can remember, I've never really been interested in anything of a sexual nature, whether it be masturbation, sex or anything in between. Now, as a sixteen year old girl, as far as I've been made aware, this is usually when the hormones go wild and all I'm supposed to think about is boys and that sort of thing, but I really don't. I even had conceptually thought of adopting a child in the far future seeing as pregnancy and childbirth seems simply dreadful personally. This isn't a problem for me, I was actually quite excited when I found out about asexuality, thinking that I had found a term for why I was feeling the way I was, or rather, the lack of certain feelings. However, when I had told my mom about my personal revelation, she was quick to dismiss it, saying that it was because I hadn't had any experience in that field and that I was too young to really know.

Yes, it hurt quite a bit, especially as she's like my doppelganger and I thought she would be cool about it. It also got me thinking that maybe she was right and I shouldn't be so quick to put a label on myself, but that euphoric happiness has quickly been replaced by almost overwhelming sadness, and as someone who potentially has undiagnosed depression and social anxiety, it's been pretty bad overall. I'm not exactly sure what to do now, and every time I try to bring it up with my mom again, she just snaps at me, then ignores me and refuses to talk about it any further. I don't know if I need reassurance or something, or if this is something that everyone will just learn to accept and acknowledge when i'm older and they actually believe me.

Any opinions, advice or help would be wonderful. I would also like to say thank you if you read this far as well as apologize if any of this was rude or insensitive, this is my first time on Reddit and i'm not quite sure what i'm doing.",asexuality
"Hi r/asexuality! I'm Guido and a couple of months ago I launched QueerMania, a project that aim to spread a sign of solidarity for all the people that just want to live their own sexuality (or lack of it) the way they want to. We have a (growing soon) asexuality collection. Do you like it? :-)",,asexuality
My ace inspired suit for a wedding,,asexuality
Romantic Frustation,anybody else get that ~~sexual~~  Romantic Frustration?,asexuality
You know you're asexual when...,"... you search for ""signs your..."" and get suggestions like a crush/girl/boy likes you, but what you were looking for were signs your cat loves you.",asexuality
An Ace/Aro comic by Chu,,asexuality
What does it mean to be masculine or feminine if we take sexuality out of the equation?,"Being asexual, I find it hard to think of myself as either masculine or feminine. 

What is it that makes an asexual masculine or feminine? Is it their appearance? actions? thought processes? looking at most actions or thoughts, it's hard to identify which of those are masculine and which are feminine... 

I think appearances play a big part in this definition of masculinity vs femininity, but what if we werent capable of seeing ourselves in the mirror? How would one determine whether they are masculine or feminine?

All thoughts are welcome. ",asexuality
"[Warning, lots of sex talk]My gf says she's asexual, but is she just nervous/inexperienced?","First off, sorry if the post title sounds ignorant. I've known her for a very long time, so what I have experienced with her =/= what she says.

She is 19 years old, I am 23 with a very high sex drive. We have had a lot of sexual contact in the past, though admittedly, most of it aided by alcohol on her part. The first sexual contact I had with her was when she was 16, I fingered her, and she liked it so much she wanted to do it with me every day. We *did* it every day for a month, moving on to oral once and breast touching which she really liked. However, after that month, she started feeling ashamed, and admittedly, I was beginning to push her to do it every day, being the horndog I am. It caused us to temporarily split up, and this is when she started calling herself ace.

A few years later, we got talking again, and we got into roleplaying over text. Quickly, the roleplays went from light and adventurous to darker and angsty. She would have her characters be kidnapped and lightly tortured, or made into a slave, etc. One day, she admitted this made her wet, and she wanted to start making the roleplays sexual. She set her bounds as nothing we haven't done with each other, which she slowly expanded to include sex as well. We did this for a few months, then I moved in with her as a roommate.

We had no sexual contact living together for the longest time, however, about 4 months in, we were lightly cuddling on the couch, and I found my hand on her thigh. I kept slowly advancing, and she did the hand thing she did (little circles on my leg to say ""I am enjoying this""), and I ended up fingering her. She told me the next day that she didn't want to make this a habit, but we started going at it every weekend. I would never push her further than we've been in the past, since she's expressed discomfort with sex. She asked for sex only once, when she was blackout drunk on new years, but I turned her down. She gets VERY sexual when drunk, but is also quick to back down.

Anyways. After the initial fingering, our weekly hookups were because of booze. We would both get drunk and fool around for an hour or 2 then go to bed. During the week, she'd say ""Okay, not this week"" and then when the weekend came, she would have a drink and be all over me. She says she genuinely enjoys this but always needs to drink more to stay comfortable.

Anyways. After we did that for ~5 months, she began saying she didn't want to anymore, because it was getting too much. I was ignoring her wants, just being rough and trying to satisfy myself because I was getting really drunk too, and I think it struck a bad nerve with her. She mentioned our experiences left a bad taste in her mouth. We began formally dating again, with the promise that she would be making all of the first moves. It took us 2 months to have our first kiss, which I could tell she had to work up the bravery for. This is where we're at now, and we're in a forced LDR for a year before we move back in together. We still roleplay sexually over text, but otherwise she insists on being ace.

What she describes it as is oversensitivity. Like eating food that's too sweet, it feels good but it's too much. She likes engaging in sex, but can't take it far without being overwhelmed. IE kissing, touching breasts, very light thigh touching, cuddling and that's about it. She insists she is ace, but is open to the idea of changing over time, since at 14 she would go beet red at the mention of sex, and now she flirts back and sometimes even flirts without me starting.

It's like a fully sexual being is in her that's too scared/sensitive to come out. I don't want to push it but I also don't want to be wrong about this. Does the ""too much of a good thing"" description ring any bells with you? She also wants to have children, is willing to get blackout drunk to have the necessary sex for it, and has expressed interest in using handcuffs/collars. It's confusing, because there are sexual things she really likes (chest touching) but anything past becomes too intense for her.

It would be nice to hear your feedback, because while she makes it pretty clear that while she identifies as asexual, she also says it could change, and that if she were less sensitive sexually, she'd be willing to do a lot more with me.

Thanks for reading all this.

TL;DR girlfriend identifies as asexual, enjoys and sometimes initiates sexual contact, but always stops it early because she's sensitive. It's like she likes the idea of sex but the physical side quickly gets too much",asexuality
This makes me glad I don't have sex,,asexuality
Would love some advice from anyone who's tried dating an asexual as a (very) sexual poly person.,"I don't have any particular complaints, just want to make sure I'm doing things right and any feedback about doing this in a asexual+poly context. 

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

Backstory: my friend B and I have been internet friends through another friend for about 4-5 years. We met that way and flirted a lot and there was always (I thought) a very clear sexual tension between us. Well I just so happened to get into the grad school where she is so we ended up hanging out a lot more. Things seemed to be developing towards a relationship but I'm very poly and open about that and it never seemed to bother her. 

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

However recently she came out as asexual to me--she had also come out as so to our mutual (her best) friend and he had reacted badly. I did not have that reaction, I sent her books on asexuality I had and lots of memes to make sure she felt supported and encouraged and she got into reading that stuff, and she was very thankful. She settled on being asexual biromantic for now, partially because she says she does not have a sexual drive and partially because in the past always had very painful and bad sex due to really bad endometriosis. 

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

Anyhow there have been a few nights where we've hung out, the first night we just made out and cuddled and it was very intimate and nice and I wanted to make sure she was able to develop the bounds of what she wanted, so checked in with very verbal consent at every stage. The last time we hung out it ended up with shirts off and cuddling and last night it ended up essentially the same thing except just wearing underwear and making out and cuddling. I gave her a full massage and was cuddling her and I incidentally got off through the grinding that we were half-doing (but checking in with her to make sure it was okay). 

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

In a lot of ways it's been a rather rewarding experience for me because it's a reminder that sex and intimacy are two separate things and it is possible to be loving and caring about someone, and it works well for my sort of love style in general, and it's pretty compatible with poly in general--I'm able to get sex from another partner (not that I currently have one locally). But also I wanted to kinda clear my thoughts out here (and elsewhere) and see if anyone has had this sort of experience before and how they have navigated it. ",asexuality
Ace dating website UK?,There seems to be a few sites out there but which one has the most people on?,asexuality
Really confused about my relationship with sex and have some questions about Asexual stuffs,"I'm a very confused 'gay' guy in my mid twenties, super duper lonely in a small city with barely any LGBTQIA+ support projects. I'm relatively attractive, fit and healthy, suffer massively with anxiety and depression from time to time and am finding sex to be massively traumatic. I experience sexual attraction, set up dates with people, go on them, occasionally attempt hookups even-but the sex is usually super scary for me and I don't get aroused and kind of shut off until it's over. Generally the thing I think about is just 'Let him do his thing, it'll be over soon'. 

Earlier this year I went celibate for about 3 months and it helped somewhat with my mental health, I even had an okay sexual experience after that period with someone I really trusted and it was nice for a while. Now I'm finding all of this to be super traumatic and I think I'm going to attempt going celibate again for as long as it works.

&amp;#x200B;

Does any of this sound like asexuality? I have a friend who claims to be in touch with all things q and they dismiss my ideas about asexuality completely as me just having past trauma. Can anyone help me out?",asexuality
"I'm not asexual, but my girlfriend is","EDITED (added a few things at the end):

I'm a heterosexual guy, but I've been dating an asexual girl. I'm always afraid that I might make a misstep and do something outside of her boundaries, and I'm not sure how to raise the subject. She doesn't really have aversions to hugging or kissing, but I don't know much past that. Are any of you ace, but dating a non-ace person? If so, how do you get around to talking about your boundaries and related things? I really like this girl and I don't want to do/say anything stupid to scare her away.

Thank you so much to everybody who responded. I wasn't sure about posting this, and I'm so glad I did. It was very reassuring to read what everyone had to say, and I felt extremely welcomed by this sub. ",asexuality
Anyone else get depressed or anxious about missing out?,"Hey, hi, first time posting here. I'm somewhere gray-ish on the Ace Spectrum, heteroromantic, and currently completely depressed about milestones passing me by. I'm super hormonal right now, so ... caveat lector, but I'm so frustrated and sad that my orientation has made it so difficult to find love and have a ""normal"" life. I'm an introvert, and generally pretty happy alone, but I'm also a romantic, man. I've only felt chemical attraction a few times in my life, but I wanted a family. I wanted to be young and wildly in love, to get married, to be broke and happy starting our lives together, making marks on the door jamb as our kids grew up. Possibly, I watched too many romcoms at a formative age.    


I was engaged at 24, but it fell apart when he told me that if I expected him to be faithful, then he expected sex at least twice a day. I didn't even know the term ""Ace"" at the time, but I knew that made me feel really betrayed and panicky, and not a little like I was signing my life away to be a sex slave. (He was an ass. I dodged a bullet there.) I can't carry kids, but that was okay. I always planned to adopt or use a surrogate. But let me tell you a thing -- the number of men a) to whom I'm chemically attracted; b) who are attracted to me; c) who live near my smallish southern town and d) are cool with kissing, hugging, cuddling, but not much sex? Is vanishingly infinitesimal, y'all. And I'm 41. I don't look it, I don't feel it, but here I am. I can never have those things I wanted for my young life and I'm really damn sad about it. 

&amp;#x200B;

Ugh.",asexuality
Writer looking for more info on asexuality,"Hi, so I would really like to incorporate an asexual character into my novel, to show some more diversity among other reasons, but I feel like I know too little about the concept as a whole to write it believeably, so I figured I'd turn to this sub. 

I'd just like to hear about some experiences, how you view your own asexuality, what it entails...just anyone sharing what they feel comfortable with. Any input would be much appreciated, thanks in advance.",asexuality
"I’m an allo(ish) with an Ace/Aro girlfriend, help","Soooo, got into a relationship with a girl I thought was ace, but not aro. She liedish , and turns out, she’s aro too. I can’t handle the lack of sexual and romantic substance in the relationship, help!!",asexuality
Ace Spectrum Questioning,"I started learning about asexuality when an ex girlfriend planted the seed in my head years ago, but was told by friends and family that she was just fucking with my head to stop me from trying to cheat. I've been on multiple dates that have led to sex, and while I love cuddling and physically being with someone, when it comes to the actual sex part it just doesn't work with my head in the way that it either feels like a chore, or I have to execute the combo perfectly, or that no matter what else is happening if the sex sucks that's the ultimate decider of relationship happiness. 

I've been seeing somebody over the last month, and was told that the sex hasn't been good and that something has to change. In thinking about it, Asexuality keeps coming to the forefront of my mind and I'm posting this because I legitimately have no idea.

&amp;#x200B;

This has been something I've been wondering for a long time, since I realized that I don't get aroused by porn or traditionally ""sexy"" things so much as more mental aspects. Is there a place on the asexuality spectrum for somebody who still likes physical aspects of being intimate but doesn't like sex?",asexuality
I finally got my ace pride flag for my dorm room. I love it already!,,asexuality
Coming Out,"  (Also posted to r/Advice) Hi. I'm a teenager, and I'm unsure how to tell my family I'm asexual. 

  I'm not even sure if I should! I know my parents have multiple friends who are part of the LGBT+ community, but I'm unsure if they would be supportive of me. I'm mostly scared because, well, when we have debates about this kind of thing, they all made it clear they don't ***hate*** the community, but they exactly don't support it either. 

I've come out to multiple of my friends, and they've been really supportive. But my parents... I don't know. 

   I'm really scared to tell them, and I haven't even spoken to my therapist about this. 

   What do I do?",asexuality
How do you describe your romantic attraction to allosexual people?,"I'm really curious your answeres- I'm ace but not aro and for the uninitiated that tends to be confusing because allos rarely separate romance from sex. How do you/have you/would you describe the way you feel romantically about someone when obviously part of the attraction isn't sexual? And how do you define what you find attractive about them? I've thrown around the phrase ""aesthetic attraction"" but I dunno if there's a better way to explain it and I was curious y'alls thoughts!",asexuality
